Table of Contents
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒  ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT
OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended: December 31, 2021
OR
☐  TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE
ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from                        to                       
Commission File Number: 1-14066
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware     13-3849074
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
1440 East Missouri Avenue Suite 160 Phoenix, AZ     85014
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (602) 264-1375
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class:     Trading Symbol     Name of each exchange on which registered:
Common stock, par value $0.01 per share SCCO New York Stock Exchange
Lima Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ⌧ No ◻
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ◻ No ⌧
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during
the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90
days. Yes ⌧ No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of
Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files). Yes ⌧ No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, or an emerging
growth company. See definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the
Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ⌧ Accelerated filer ◻ Non-accelerated filer ◻ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or
revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control
over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report.
Yes ⌧ No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act).  Yes ☐  No ⌧
At March 4, 2022, there were of record 773,086,869 shares of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, outstanding.
The aggregate market value of the shares of common stock (based upon the closing price at June 30, 2021 as reported on the New York Stock Exchange-
Composite Transactions) of Southern Copper Corporation held by non-affiliates was approximately $5,519.0 million.
PORTIONS OF THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENTS ARE INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE:
Part III:     Proxy statement for 2022 Annual Meeting of Stockholders
Part IV: Exhibit Index is on Page 186 through 189

Table of Contents
2Southern Copper Corporation (“SCC”)
INDEX TO FORM 10-K
Page No.
PART I.
Item 1 Business 3 - 15
Item 1A Risk factors 15 - 26
Item 1B Unresolved Staff Comments 26
Item 2 Properties 27 - 79
Item 3 Legal Proceedings 79
Item 4 Mine Safety Disclosure 79
PART II.
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases
of Equity Securities 80 - 82
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 83 - 114
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 115 - 116
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 117 - 177
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountant on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 178
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 178 - 180
Item 9B. Other Information 180
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 180
PART III.
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 181 - 182
Item 11. Executive Compensation 181 - 182
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 181 - 182
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 181 - 182
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 181 - 182
PART IV.
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedule 183 - 185
Supplemental information 186 - 189
Signatures 190
Table of Contents
3PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
THE COMPANY
We believe Southern Copper Corporation (“SCC”, “Southern Copper” or the “Company”) is one of the largest integrated
copper producers in the world. Our major production includes copper, molybdenum, zinc and silver. All of our mining,
smelting and refining facilities are located in Peru and Mexico and we conduct exploration activities in those countries
and in Argentina, Chile and Ecuador. See Item 2 “Properties—Review of Operations” for maps of our principal mines,
smelting facilities and refineries. The considerable scale of our operations makes us one of the largest mining companies
in Peru and Mexico. We believe we have the largest copper reserves in the world. We were incorporated in Delaware in
1952 and have conducted copper mining operations since 1960. Since 1996, our common stock has been listed on both
the New York and Lima Stock Exchanges.
Our Peruvian copper operations involve mining, milling and flotation of copper ore to produce copper concentrates and
molybdenum concentrates; the smelting of copper concentrates to produce blister and anode copper; and the refining of
anode copper to produce copper cathodes. As part of this production process, we also produce significant amounts of
molybdenum concentrate and sulfuric acid. Our precious metals plant at the Ilo refinery produces refined silver, gold,
and other materials. Additionally, we produce refined copper using solvent extraction/electrowinning technology (“SX-
EW”). We operate the Toquepala and Cuajone open-pit mines high in the Andes Mountains, approximately 860
kilometers southeast of the city of Lima, Peru. We also operate a smelter and refinery west of the Toquepala and Cuajone
mines in the coastal city of Ilo, Peru.
Our Mexican operations are conducted through our subsidiary, Minera Mexico, S.A. de C.V. (“Minera Mexico”), which
we acquired in 2005. Minera Mexico engages primarily in the mining and processing of copper, molybdenum, zinc,
silver, gold and lead. Minera Mexico operates through subsidiaries that are grouped into three separate units. Mexicana
de Cobre, S.A. de C.V. (together with its subsidiaries, the “La Caridad” unit) operates La Caridad, an open-pit copper
mine, a copper ore concentrator, a SX-EW plant, a smelter, refinery and a rod plant. The La Caridad refinery has a
precious metals plant that produces refined silver, gold and other materials. Operadora de Minas e Instalaciones Mineras,
S.A de C.V. (the “Buenavista unit”) operates Buenavista, an open-pit copper mine, which is located on the site of one of
the world’s largest copper ore deposits, two copper concentrators and two operating SX-EW plants. Industrial Minera
Mexico, S.A. de C.V. (together with its subsidiaries, the “IMMSA unit”) operates five underground mines that produce
zinc, lead, copper, silver and gold, and a zinc refinery.
We utilize modern, state of the art mining and processing methods, including global positioning systems and
computerized mining processes. Our operations have a high level of vertical integration, which allows us to use our
facilities, employees and equipment to manage the entire production process, including ore mining and production of
refined copper rod and other products, and to execute most associated transport and logistics functions.
The sales prices for our products are largely determined by market forces beyond our control. Our management,
therefore, focuses on cost control and production enhancement to remain profitable. We endeavor to achieve these goals
through capital spending programs, exploration efforts and cost reduction programs. Our focus is on remaining
profitable during periods of low copper prices and maximizing results in periods of high copper prices. For additional
information on the sale prices of the metals we produce, please see “Metal Prices” in this Item 1.
Currency Information:
Unless stated otherwise, all our financial information is presented in U.S. dollars and any reference herein to “U.S.
dollars,” “dollars,” or “$” are to U.S. dollars; references to “sol,” “soles” or “S/”, signify Peruvian soles; and references
to “peso,” “pesos,” or “Ps.,” represent Mexican pesos.
Table of Contents
4Unit Information:
Unless otherwise noted, all tonnages are in metric tonnes. To convert to short tons, multiply by 1.102. All ounces are troy
ounces. All distances are in kilometers. To convert to miles, multiply by 0.621. To convert hectares to acres, multiply by
2.47.
ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE
The following chart describes our organizational structure, starting with our controlling stockholders, as of
December 31, 2021. For clarity purposes, the chart identifies only our main subsidiaries and eliminates intermediate
holding companies.
We are a majority-owned, indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico S.A.B. de C.V. (“Grupo Mexico”). As of December 31,
2021, Grupo Mexico, through its wholly-owned subsidiary Americas Mining Corporation (“AMC”), owned 88.9% of
our capital stock. Grupo Mexico’s principal business is to act as a holding company for the shares of other corporations
engaged in the mining, processing, purchase and sale of minerals and other products and in the provision of railway and
other related services.
We conduct our operations in Peru through a registered branch (the “SPCC Peru Branch”, “Branch” or “Peruvian
Branch”). The SPCC Peru Branch comprises virtually all of our assets and liabilities associated with our copper
operations in Peru. The SPCC Peru Branch does not constitute a corporation that is separate from SCC, and, as such, the
obligations of the SPCC Peru Branch are direct obligations of SCC and vice-versa. The SPCC Peru Branch is, however,
registered as a branch of a foreign company pursuant to Peruvian law and through this entity, we hold assets, incur
liabilities and conduct operations in Peru. Although the SPCC Peru Branch has no capital or liability that is separate
from that held or applicable to SCC, the SPCC Peru Branch is deemed to have equity capital for purposes of determining
the economic interests of holders of our investment shares (See Note 14 “Stockholders´ Equity” of the consolidated
financial statements).
In April 2005, we acquired Minera Mexico, from Americas Mining Corporation (“AMC”), a subsidiary of Grupo
Mexico, our controlling stockholder. Minera Mexico is a holding company and all of its operations are conducted
through subsidiaries that are grouped into three units: (i) the La Caridad unit (ii) the Buenavista unit and (iii) the IMMSA
unit. We own 99.96% of Minera Mexico.

Table of Contents
5In 2008, our Board of Directors (“BOD”) authorized a $500 million share repurchase program that has since been
increased by the BOD and is currently authorized to $3 billion. Pursuant to this program, through December 31, 2021 we
have purchased 119.5 million shares of our common stock at a cost of $2.9 billion. These shares are available for general
corporate purposes. We may purchase additional shares from time to time, based on market conditions and other factors.
This repurchase program has no expiration date and may be modified or discontinued at any time.
REPUBLIC OF PERU AND MEXICO
Our revenues are derived primarily from our operations in Peru and Mexico. Risks related to our operations in both
countries include those associated with economic and political conditions, the effects of currency fluctuations and
inflation, the effects of government regulations and the geographic concentration of our operations.
OUR BUSINESS
COPPER BUSINESS
Copper is an important component in the world’s infrastructure chain. It is the third most widely used metal, after iron
and aluminum. Copper has unique chemical and physical properties, including high ductility; malleability; thermal and
electrical conductivity; and resistance to corrosion, and as such, is considered a prime material for use in electrical and
electronic products, including components for power transmission and generation, which accounts for about three
quarters of copper global use, and for telecommunications, building construction, transportation and industrial
machinery. Copper is also an important metal in non-electrical applications such as plumbing and roofing and, when
alloyed with zinc to form brass, is used in many industrial and consumer applications.
Copper is an internationally traded commodity whose prices are mainly determined by the major metal exchanges, the
Commodities Exchange, or “COMEX,” in New York and the London Metal Exchange or “LME,” in London. Copper is
usually found in nature in association with sulfur. Pure copper metal is generally produced in a multi-stage process,
beginning with the mining and concentrating of low-grade ores containing copper sulfide minerals, and followed by
smelting and electrolytic refining to produce a pure copper cathode. An increasingly larger share of copper is being
produced from acid leaching of oxidized ores. Copper is one of the oldest metals known to man and has contributed
significantly to the development of civilization.
BUSINESS REPORTING SEGMENTS:
Our management divides Southern Copper into three reportable segments and manages each as a separate segment.
The three segments identified are groups of individual mines, each of which constitutes an operating segment with
similar economic characteristics, product types, processes and support facilities, regulatory environments, employee
bargaining contracts and currency risks. In addition, each mine within the individual group earns revenues from similar
types of customers for their products and services and each group incurs expenses independently, including commercial
transactions between groups.
Inter-segment sales are based on arm’s length prices at the time of sale. These may not be reflective of actual prices
realized by the Company due to various factors, including additional processing, timing of sales to outside customers
and transportation cost. Information regarding the Company’s sales is included in the segment data. The segments
identified by the Company are:
1. Peruvian operations, which include the Toquepala and Cuajone mine complexes and the smelting and refining
plants, including a precious metals plant, industrial railroad and port facilities that service both mines. Sales of
its products are recorded as revenue from our Peruvian mines. The Peruvian operations produce copper, by-
products of molybdenum, silver and other materials.
Table of Contents
62. Mexican open-pit operations, which include the La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and the smelting
and refining plants, including a precious metals plant and a copper rod plant and support facilities that service
both mines. Sales of its products are recorded as revenue of our Mexican mines. The Mexican open-pit
operations produce copper, with production of by-products of molybdenum, silver and other materials.
3. Mexican underground mining operations, which include five underground mines that produce zinc, copper,
lead, silver and gold; and a zinc refinery. This group is identified as the IMMSA unit and sales of its products
are recorded as revenue from the IMMSA unit.
Financial information is periodically prepared for each of the three segments and the results are reported to the Chief
Operating Decision Maker (“CODM”) on a segment basis. The CODM focuses on operating income and on total assets
as measures of performance to evaluate different segments and to make decisions to allocate resources to the reported
segments. These are common measures in the mining industry.
Segment information is included in Item 2 “Properties.” More information on business segment and segment financial
information is included in Note 19 “Segment and Related Information” of the consolidated financial statements.
CAPITAL INVESTMENT PROGRAM AND EXPLORATION ACTIVITIES
For a description of our capital investment program, see Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations—Capital Investment Program” and for our exploration activities, see Item 2
“Properties—Explorations Activities.”
PRINCIPAL PRODUCTS AND MARKETS
Copper is primarily used in the building and construction industries; in the power generation and transmission industry;
and in the electrical and electronic products; and, to a lesser extent, in industrial machinery and equipment; consumer
products; and in the automotive and transportation industries. Molybdenum is used to toughen alloy steels and soften
tungsten alloy and is also used in fertilizers, dyes, enamels and reagents. Silver is used for electrical and electronic
products and, to a lesser extent, in brazing alloys and solder, jewelry, coinage, photographic, silverware and catalysts.
Zinc is primarily used as a coating on iron and steel to protect against corrosion; it is also used to make die cast parts to
manufacture batteries and to form sheets for architectural purposes.
Our marketing strategy and annual sales planning emphasize developing and maintaining long-term customer
relationships. As such, acquiring annual or other long-term contracts for the sale of our products is a high priority.
Generally, 80% to 90% of our metal production is sold under annual or longer-term contracts. Sales prices are
determined based on the prevailing commodity prices for the quotation period according to the terms of the contract.
We focus on end-user customers as opposed to selling on the spot market or to trading companies. In addition, we devote
significant marketing efforts to diversifying our sales both by region and customer base. We also strive to provide
superior customer service, including timely deliveries of our products. Our ability to consistently fulfill customer
demand is underpinned by our substantial production capacity.
For additional information on sales please see “Revenue recognition” in Note 2 “Summary of Significant Accounting
Policies” and Note 19 “Segment and Related Information” of the consolidated financial statements.
METALS PRICES
Prices for our products are principally a function of supply and demand and, with the exception of molybdenum, are
established on COMEX and LME. Prices for our molybdenum products are established by reference to the publication
Platt’s Metals Week. Our contract prices also reflect any negotiated premiums and the costs of freight and other factors.
From time to time, we have entered into hedging transactions to provide partial protection against future decreases in the
market price of metals and we may do so under certain market conditions. For a further discussion of our products
Table of Contents
7market prices, please see Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations—Metal Prices.”
The table below shows the high, low and average COMEX and LME per pound copper prices during the last 10 years:
 Copper (COMEX)  Copper (LME)
Year     High    Low    Average    High    Low    Average
2012   3.97  3.28  3.61  3.93  3.29  3.61
2013   3.78  3.03  3.34  3.74  3.01  3.32
2014   3.43  2.84  3.12  3.37  2.86  3.11
2015   2.95  2.02  2.51  2.92  2.05  2.50
2016   2.69  1.94  2.20  2.69  1.96  2.21
2017   3.29  2.48  2.80  3.27  2.48  2.80
2018   3.29  2.56  2.93  3.29  2.64  2.96
2019   2.98  2.51  2.72  2.98  2.51  2.72
2020   3.63  2.12  2.80  3.61  2.09  2.80
2021—1st Q   4.30  3.54  3.86  4.36  3.52  3.85
2021—2nd Q   4.78  4.03  4.43  4.86  3.98  4.40
2021—3rd Q   4.59  4.04  4.30  4.44  3.98  4.25
2021—4th Q   4.76  4.16  4.38  4.83  4.12  4.40
2021   4.78  3.54  4.24  4.86  3.52  4.23
The per pound COMEX copper price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $3.10 and $3.03, respectively. The
per pound LME copper price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $3.10 and $3.02, respectively.
The table below shows the high, low and average prices per pound with the exception of silver, which is priced per
ounce. The market prices for our three principal by-products over the last 10 years are as follows:
  Molybdenum (Dealer  
 Oxide Platt’s
Silver (COMEX)  Metals Week) Zinc (LME)
Year     High    Low    Average    High    Low    Average    High    Low    Average
2012   
37.14  
26.25  
31.19  
14.80  
10.90  
12.62  
0.99  
0.80  0.88
2013   
32.41  
18.53  
23.82  11.95  9.12  
10.26  
0.99  
0.81  0.87
2014   
22.05  
15.39  
19.04  
15.05  8.75  11.30  
1.10  
0.88  0.98
2015   
18.35  
13.67  
15.68  9.40  4.30  6.59  
1.09  
0.66  0.88
2016   
20.67  
13.74  
17.10  8.60  5.10  6.42  
1.32  
0.73  0.95
2017   
18.49  
15.37  
17.03  
10.25  6.85  8.13  
1.53  
1.00  1.31
2018   
17.55  
13.95  
15.65  
13.00  
10.60  11.86  
1.64  
1.04  1.33
2019   
19.39 
14.28 
16.16 
12.70  8.28 11.27 
1.37 
0.90  1.16
2020   
29.25 11.74 
20.62 
10.90  7.00  8.57 
1.29 
0.72  1.03
2021—1st Q   
29.40 
24.12 
26.29 
12.50  9.95 11.19 
1.31 
1.15  1.25
2021—2nd Q   
28.31 
24.76 
26.78 
20.03 
10.93 
13.89 
1.39 
1.25  1.32
2021—3rd Q   
26.48 
21.46 
24.28 
20.10 
17.70 
18.43 
1.41 
1.32  1.36
2021—4th Q   
25.34 
21.51 
23.36 
19.40 
18.40 
18.53 
1.73 
1.37  1.53
2021   
29.40 
21.46 
25.18 
20.10  9.95 
15.51 
1.73 
1.15  1.36
The per ounce COMEX silver price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $18.93 and $20.15, respectively. The
per pound Platt’s Metals Week Dealer Oxide molybdenum price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $11.07
and $10.25, respectively. The per pound LME zinc price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $1.24 and $1.07,
respectively.
Table of Contents
8COMPETITIVE CONDITIONS
Competition in the copper market is based primarily on price and service basis, with price being the most important
factor when supplies of copper are ample. Our products compete with other materials, including aluminum and plastics.
For additional information, see Item 1A “Risk Factors—The copper mining industry is highly competitive.”
HUMAN CAPITAL RESOURCES
As of December 31, 2021, we had 14,700 employees, approximately 75% of whom are covered by a Collective Labor
Agreement and are represented by nine different labor unions. We believe that the labor environment in our operations in
Mexico and Peru is favorable, which has allowed us to increase productivity as we advance the goals of our capital
expansion program. In addition, around 14,000 people were working as contractors in support of our operations. In
accordance with our Community Development commitment, more than 55% of our workforce is hired locally.
Talent Development, Training and Retention
As a large integrated copper producer, we have a wide range of employees, including management professionals,
technicians, engineers, and production employees. We believe in our people, and we provide a wide variety of
opportunities for professional growth for all employees in Peru and Mexico. In 2021 we had a training investment of
over $1.7 million, which resulted in more than 274,000 training hours, focused on safety and health, technical training,
soft skills development, and compliance training. We also seek to enhance institutional knowledge through on-the-job
training experiences, and designed more than 400 Individual Development Plans, as part of our succession planning.
All of our employees receive initial training and opportunities for continuous development throughout their careers,
which we believe favors talent retention. More than 65% of the positions are covered by internal employees and our
retention rate is around 92%. Voluntary turnover indicators in all of the countries in which we operate remain at single
digits year-over-year. We believe this suggests our employees have a strong desire to continue working with us.
Company Culture
We believe in a shared mission, vision, values and improving our employer brand for existing and future employees. The
Company seeks to create value for its employees to help ensure that their working experience is optimal. Various efforts
are made on this front, including promoting a safe and collaborative work environment and culture and ensuring
employees continue to be engaged with the Company’s values and principles.
In terms of corporate culture, the Company is committed to the continuous growth and development of its employees
and surrounding communities. Through values such as creativity, honesty, equality and respect, we ensure that our
employees are aligned with the same principles and work ethics, which in turn results in a standardized culture across the
Company. The Company also seeks to promote goal-oriented principles to obtain results that positively affect our main
stakeholders and communities and which focus on innovation, human growth and wellbeing, environmental care, and
forward thinking.
Compensation and Benefits
We also focus on attracting and retaining employees by providing compensation and benefit packages that are
competitive within the applicable market, considering the location of the position, responsibilities and compensation
requirements in the countries where we operate. Our compensation practices consider many factors, including individual
performance and responsibilities; years of service; elements of compensation mandated by Peruvian and Mexican law;
future challenges and objectives; contributions to the future success of our Company; the employee’s total compensation
and our financial performance. We may also look at the compensation levels of comparable companies.
Health and Safety
During 2021, we intensified our COVID-19 related communication to the entire organization, with a view to
strengthening the application of the health safety protocols in all of the Company’s operations and offices, which
include:
Table of Contents
9a)Increase of the application of antigen and PCR tests per day, including those prescribed at the homes of our
employees.
b)Decrease in capacity to 30% in offices and common spaces, keeping well-ventilated areas, and restriction of
meetings.
c)Promoting "home office" in those positions that allow it, applying sanitary filters and safety protocols. We
hired special Infirmary staff in all sites and offices, for prevention and medical care.
d)Continuous sanitization and prevention equipment for employees.
e)Limitation of access to company camps, where our employees´ families live.
f)Medical and psychological counseling line for our employees and our communities.
g)Functioning of health committees at each business center.
h)Coordinated actions with the municipal health committees.
i)Donations of supplies and diagnostic tests to local communities.
j)Accommodations for our employees in their complete vaccination schedule and booster applications.
Our focus on health and safety includes prevention and wellness programs, through the Medical and HR departments,
such as clinical attention and periodical revisions, wellness training and a wellness platform for our employees.
We are committed to having our operations audited and certified under the ISO 45001 standards, which we expect to be
completed in 2022. Health and safety programs include annual training, compliance with the regulators at each site, risk
management and Behavior Based Safety programs that extend our safety culture to contractors.  
Talent Attraction and Recruiting
We deploy several talent attraction programs, which entail leveraging organizational relations; establishing links with
national and regional institutions of higher learning in the countries where we operate; and participating in job fairs. We
also have a job opportunities section in our webpage and use several local and international job boards to publish
openings.
We offer professional internship programs to attract students before they graduate from universities or centers for
vocational training. Additionally, we believe that we are a first-choice employer in the countries where we operate. This
reflects our efforts to strengthen relationships with our stakeholders, including employees, and engage in community
development. We have transparent selection processes and are committed to upholding principles for human rights and
diversity, inclusion and non-discrimination.
Employee Engagement
Additionally, we conduct a biannual Employee Opinion Survey to measure employees’ perceptions of the Company and
take actions intended to increase employee engagement, develop a positive organizational environment, and strengthen
our culture. We measure the employee engagement level with 18 sub-factors, grouped into two major sets of factors:
loyalty and satisfaction. The first factor represents the degree to which an individual identifies with the organization and
its business goals, and the second reflects the individual’s degree of satisfaction with his/her working conditions and
draws a line between satisfaction levels and performance at work.
The average of these factors indicates the level of engagement on a scale of 1 to 5 (a Likert scale). In 2017, we had an
engagement rating of 3.71 and in 2019, our rating was at 3.77. In 2021 the rating increased to 4.09. We believe this
positive trend suggests a continuous improvement on the engagement level of our people.
For this year’s survey, we added and measured the COVID-19 factor to better understand the opinion of our people
about the actions taken by SCC in favor of our employees’ health and prevention, and we obtained a very high rating for
this particular factor. The survey also included new sociodemographic elements, in order to consider the opinions of our
diverse groups within our Company and respond with our “ECO Action Plan” for the next two years.
All employees, both unionized and non-unionized, are invited to participate in all of our human talent initiatives. This
reflects our belief that it is in the Company’s best interest to listen to all of our people and create open communications
Table of Contents
10channels. 76% of our employees participated during 2021, which is an increase of 6% compared to 2019. This number
exceeds that registered by other companies that apply similar surveys.  
We have adopted a corporate social responsibility policy that is designed to integrate the Company´s operations with
local communities in areas influenced by our operations. This policy focuses on creating permanent and positive
relationships to generate optimal social conditions and promote sustainable development in the area. We continue to
make significant expenditures for community programs.  For additional information on our community programs, refer
to Corporate Social Responsibility under Note 13 “Commitments and contingencies” to the consolidated financial
statements.
DIVERSITY, EQUITY AND INCLUSION (DEI)
Our vision on DEI is to ensure that our people always feel included, welcomed and valued for their personal and
professional contributions. This vision is based on our core values of respect, honesty and responsibility.
Consistent with our Code of Conduct and Human Rights Policy, our goal is to (i) build an organizational culture of total
quality and well-being with focus on diversity, inclusion and non-discrimination, (ii) increase sensitivity, knowledge and
skills in our leaders and employees in order to integrate diverse and inclusive teams and promote a culture of respect,
and (iii) extend this culture to the communities in which we operate.
Based on the results of a DEI survey in Mexico and Peru, we aligned our diversity and inclusion Strategic Plan with six
strategic initiatives to create Key Performance Indicators and increase participation of women by 2% in the organization,
reinforce our human resources policies for inclusion, consolidate the executive level commitment and implement
continuous training and communication campaigns at all levels in the organization.
During 2021, we issued and distributed our DEI Corporate Policy and trained 3,280 leaders end employees on DEI
fundamental principles through the Training Capsule “Let´s talk about Diversity, Inclusion and Non-Discrimination.” We
are committed to inclusion and to honor our diversity. We increased our female workforce from 854 to over 940, which
represents an increase of 10%. Additionally, 30% of our female workforce hold a STEM position (Science, Technology,
Engineering, Mathematics).
We now have a better understanding of our diversity distribution, which we believe allows us to direct special efforts for
each group, such as parents with children under 12.
CODE OF ETHICS
We yearly certify our employees in our Code of Ethics. Every employee, starting with new hires, commit and sign
agreement with our main document and guidance tool for our conduct in terms of our legal, professional and ethical
obligations, both in our business dealings and our interpersonal relationships.
Peru
73% of the Company’s 4,675 Peruvian employees were unionized as of December 31, 2021. Currently, there are six
separate unions, none of which represents the majority of workers, as defined by current Peruvian labor legislation.
During 2021, the Company decided to hold talks with the six unions to sign collective agreements prior to their effective
dates. As a result, between June and December 2021, the Company signed collective agreements with the six unions
with durations between three to six years. All of them granted annual salary increases of 5%. Additionally, each
agreement granted, among other things, a signing bonus of between S/ 45,000 (approximately $ 11,256) and S/ 90,000
(approximately $ 22,511), depending on the duration of the agreement. A long-term agreement bonus of S/ 10,000
(approximately $ 2,501) was granted to the union that signed a six-year extension of the collective bargaining
agreement. All these concepts have been recorded as labor expense.
As of December 31, 2021, the Company has no pending negotiations with Peruvian unions.
Table of Contents
11Employees of the Toquepala and Cuajone units reside in townsites, where we have built 3,700 houses and apartments.
We also have 90 houses in Ilo for staff personnel. Housing, together with maintenance and utility services, is provided at
minimal cost to most of our employees. Our townsite and housing complexes include schools, medical facilities,
churches, social clubs and recreational facilities. We also provide shopping, banking and other services at the townsites.
Mexico
73% of our 9,677 Mexican employees were unionized as of December 31, 2021 and are represented by four separate
unions. Under Mexican law, the terms of employment for unionized workers are set forth in collective bargaining
agreements. Mexican companies negotiate the salary provisions of collective bargaining agreements with the labor
unions on an annual basis and negotiate other benefits every two years. We conduct negotiations separately at each
mining complex and each processing plant.
Our Taxco mine in Mexico has been on strike since July 2007. For a discussion of labor matters, refer to the information
contained under the caption “Labor matters” in Note 13 “Commitments and Contingencies” of the consolidated financial
statements.
Employees of La Caridad and Buenavista units reside in townsites at Nacozari and Cananea, where we have built
approximately 1,800 houses and apartments. Most of the employees of the IMMSA unit reside on the grounds of the
mining or processing complexes where they work. We have built 356 houses and apartments on these sites. Housing,
together with maintenance and utility services, is provided at minimal cost to most of our employees. Our townsites and
housing complexes include educational and medical facilities, churches, social clubs, shopping centers, banking and
other services. Through 2007, the Buenavista unit provided health care services to employees and retired unionized
employees and their families through its own on-site hospital. In 2010, the Company signed an agreement with the
Secretary of Health of the State of Sonora to provide these services to its retired workers and their families. The new
workers of Buenavista receive health services through the Mexican Institute of Social Security as is the case for all
Mexican workers.
FUEL, ELECTRICITY AND WATER SUPPLIES
The principal raw materials used in our operations are fuel, gas, electricity and water. We use natural gas to power
boilers as well as generators and for metallurgical processes at our Mexican operations and utilize diesel fuel to power
mining equipment. We believe that sufficient sources of fuel, electricity and water are readily available. Fluctuations
may occur in the prices of these raw materials that are beyond our control; as such, we focus our efforts on reducing
costs through cost and energy-saving measures.
Energy generates the main cost in mining, so concern for its conservation and efficient usage is critical. We have energy
management committees at most of our mines, which meet periodically to discuss consumption and to develop measures
directed at saving energy. Also, alternative sources are being analyzed at the corporate level, including both traditional
and renewable energy sources. This approach has helped us to develop a culture of energy conservation directed at
ensuring the sustainability of our operations.
Peru:
Fuel:  In Peru, we obtain fuel primarily from Valero Peru, a local subsidiary of Valero Energy Corporation, a U.S. 
producer of fuel and power. The Company believes that adequate supplies of fuel are available for its operations in Peru.
Electricity:  In June 2014, we entered into a power purchase agreement for 120 megawatt (“MW”) with the state 
company Electroperu S.A., which began supplying energy to  our Peruvian operations for a twenty-year period that 
started on April 17, 2017. In July 2014, we entered into a power purchase agreement for 120MW with a private power 
generator Kallpa Generacion S.A. (“Kallpa”), which began supplying energy to our Peruvian operations for a ten-year 
period that started on April 17, 2017. In May 2016, we signed an additional power purchase agreement for a maximum 
of 80MW with Kallpa, under which Kallpa will supply energy to the operations related to the Toquepala expansion and 
to other minor projects for a period starting on May 1, 2017 and ending after ten years of commercial operations at the 
Table of Contents
12Toquepala Expansion or until April 30, 2029; whichever occurs first. We feel confident that additional power can be 
obtained from the Peruvian national grid, should the need arise.
Additionally, we have nine megawatts of power generation capacity from two small hydro-generating installations at
Cuajone. Power is distributed over a 224-kilometer closed loop transmission circuit, which is connected to the Peruvian
network.
Water:  We have water rights or licenses for up to 1,950 liters per second from well fields at the Huaitire, Vizcachas and 
Titijones aquifers and surface water rights from Lake Suches and two small water sources, Quebrada Honda and 
Quebrada Tacalaya. We believe these water sources are sufficient to supply the needs of our operating units at Toquepala 
and Cuajone, including the Toquepala expansion. In Ilo, we have two desalination plants that produce water for 
industrial use and domestic consumption that we believe will produce sufficient water for both current and projected 
needs.
Mexico:
Fuel:  In Mexico, since 2018, we have purchased fuel from Petroleos Mexicanos (“PEMEX”), the state producer, and 
from private suppliers.
The La Caridad unit imports natural gas from the United States through its pipeline (between Douglas, Arizona and
Nacozari, Sonora). This allows us to import natural gas at market prices and thereby reduce operating costs. Several
contracts with PEMEX and the United States provide us with the option of using a monthly or daily fixed prices for our
natural gas purchases.
Natural gas is used for metallurgical processes and to power furnaces, converters, casting wheels, boilers and electric
generators. Diesel oil is a backup method for all these uses. We use diesel oil to power mining equipment at our
operations.
Electricity:  Electricity is used as the main energy source at our mining complexes. We purchase most of our electricity 
from Mexico Generadora de Energia S. de R. L. (“MGE”), a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico which has two power plants 
designed to supply power to La Caridad and Buenavista units. MGE supplies 2.0% of its power output to third party 
energy users. These plants are natural gas-fired combined cycle power generating units, with a net total capacity of 516.2 
megawatts. In 2012, we entered into a power supply agreement with MGE that will last until 2032. The first plant was 
completed in 2013 and the second in 2014. The first plant began to supply power to the Company in December 2013, 
and the second plant in June 2015.
We also purchase electricity from the Comision Federal de Electricidad (the Federal Electricity Commission or the
“CFE”), the state’s electrical power producer. In addition, we recover some energy from waste heat boilers at the La
Caridad smelter. Accordingly, a significant portion of our operating costs in Mexico is dependent upon the pricing
policies of CFE and PEMEX, which are affected by political and regulatory environments, international market prices
for crude oil and natural gas; and conditions in the refinery markets.
Some IMMSA mining operations also purchase electricity from Eolica el Retiro, S.A.P.I de C.V. (“Eolica”), a windfarm
energy producer that is an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico. In August 2013, IMMSA and other of the Company’s
mining operations entered into a purchase agreement and in late 2014 started to purchase electricity from Eolica. Due to
the nature of the production process there is not a fixed power capacity contracted. Currently, Eolica el Retiro is
supplying approximately 61.0% of its power output to IMMSA and Mexcobre.
On February 20, 2020, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with Parque Eolico de Fenicias, S. de R.L. de
C.V., and indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico, to supply 611,400 MWh of power per year to some of the Company´s
Mexican operations for 20 years. This agreement is expected to begin in July 2022.
Water:  In Mexico, water is deemed public property and industries that are not connected to a public service water supply 
must obtain a water concession from Comision Nacional del Agua (the National Water Commission or the
Table of Contents
13“CNA”). Water usage fees are established in the Ley Federal de Derechos (the Federal Rights Law), which distinguishes
several availability zones with different fees per unit of volume according to each zone, with the exception of Mexicana
de Cobre. All of our operations have one or several water concessions and pump out the required water from wells.
Mexicana de Cobre pumps water from the La Angostura dam, which is close to the mine and plants. At our Buenavista
facility, we maintain our own wells and pay the CNA for water usage. Water conservation committees have been
established at each plant to conserve and recycle water. Water usage fees are updated on a yearly basis and have been on
the rise in recent years.
LEGAL AND REGULATORY MATTERS
In 2020 and 2021, no legal, environmental, labor or tax regulations came into effect that required the Company to incur
material costs of compliance, had material adverse effects on the Company’s operations, or affected normal execution of
the Company’s projects. Additionally, we believe that all our facilities in Peru and Mexico are in material compliance
with applicable environmental, mining and other applicable laws and regulations.
For a discussion of environmental and labor matters, reference is made to the information contained in Note 13
“Commitments and Contingencies” of the consolidated financial statements. For more information on tax matters, refer
to Note 7 “Income taxes” of the consolidated financial statements.
MINING RIGHTS AND CONCESSIONS
Peru:
We have 171,743 hectares in concessions from the Peruvian government for our exploration, exploitation, extraction and
production operations, at various sites, as follows:
    Toquepala    Cuajone    Ilo    Other    Total
 (hectares)
Plants   360  919  421  —  1,700
Operations   26,081 
21,555 
4,683  —  52,319
Projects and water resources  —  —  —  35,590  35,590
Exploration   —  —  —  82,134  82,134
Total   26,441  
22,474  
5,104  117,724  171,743
We believe that our Peruvian concessions are in full force and effect under applicable Peruvian laws and as such, comply
with all material terms and requirements applicable to said concessions. The concessions have indefinite terms, subject
to our payment of concession fees of up to $3.00 per hectare annually for the mining concessions and a fee based on
nominal capacity for the processing concessions. Fees paid during 2021, 2020 and 2019, were approximately
$2.3 million, $1.4 million and $1.8 million, respectively. We have two types of mining concessions in Peru: metallic and
non-metallic concessions.
In 2011, the Peruvian Congress approved an amendment to the mining royalty charge. The new mining royalty charge is
based on operating income margins with graduated rates ranging from 1% to 12% of operating profits; the minimum
royalty charge is equivalent to 1% of net sales. If the operating income margin is 10% or less, the royalty charge is 1%
and for each 5% increment in the operating income margin, the royalty charge rate increases by 0.75%, up to a
maximum of 12%. In 2021, 2020 and 2019, we made provisions of $140.8 million, $60.6 million and $42.3 million,
respectively.
At the same time the Peruvian Congress amended the mining royalty charge, it enacted a new tax for the mining
industry. This tax is also based on operating income and its rates range from 2% to 8.4%. For additional information see
Note 7 “Income Taxes” to the consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
14Mexico:
In Mexico we have 493,533 hectares in concessions from the Mexican government for our exploration and exploitation
activities as outlined on the table below:
    IMMSA    La Caridad    Buenavista    Projects    Total
 (hectares)
Mine concessions   
176,643 103,820  93,706 119,364  493,533
We believe that our Mexican concessions are in full force and in effect under applicable Mexican laws and that we are in
compliance with all material terms and requirements applicable to these concessions. Under Mexican law, mineral
resources belong to the Mexican nation and a concession from the Mexican federal government is required to explore or
mine mineral reserves. Mining concessions have a 50-year term that can be renewed for another 50 years. Holding fees
for mining concessions can be from $0.39 to $8.67 per hectare depending on the start date of the mining concession.
Fees paid during 2021, 2020 and 2019 were approximately $7.7 million, $6.6 million and $7.1 million, respectively. In
addition, all of our operating units in Mexico have water concessions that are in full force and effect. Although
ownership is not required in order to explore or mine a concession, we generally own the land related to our Mexican
concessions. We also own all of the processing facilities of our Mexican operations and the land on which they are built.
In December 2013, the Mexican government enacted a new law which, among other things, established a mining royalty
charge of 7.5% on earnings before taxes as defined by Mexican tax regulations and an additional royalty charge of 0.5%
over gross income from sales of gold, silver and platinum. These charges were effective January 2014 and are deductible
for income tax purposes.
AVAILABLE INFORMATION
We file annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other information with the U.S. Securities and
Exchange Commission (“SEC”). You may read and copy any document we file at the SEC’s Public Reference Room at
100 F Street NE, Washington, D.C. 20549. The SEC maintains a website that contains annual, quarterly and current
reports, proxy statements and other information that issuers (including Southern Copper Corporation) file electronically
with the SEC. The SEC’s website is www.sec.gov.
Our website is www.southerncoppercorp.com. The first document on the list of materials available on this website is
Form 8-K, dated March 14, 2003. We offer, free of charge, downloads of our annual, quarterly and current reports, as
soon as they can be reasonably made available following electronic or physical filing with the SEC. Our website also
includes the Company’s Corporate Governance guidelines and the charters of our main Board Committees. However, the
information found on our website is not part of this or any other report.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
Forward-looking statements in this report and in other Company statements include information regarding expected
commencement dates of mining or metal production operations, projected quantities of future metal production,
anticipated production rates, operating efficiencies, costs and expenditures, including taxes, as well as projected demand
or supply for the Company’s products. Actual results could differ materially depending upon certain factors, including
the risks and uncertainties relating to general U.S. and international economic and political conditions, the cyclical and
volatile prices of copper, other commodities and supplies, including fuel and electricity, the availability of materials,
insurance coverage, equipment, required permits or approvals and financing, the occurrence of unusual weather or
operating conditions, lower than expected ore grades, water and geological problems, the failure of equipment or
processes to operate in accordance with specifications, failure to obtain financial assurance to meet closure and
remediation obligations, labor relations, litigation and environmental risks, as well as political and economic risk
associated with foreign operations. Results of operations are directly affected by metal prices on commodity exchanges,
which can be volatile.
Table of Contents
15CAUTIONARY NOTE REGARDING DISCLOSURE OF MINERAL PROPERTIES
Mineral Reserves and Resources
In our public filings in the U.S. and Peru and in certain other announcements not filed with the SEC, we disclose proven
and probable reserves and measured, indicated and inferred resources, each as defined in Item 1300 of Regulation S-K
(“S-K 1300”). The estimation of measured resources and indicated resources involve greater uncertainty as to their
existence and economic feasibility than the estimation of proven and probable reserves, and therefore investors are
cautioned not to assume that all or any part of measured or indicated resources will ever be converted into S-K 1300-
compliant reserves. The estimation of inferred resources involves far greater uncertainty as to their existence and
economic viability than the estimation of other categories of resources, and therefore it cannot be assumed that all or any
part of inferred resources will ever be upgraded to a higher category. Therefore, investors are cautioned not to assume
that all or any part of inferred resources exist, or that they can be mined legally or economically.
Technical Report Summaries and Qualified Persons
The scientific and technical information concerning our mineral projects in this Form 10-K have been reviewed and
approved by third-party “qualified persons” under S-K 1300. For a description of the key assumptions, parameters and
methods used to estimate mineral reserves and mineral resources included in this Form 10-K, as well as data verification
procedures and a general discussion of the extent to which the estimates may be affected by any known environmental,
permitting, legal, title, taxation, sociopolitical, marketing or other relevant factors, please review the Technical Report
Summaries for each of the Company’s material properties which are included as exhibits to, and incorporated by
reference into, this report.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Every investor or potential investor in Southern Copper Corporation should carefully consider the following risk factors.
Financial risks
Our financial performance is highly dependent on the price of copper and the other metals we produce.
Our financial performance is significantly affected by the market prices of the metals that we produce, particularly the
market prices of copper, molybdenum, zinc and silver. Historically, these prices have been subject to wide fluctuations
and are affected by numerous and complex factors beyond our control, including international economic and political
conditions, international regulatory, trade and/or tax policies, including national tariffs, levels of supply and demand, the
availability and costs of substitutes, inventory levels maintained by users, actions of participants in the commodities
markets, interest rates, expectations regarding future inflation rates, currency exchange rates and changes in technology.
In addition, the market prices of copper and certain other metals have on occasion been subject to rapid short-term
changes. In 2020, the COVID-19 pandemic and consequent negative impact on the global economy created significant
volatility in the financial markets, including the copper market. At the start of the pandemic in 2020, copper prices were
initially impacted by economic uncertainty; however, in mid-2020, copper prices began to rise and reached a record high
during 2021, despite the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic. Volatility in global economic growth, particularly in developing
countries, has the potential to adversely affect future demand and prices for commodities. Geopolitical uncertainty and
protectionism have the potential to inhibit international trade and negatively impact business confidence, which creates
the risk of contraints on our ability to trade in certain markets and has the potential to increase price volatility.
In addition to the factors discussed above, copper prices may be affected by demand from China, which is currently
the largest consumer of refined copper in the world.
Over the last three years, approximately 81% of our revenues came from the sale of copper; 8% from molybdenum; 5%
from silver; and 3% from zinc. Please see the distribution of our revenues per product on Item 8 “Financial Statements
and Supplementary Data” Note 19 “Segment and Related Information—Sales value per segment”.
Table of Contents
16See also historical average price of our products on Item 1 Business caption “Metals prices”.
We cannot predict if metals prices will rise or fall in the future. Extended material future declines in metals prices,
particularly copper, could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations, financial condition and value of
our assets. Under very adverse market conditions, we might consider curtailing or modifying some of our mining and
processing operations. We may be unable to decrease our costs in an amount sufficient to offset reductions in revenues,
in which case, we may incur losses, and those losses may be material.
Declines in prices of metals we sell could also result in metals inventory adjustments and impairment charges for our
long-lived assets. Other events that could result in impairment of our long-lived assets include, but are not limited to,
decreases in estimated proven and probable mineral reserves and any event that might have a material adverse effect on
current and future expected mine production costs.
Volatility in metals prices may also impact the price of our outstanding securities.
Altough our results of operations and cash flow will reflect fluctuations in the prices of copper as well as other metals
we produce, short term volatility in the prices of such metals may result in significant changes in the price of our
securities. Such volatility in the price of our securities may not be reflective of our operating performance or financial
results.
Our business requires levels of capital investments that we may not be able to maintain.
Our business is capital intensive. Specifically, the exploration and exploitation of copper and other metal reserves,
mining, smelting and refining costs, the maintenance of machinery and equipment and compliance with laws and
regulations require significant capital investments. We must continue to invest capital to maintain or increase the amount
of copper reserves that we exploit and the amount of copper and other metals we produce. We cannot assure you that we
will be able to maintain our production at levels that generate sufficient cash, or that we will have access to sufficient
financing to continue our exploration, exploitation and refining activities at or above present levels.
Restrictive covenants in the agreements governing our indebtedness and the indebtedness of our Minera Mexico
subsidiary may restrict our ability to pursue our business strategies.
Our financing instruments and those of our Minera Mexico subsidiary include financial and other restrictive covenants
that, among other things, limit our and Minera Mexico’s abilities to incur additional debt and sell assets. If either we or
our Minera Mexico subsidiary fails to comply with these obligations, we could be in default under the applicable
agreements. This situation, if not addressed or waived, could require immediate repayment of debt obligations. Our
Minera Mexico subsidiary is further limited by the terms of its outstanding notes, which also restrict the Company’s
applicable incurrence of debt and liens. In addition, future credit facilities may contain limitations on our capacity to
incur additional debt and liens; dispose of assets; or pay dividends to our common stockholders.
We may not pay a significant amount of our net income as cash dividends on our common stock in the future.
We have distributed a significant amount of our net income as dividends since 1996. Our dividend practice is subject to
change at the discretion of our Board of Directors at any time. The amount that we pay in dividends is subject to a
number of factors, including the results of our operations; our financial condition; cash requirements; tax considerations;
future prospects; legal restrictions; contractual restrictions in credit agreements; limitations imposed by the government
of Peru, Mexico or other countries where we have significant operations; and other factors that our Board of Directors
may deem relevant. Depending on our capital investment program and global economic conditions, it is possible that
future dividend distributions will fall below levels seen in recent years.
Our ability to recognize the benefits of deferred tax assets is dependent on future cash flows and taxable income.
Through 2021, the Company recognized the expected future tax benefit from deferred tax assets when the tax benefit
was considered more likely than not to be realized. Assessing the recoverability of deferred tax assets requires
management to make significant estimates related to expectations of future taxable income and existing tax laws. There
Table of Contents
17can be no assurance that the Company will be able to recognize the expected future benefits of deferred tax assets; this
inability could have a material adverse effect on the Company’s results of operations.
Operational risks
Our actual reserves may not conform to our current estimates of our ore deposits and our long-term viability depends
on our ability to replenish mineral reserves.
There is a degree of uncertainty attributable to the estimation of reserves. Until reserves are actually mined and
processed, the quantity of ore and grades must be considered as estimates only. The proven and probable mineral
reserves data included in this report are estimates prepared by us based on evaluation methods generally used in the
mining industry. We may be required in the future to revise our reserves estimates based on our actual production. We
cannot assure you that our actual reserves conform to geological, metallurgical or other expectations or that the
estimated volume and grade of ore will be recovered. Market prices of our metals, increased production costs, reduced
recovery rates, short-term operating factors, royalty charges and other factors may render proven and probable reserves
uneconomic to exploit and may result in revisions of reserves data from time to time. Reserves data may not be
indicative of future results of operations. Our reserves are depleted as we mine. We depend on our ability to replenish
our mineral reserves for our long-term viability. We use several strategies to replenish and increase our mineral reserves,
including exploration and investment in properties located near our existing mine sites and investing in technology that
could extend the life of a mine by allowing us to cost-effectively process ore types that were previously considered
uneconomic. Acquisitions may also contribute to increasing mineral reserves and we review potential acquisition
opportunities on a regular basis. However, we cannot assure you that we will be able to continue with our strategy to
replenish reserves indefinitely.
Our operations are subject to risks, some of which are not insurable.
The business of mining, smelting and refining copper, zinc and other metals is subject to a number of risks and hazards,
including industrial accidents, labor disputes, unusual or unexpected geological conditions, changes in the regulatory
environment, environmental hazards, weather and other natural phenomena, such as seismic activity, wall failures and
rock slides in our open-pit mines, structural collapses of our underground mines or tailings impoundments, and lower
than expected ore grades or recovery rates. The Company’s operations may also be affected by mudslides and flash
floods caused by torrential rains.
Such occurrences could result in damage to, or destruction of, mining operations resulting in monetary losses and
possible legal liability. In particular, surface and underground mining and related processing activities present inherent
risks of injury to personnel, loss of life and damage to equipment.
The waste rock and tailings produced in our mining operations represent our largest volume of waste material. Managing
the volume of waste rock and tailings presents significant environmental, safety and engineering challenges and risks.
We maintain large tailings impoundments containing sand of ground rock, moistened with water, which are effectively
large dams that must be engineered, built and monitored to assure structural stability and avoid leakages or structural
collapse. Defects, errors and failures at tailings dams and in other impoundments at any of our mining operations could
cause severe property and environmental damage and loss of life. The importance of careful design, management and
monitoring of large impoundments was emphasized in recent years by large scale tailings dam failures at unaffiliated
mines, which caused extensive property and environmental damage and resulted in the loss of life. For more information
regarding our tailing dams, please see Item 2 “Properties—Slope Stability—Tailing Dams.”
We maintain insurance against many of these and other risks, which under certain circumstances may not provide
adequate coverage. Insurance against certain risks, including certain liabilities for environmental damage or hazards as a
result of exploration and production, is not generally available to us or other companies within the mining industry.
Nevertheless, recent environmental legal initiatives contemplate requirements for environmental damage insurance. If
these regulations come into force, we will have to analyze the need to obtain said insurance. We do not have, and do not
intend to obtain, political risk insurance. We cannot assure you that these and other uninsured events will not have an
adverse effect on our business, properties, operating results, financial condition or prospects.
Table of Contents
18Changes in the demand level for our products and copper sales agreements could adversely affect our revenues.
Our financial results may be affected by fluctuations in demand for the refined, semi-refined metal products and
concentrates we sell at both the industrial and consumer level, and may also be affected by changes in the global
economy, including economic upturns and downturns of differing magnitudes. Changes in technology, industrial
processes, concerns over weaknesses in the global economy and consumer habits may affect the level of demand to the
extent that those increase or decrease the need for our metal products. Our revenues may also be adversely affected by
events of force majeure that could have a negative impact on our sales agreements. These events include acts of nature,
labor strikes, fires, floods, wars, transportation delays, government actions or other events that are beyond the control of
the parties to the agreement.
Interruptions of energy supply or increases in energy, fuel and gas costs, shortages of water supply, critical parts,
equipment, skilled labor and other production costs may adversely affect our results of operations.
We require substantial amounts of fuel oil, electricity, water and other resources for our operations. Fuel, gas and power
costs constituted approximately 31% of our total production cost in 2021, and 28% in 2020 and 2019. We rely upon third
parties for our supply of the energy resources consumed in our operations so that prices for and availability of energy
resources may be subject to change or curtailment due to, among other things, new laws or regulations; imposition of
new taxes or tariffs; interruptions in production by suppliers; and variations in global prices or market conditions.
Regarding water consumption, although each of our operations currently has sufficient water supplies to cover its
operational demands, the loss of some or all water rights for any of our mines or operations, in whole or in part,
shortages relative to the water to which we have rights or a lack of additional back-up water supplies at acceptable cost,
or at all, could require us to curtail or shut down mining production and could prevent us from pursuing expansion
opportunities, thereby increasing and/or accelerating costs or foregoing profitable operations. In addition, future
shortages of critical parts, equipment and skilled labor could adversely affect our operations and development projects.
Potential delays in transportation of products to customers and possible shortages of critical parts, equipment, and
other resources may adversely affect our results of operations.
Current challenges in the global shipping industry have led to congestion in ports, a shortage in containers, and a lack of
space on ships. Because of this situation, the Company faces a risk of potential supply chain disruptions that may
adversely affect our operations and development projects. To address this potential issue, we have increased our safety
stock levels and adjusted our replacement algorithms. Additionally, our revenues and collections may also be adversely
affected by significant increases in the cost of transportation, as a result of increases in fuel or labor costs, higher
demand for logistics services, or otherwise, and transportation delays that could have a negative impact on our sales
agreements and customer relationships. Although the recovery of the global economy is causing the aforementioned
issues at ports and in the shipping industry, this situation is expected to be resolved gradually and to return to normal
levels in the short term. However, if these issues continue for a longer period, our supply chain and our sales flow could
be adversely impacted.
Our Company is subject to health and safety laws that may restrict our operations, result in operational delays or
increase our operating costs and adversely affect our financial results of operations.
We are required to comply with occupational health and safety laws and regulations in Peru and Mexico where our
operations are subject to periodic inspections by the relevant governmental authorities. These laws and regulations
govern, among others, health and safety workplace conditions, including high risk labor and the handling, storage and
disposal of chemical and other hazardous substances. We believe our operations comply in all material respects with
applicable health and safety laws and regulations in the countries in which we operate. Compliance with these laws and
regulations and with new or existing regulations that may be applicable to us in the future could increase our operating
costs and adversely affect our financial results of operations and cash flows.
Our objective is to preserve the health and safety of our workforce by implementing occupational health and training
programs and safety incentives at our operations that meet all regulatory requirements and enhance employee
performance. Despite the Company’s efforts, we are not exempt from accidents. These are reported to Mexican and
Table of Contents
19Peruvian authorities as required. Regarding non-fatal accidents, in the last three years, the Company’s Dart rate (rate to
measure workplace injuries severe enough to warrant Day Away from work, job Restrictions and/or job Transfers) was
much lower than the MSHA Dart rate (the MSHA Dart rate is published by the U.S.’s Mine Safety and Health
Administration, and is used as an industry benchmark).
In 2020, we did not have fatalities; but unfortunately in 2021 and 2019 we had three and four fatalities, respectively, in
Mexico and Peru. The amounts paid to the Mexican and Peruvian authorities for reportable accidents had no adverse
effects on our results. Under Mexican and Peruvian law penalties and fines for safety violations are generally monetary,
but in certain cases may lead to the temporary or permanent shutdown of the affected facility or the suspension or
revocation of permits or licenses. Additionally, violations of security and safety laws and regulations at our Peruvian
operations can be considered criminal and punishable by a sentence of up to 10 years of prison.
Our metals exploration efforts are highly speculative in nature and may be unsuccessful.
Metals exploration is highly speculative in nature. It involves many risks and is frequently unsuccessful. Once
mineralization is discovered, it may take a number of years from the initial phases of drilling until production is possible,
during which time the economic feasibility of production may change. Substantial expenditures must be made to
determine proven and probable mineral reserves; this requires drilling to establish the metallurgical processes that will
be needed to extract the metals from the ore and, in the case of new properties, to construct mining and processing
facilities. We cannot assure you that our exploration programs will result in expansion or replacement of current
production with new proven and probable mineral reserves.
Development projects have no operating history upon which we can base estimates of proven and probable mineral
reserves and estimates of future cash operating costs. Estimates are, to a large extent, based upon the interpretation of
geological data obtained from drill holes and other sampling techniques and on pre-feasibility or feasibility studies that
generate estimates of cash operating costs based upon anticipated tonnage and grades of ore to be mined and processed;
the configuration of the ore body; expected recovery rates of the mineral from the ore; comparable facility and
equipment operating costs; anticipated climatic conditions; and other factors. As a result, actual cash operating costs and
economic returns based upon development of proven and probable mineral reserves may differ significantly from those
originally estimated. Moreover, significant decreases in actual or expected prices may mean reserves, once found, will
be uneconomical to produce.
We may be adversely affected by challenges relating to slope stability.
Our open-pit mines get deeper as we mine them, presenting certain geotechnical challenges including the possibility of
slope failure. If we are required to decrease pit slope angles or provide additional road access to prevent such a failure,
our stated reserves could be negatively affected. Furthermore, hydrological conditions relating to pit slopes, renewal of
material displaced by slope failures and increased stripping requirements could also negatively affect our stated reserves.
We take actions in order to maintain slope stability, but we cannot assure you that we will not have to take additional
action in the future or that our actions taken to date will be sufficient. Unexpected slope failures, or additional
requirements to prevent slope failures, may negatively affect our results of operations and financial condition and may
diminish our stated mineral reserves.
We may be adversely affected by labor disputes.
In the last several years we have experienced a number of strikes or other labor disruptions that have had an adverse
impact on our operations and operating results. As of December 31, 2021, unions represented approximately 73.0% of
our workforce in Peru and 72.7% in Mexico. Currently, we have labor agreements in effect for our Mexican and
Peruvian operations.
Our Taxco mine in Mexico has been on strike since July 2007. It is expected that operations at this mine will remain
suspended until these labor issues are resolved. In addition, workers at the San Martin mine were on strike from
July 2007 to August 2018. After eleven years of an illegal stoppage, we resumed control of the San Martin mine in
August 2018. The San Martin facilities deteriorated during this period and we undertook a major renovation in order to
Table of Contents
20restart operations during the second quarter of 2019, with an estimated capital budget of $97.7 million. For additional
information, see Item 2, “Properties—Mexican IMMSA Unit—San Martin and Taxco”, and Note 13, “Commitments and
Contingencies—Labor matters”, to the consolidated financial statements.
We cannot assure you when the pending strike will be settled, or that in the future we will not experience strikes or other
labor related work stoppages that could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition and results of
operations.
Our mining or metal production projects may be subject to additional costs due to community actions and other
factors.
In recent years, worldwide mining activity has been pressured by neighboring communities for financial commitments to
fund social benefit programs and infrastructure improvements. Our projects in Peru are not exempt from these pressures.
Our Tia Maria project in Peru has experienced delays while trying to resolve issues with community groups.
It appears that in the Peruvian mining environment, it is becoming increasingly important to obtain acceptance from
local communities for projects in their areas. This may entail demands for substantial investments in community
infrastructure and upgrades that must be met in order to proceed with the mining projects.
We are confident that we will move forward with the Tia Maria project. However, we cannot assure you when and that
we will incur no additional costs for community infrastructure and upgrades to obtain approval from the communities for
current or future mining projects.
In addition, a number of collective action lawsuits and civil action lawsuits have been filed against the Company in
Mexico through both federal courts and state courts in Sonora. A number of constitutional lawsuits have also been filed
against various government authorities and against the Company. These lawsuits are seeking damages and demand
remediation actions to restore the environment. The Company believes that it is not possible to determine the extent of
the damages sought and believes the lawsuits are without merit. However, the Company cannot offer any assurances that
the outcome of these lawsuits will not have adverse effects on the Company.
Environmental regulation, climate change and other regulations may increase our costs of doing business, restrict
our operations or result in operational delays.
Our exploration, mining, milling, smelting and refining activities are subject to a number of Peruvian and Mexican laws
and regulations, including environmental laws and regulations, and certain industry technical standards. Additional
matters subject to regulation include, but are not limited to, concession fees, transportation, production, water use and
discharge, power use and generation, use and storage of explosives, surface rights, housing and other facilities for
workers, reclamation, taxation, labor standards, mine safety and occupational health. As the world and the countries in
which we operate become more conscious of the importance of environmental aspects, we expect additional
environmental laws and regulations will be enacted over time.
Please refer to Note 13 “Commitments and Contingencies—Environmental matters” of our financial statements for
further information on this subject.
The potential physical impacts of climate change on our operations are highly uncertain and depend on the geographic
location of our facilities. These may include changes in rainfall patterns, water shortages, changes in sea levels, storm
patterns and intensities, and temperatures. These effects may adversely impact the cost, production and financial
performance of our operations. In addition, substantial weather-related conditions could impact our relationships and
arrangements with our major customers and suppliers by materially affecting the normal flow of our transactions,
especially seaborne transactions. For example, severe weather events could damage transportation infrastructures and
lead to interruptions or delays in the supply of key inputs and raw materials or sold products.
Table of Contents
21We monitor fluctuations in weather patterns in the areas where we operate. Aligned with government efforts, we are
working to measure our carbon footprint to reduce the contributions to greenhouse gas emissions of our operations. We
also evaluate our water demand, as weather changes may result in increases or decreases that affect our needs.
Efforts to comply with more stringent environmental protection programs in Peru and Mexico and with relevant trade
agreements could impose constraints on operations and imply additional costs. Consequently, we may need to make
significant investments in this regard in the future. We cannot assure you that current or future legislative, regulatory or
trade developments will not have adverse effects on our business, properties, operating results, financial condition or
prospects.
Our mining and metal production projects may expose us to new risks.
Our Company is in the midst of a large expansion program, which may expose us to additional risks in terms of
industrial accidents. While we believe our contractors employ safety standards and other procedures to ensure these
projects are completed with proper governance, it is possible that increased activity at our sites could cause
environmental accidents or endanger human life.
Our business depends upon information technology systems that may be adversely affected by disruptions, damage,
cyber-attacks, failure and risks associated with implementation and integration.
Our operations depend upon information technology systems that may be subject to disruption, damage or failure from
different sources, including, without limitation, installation of malicious software, computer viruses, security breaches,
cyber-attacks and defects in design. In recent years, cybersecurity incidents have increased in frequency and include, but
are not limited to, malicious software, attempts to gain unauthorized access to data and other electronic security breaches
that could lead to disruptions in systems, unauthorized release of confidential or otherwise protected information and the
corruption of data.
On March 1, 2021, we experienced a Ransomware cyber-attack, which was operated by humans. Due to the quick
response of our IT team, our Enterprise Resource Planning software was not affected by the attack and we completely
restored the 420 affected servers. In addition, the forensic investigation did not identify any concrete evidence of
information stolen during the attack. For further information on this incident, refer to “Cybersecurity” under Item 7
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations”.
Given the unpredictability of the timing, nature and scope of information technology disruptions, we could potentially be
subject to manipulation or improper use of our systems and networks, operational delays, situations that compromise
confidential or otherwise protected information, destruction or corruption of data, security breaches, or financial losses
from remedial actions, any of which could have a material adverse effect on the cash flows, competitive position,
financial condition or results of our operations.
Table of Contents
22Other risks
Applicable law restricts the payment of dividends from our Minera Mexico subsidiary to us.
Our subsidiary, Minera Mexico, is a Mexican company and, as such, may pay dividends only out of net income that has
been approved by shareholders. Shareholders must also approve the actual dividend payment, after mandatory legal
reserves have been created and losses for prior fiscal years have been satisfied. These legal constraints may limit the
ability of Minera Mexico to pay dividends to us, which in turn, may have an impact on our ability to pay stockholder
dividends or to service debt.
Global and local market conditions, including the high competitiveness in the copper mining industry, may adversely
affect our profitability.
Our industry is cyclical in nature and fluctuates with economic cycles. Therefore, we are subject to the risks arising from
adverse changes in domestic and global economic and political conditions, such as lower levels of consumer and
corporate confidence, lower business investment, higher unemployment, reduced income and asset values in many areas,
currency volatility and limited availability of credit and access to capital. Additionally, we face competition from other
copper mining and producing companies around the world. Along these lines, significant competition exists to acquire
properties that produce or are capable of producing copper and other metals, and some of our main competitors have
consolidated, which makes them more diversified than we are.
We cannot assure you that changes in market conditions, including competition, will not adversely affect our ability to
compete in the future on the basis of price or other factors with companies that may benefit from future favorable trading
or other arrangements.
We are controlled by Grupo Mexico, which exercises control over our affairs and policies and whose interests may be
different from yours.
At December 31, 2021, Grupo Mexico owned indirectly 88.9% of our capital stock. Some of our officers and directors,
and those of Minera Mexico, are also directors and/or officers of Grupo Mexico and/or of its affiliates. We cannot assure
you that the interests of Grupo Mexico will not conflict with those of our minority stockholders.
Grupo Mexico has the ability to determine the outcome of substantially all matters submitted for a vote to our
stockholders and thus exercises control over our business policies and affairs, including the following:
●the composition of our Board of Directors and, as a result, any determinations of our Board with respect to our
business direction and policy, including the appointment and removal of our officers;
●determinations with respect to mergers and other business combinations, including those that may result in a change
of control;
●whether dividends are paid or other distributions are made and the amount of any dividends or other distributions;
●sales and dispositions of our assets;
●the amount of debt financing that we incur; and
●the approval of capital projects.
We cannot assure you that an increase in the financial obligations of Grupo Mexico or AMC, which may be attributable
to financing or to other reasons, will not result in a scenario in which our parent corporations obtain loans, increase
dividends or receive other funding from us.
In addition, we have in the past engaged in, and expect to continue engaging in, transactions with Grupo Mexico and its
other affiliates that are related party transactions and may present conflicts of interest. For additional information
regarding the share ownership of, and our relationships with, Grupo Mexico and its affiliates, see Note 18 “Related Party
Transactions” to the consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
23Unanticipated litigation or negative developments in pending litigation or with respect to other contingencies may
adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations.
We are currently, and may in the future become, subject to litigation, arbitration or other legal proceedings with other
parties. If rulings are against the Company, these legal proceedings, or others that could be brought against us in the
future, may adversely affect our financial position or prospects. For further detailed discussion of pending litigation,
please see Note 13 “Commitment and Contingencies—Litigation matters” of the consolidated financial statements.
Developments in the United States, Europe and emerging market countries may adversely affect the Company
business, our common stock price and our debt securities.
The business and market value of securities of companies with significant operations in Peru and Mexico is, to varying
degrees, affected by the economic policies and market conditions in the United States, Europe and emerging market
countries. Although economic policies and conditions in these countries may significantly differ from policies and
conditions in Peru or Mexico, the business community’s reactions to developments in any of these countries may
adversely affect the Company’s business or the market value or trading price of securities, including debt securities, of
issuers that have significant operations in Peru or Mexico.
In addition, in recent years economic conditions in Mexico have shown increased correlation to U.S. economic
conditions. Therefore, changes in economic policies and conditions in the United States could also have a significant
adverse effect on Mexican economic conditions, affecting our business, the price of our common stock or debt securities.
In 2017, the United States, Canada and Mexico began a discussion to update the North American Free Trade Agreement
(“NAFTA”). In September 2018, the three countries reached an agreement on a new trade deal, which will be known as
the United States—Mexico—Canada Agreement (“USMCA”). In June 2019, Mexico’s senate ratified the UMSCA. In
December 2019, the three countries agreed to a new review of its regional trade pact, also concluding that the USMCA
would replace NAFTA. On January 29, 2020, the U.S. ratified the USMCA and its President signed the USMCA into
law. On July 1, 2020, the USMCA came into effect.
Although recent developments in the U.S. have reduced political instability, lifted consumer confidence and boosted the
U.S. stock market, it is unclear whether the U.S. government will enact new policies towards China, that will reduce or
eliminate trade tensions between the two countries. Despite being the epicenter of the COVID-19 pandemic, China
began 2021 with a relatively optimistic economic growth outlook and represents approximately 50% of the world’s
copper demand. A slowing in China’s economic growth, coupled with continued trade tensions with the U.S. could result
in lower copper prices which could have a material adverse impact on our business and results of operations. The
adoption and expansion of trade restrictions; changes in the current U.S.-China relations, including on-going trade
tensions; or other governmental action related to taxes, tariffs, trade agreements or other policies are difficult to predict,
and could adversely affect the demand for our products, our costs, our customers, our suppliers and the U.S. economy,
and consequently could have a material adverse effect on our cash flows, competitive position, financial condition or
results of operations.
Additionally, the United Kingdom left the European Union in December 2020 after an 11-month transition period that
started in January. Brexit may adversely affect global political, regulatory, economic and market conditions, including
the capital markets and foreign exchange markets, which could adversely affect our business, financial condition and
results of operations.
We cannot assure you that the market value or trading prices of our common stock and debt securities, will not be
adversely affected by events in the United States or elsewhere, including emerging market countries.
Other international risks
We are a company with substantial assets located outside of the United States. We conduct production operations in Peru
and Mexico and exploration activities in these countries as well as in Chile, Argentina and Ecuador. Accordingly, in
addition to the usual risks associated with conducting business in foreign countries, our business may be adversely
affected by political, economic and social uncertainties in each of these countries. Such risks include possible
Table of Contents
24expropriation or nationalization of property, confiscatory taxes or royalties, possible foreign exchange controls, changes
in the national policy toward foreign investors, extreme environmental standards, etc.
Our international operations must comply with the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and similar anti-corruption and
anti-bribery laws in the other jurisdictions in which we operate. There has been a substantial increase in global
enforcement of these laws in recent years. As such, our corporate policies and processes may not prevent or detect all
potential breaches of law. Any violation of those laws could result in significant criminal or civil fines and penalties,
litigation, and loss of operating licenses or permits, and may damage our reputation, which could have a material adverse
effect on our cash flows, results of operations and financial condition.
Our insurance does not cover most losses caused by the aforementioned risks. Consequently, our production,
development and exploration activities in these countries could be substantially affected by factors out of our control,
some of which could materially and adversely affect our financial position or results of operations.
We may be adversely affected by natural disasters, pandemics (including the recent coronavirus outbreak) and other
catastrophic events, and by man-made problems such as terrorism, which could disrupt our business operations and
our business continuity; additionally, disaster recovery plans may not adequately protect us from a serious disaster.
Natural disasters, adverse weather conditions, floods, pandemics (including the recent coronavirus outbreak), acts of
terrorism and other catastrophic or geo-political events may cause damage or disruption at our operations and in
international commerce as well as the global economy, and could have an adverse effect on our business, operating
results, and financial condition.
Our results of operations may be materially adversely impacted by the ongoing coronavirus pandemic (COVID-19).
The global spread of the coronavirus (COVID-19) has created significant volatility, uncertainty and economic disruption.
Since the outbreak of COVID-19 emerged in early 2020, it has quickly spread across the world.
The ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, coupled with the possibility that other pandemics may potentially arise in the future,
represent significant risks for the Company, which include but are not limited to the following:
a) supply chain disruptions that make it difficult for the Company to order and receive the materials needed to produce
its products and ship finished products to our end customers,
b) financial risks pertaining to receivables due to the possibility of customers becoming insolvent or otherwise unable to
meet their financial obligations,
c) government restrictions, including mandates requiring shutdowns or restricting imports of raw materials or the
exporting of finished goods; prohibiting the Company’s products from being sold in their countries, and other seen and
unforeseen actions taken by governmental authorities,
d) employee absenteeism or the loss of employees due to health reasons, government restrictions or early retirement, at
our Company, or at our affiliated companies, which are required to develop, validate, manufacture and perform other
necessary functions for our operations,
e) equipment failures due to maintenance delays, loss of utilities and other disruptions that could impact our operations
or render them inoperable,
f) litigation or government actions against the Company,
g) a local or global recession or depression that could harm the international banking system, limiting demand for all
products, including those made by the Company,
h) disruption of banking and financial institutions, which may limit access to loans, and
i) many other seen and unforeseen events and circumstances, all of which could negatively impact the Company.
Table of Contents
25Risks Associated with Doing Business in Peru and Mexico
There is uncertainty as to the termination and renewal of our mining concessions.
Under the laws of Peru and Mexico, mineral resources belong to the state and government and concessions are required
in both countries to explore for or exploit mineral reserves. In Peru, our mineral rights derive from concessions from
Ministry of Energy and Mines (“MINEM”) for our exploration, exploitation, extraction and/or production operations. In
Mexico, our mineral rights derive from concessions granted, on a discretionary basis, by the Ministry of Economy,
pursuant to Mexican mining law and regulations thereunder.
Mining concessions in both Peru and Mexico may be terminated if the obligations of the concessioner are not satisfied.
In Peru, we are obligated to pay certain fees for our mining concession. In Mexico, we are obligated, among other
things, to explore or exploit the relevant concession, to pay any relevant fees, to comply with all environmental and
safety standards, to provide information to the Ministry of Economy and to allow inspections by the Ministry of
Economy. Any termination or unfavorable modification of the terms of one or more of our concessions, or failure to
obtain renewals of such concessions subject to renewal or extensions, could have a material adverse effect on our
financial condition and prospects.
Peruvian economic and political conditions may have an adverse impact on our business.
A significant portion of our operations is conducted in Peru. Accordingly, our business, financial condition or results of
operations could be affected by changes in the political, regulatory or economic developments in the country and
changes in the economic or other policies of the Peruvian government. Over the past several decades, Peru has had a
succession of regimes with differing political agendas and policies. In the twentieth century, past governments have
frequently intervened in the nation’s economy and social structure. Among other actions, past governments have
imposed controls on prices, exchange rates and local and foreign investments; placed limitations on imports; restricted
companies’ abilities to dismiss employees and have prohibited the remittance of profits to foreign investors.
Between 2019 and 2021, Peru experienced heightened political instability in a context marked by ongoing investigations
into allegations of corruption and confrontation on the political front. Significant political turmoil in Peru led to a
shutdown of the Peruvian Congress and the removal of two Peruvian presidents.
Because we have significant operations in Peru, we cannot provide any assurance that political developments and
economic conditions, including any changes to economic policies or the adoption of other reforms proposed by existing
or future administrations in Peru and/or other factors will have no material adverse effects on market conditions, the
prices of our securities, our ability to obtain financing, our results of operations, or our financial condition.
Mexican economic and political conditions, as well as drug-related violence, may have an adverse impact on our
business.
The Mexican economy is highly sensitive to economic developments in the United States, mainly because of its high
level of exports to this market. Other risks in Mexico are increases in taxes on the mining sector and higher royalties,
such as those enacted in 2013. As has occurred in other metal producing countries, the mining industry may be perceived
as a source of additional fiscal revenue.
In addition, public safety organizations in Mexico are under significant stress, as a result of drug-related violence. This
situation creates potential risks, particularly for transportation of minerals and finished products, which may affect a
small portion of our production. Drug-related violence has had a limited impact on our operations, as it has tended to
concentrate outside of our areas of production. The potential risks to our operations might increase if the violence
spreads to our areas of production.
Because we have significant operations in Mexico, we cannot provide any assurance that political developments and
economic conditions, including any changes to economic policies or the adoption of other reforms proposed by existing
or future administrations in Mexico, or the advent of drug-related violence in the country, will have no material adverse
Table of Contents
26effect on market conditions, the prices of our securities, our ability to obtain financing, our results of operations or our
financial condition.
Peruvian inflation and fluctuations in the sol exchange rate may adversely affect our financial condition and results
of operations.
Although the U.S. dollar is our functional currency and our revenues are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars, as we
operate in Peru, portions of our operating costs are denominated in Peruvian soles. Accordingly, when inflation or
deflation in Peru is not offset by a change in the exchange rate of the sol, our financial position, results of operations,
cash flows and the market price of our common stock could be affected.
Inflation in Peru in 2021, 2020 and 2019 was 6.4%, 2.0% and 1.9%, respectively. The value of the sol depreciated
against the U.S. dollar 10.3% and 9.3% in 2021 and 2020, respectively, but it appreciated 1.8% in 2019. Although the
Peruvian government’s economic policy reduced inflation and the economy has experienced significant growth in the
past decade, we cannot assure you that inflation will not increase from its current level or that such economic growth
will continue in the future at similar rates or at all. Additionally, a global financial economic crisis could negatively
affect the Peruvian economy.
To manage the volatility related to the risk of currency rate fluctuations, we may enter into forward exchange contracts.
We cannot assure you, however, that currency fluctuations will not have an impact on our financial condition and results
of operations.
Mexican inflation, restrictive exchange control policies and fluctuations in the peso exchange rate may adversely
affect our financial condition and results of operations.
Although all of our Mexican operations’ sales of metals are priced and invoiced in U.S. dollars, a substantial portion of
its costs are denominated in pesos. Accordingly, when inflation in Mexico increases without a corresponding
depreciation of the peso, the net income generated by our Mexican operations is adversely affected.
Inflation in Mexico was 7.4% in 2021, 3.2% in 2020 and 2.8% in 2019. The value of the peso depreciated against the
U.S. dollar 3.2% and 5.9% in 2021 and 2020, respectively, but it appreciated 4.3% in 2019. The peso has been subject in
the past to significant volatility, which may not have been proportionate to the inflation rate and may not be
proportionate to the inflation rate in the future.
Currently, the Mexican government does not restrict the ability of Mexican companies or individuals to convert pesos
into dollars or other currencies. While we do not expect the Mexican government to impose any restrictions or exchange
control policies in the future, it is an area we closely monitor. We cannot assure you the Mexican government will
maintain its current policies with regard to the peso or that the peso’s value will not fluctuate significantly in the future.
The imposition of exchange control policies could impair Minera Mexico’s ability to obtain imported goods and to meet
its U.S. dollar-denominated obligations and could have an adverse effect on our business and financial condition.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
Table of Contents
27ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
SUMMARY DISCLOSURE
The following maps show the locations of our principal mines, smelting facilities, refineries and projects. We operate
open-pit copper mines in the southern part of Peru—at Toquepala and Cuajone—and in Mexico, at La Caridad and
Buenavista. We also own five underground mines, three out of which currently produce zinc, copper, silver and gold.
The below description of the Company’s mining operations is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Technical
Report Summaries included as exhibits to this report and incorporated by reference into this Item 2.  
 
EXTRACTION, SMELTING AND REFINING PROCESSES
Our operations include open-pit and underground mining, concentrating, copper smelting, copper refining, copper rod
production, solvent extraction/electrowinning (“SX-EW”), zinc refining, sulfuric acid production, molybdenum
concentrate production and silver and gold refining. The extraction and production process are summarized below.
OPEN-PIT MINING
In an open-pit mine, the production process begins at the mine pit, where waste rock, leaching ore and copper ore are
drilled and blasted and then loaded onto diesel-electric trucks by electric shovels. Waste is hauled to dump areas and
leaching ore is hauled to leaching dumps. The ore to be milled is transported to the primary crushers.
UNDERGROUND MINING
In an underground mine, the production process begins at the stopes, where copper, zinc and lead veins are drilled and
blasted and the ore is hauled to the underground crusher station. The crushed ore is then hoisted to the surface for
processing.
CONCENTRATING
The copper ore above an established cut-off from the primary crusher or the copper, zinc and lead-bearing ore from the
underground mines is transported to a concentrator plant where gyratory crushers break the ore into sizes no larger than
three-quarter of an inch. The ore is then sent to a mill section where it is ground to the consistency of fine powder. The
finely ground ore is mixed with water and chemical reagents and pumped as a slurry to the flotation separator, where it is
mixed with certain chemicals. In the flotation separator, reagent solutions and air pumped into the flotation cells cause
the minerals to separate from the waste rock and bubble to the surface where they are collected and dried.
If the bulk concentrated copper contains molybdenum, it is first processed in a molybdenum plant as described below
under “Molybdenum Production.” In addition, some of the concentrates contain economic amounts of gold and silver
that are recovered in the smelters and refineries.

Table of Contents
28COPPER SMELTING
Copper concentrates are transported to a smelter, where they are smelted using a furnace, converter and anode furnace to
produce either blister copper (which is in the form of cakes with air pockets) or copper anodes (which are cleaned of air
pockets). At the smelter, the concentrates are mixed with flux (a chemical substance intentionally included for high
temperature processing) and then sent to reverberatory furnaces producing copper matte and slag (a mixture of iron and
other impurities). Copper matte contains approximately 65% copper. Copper matte is then sent to the converters, where
the material is oxidized in two steps: (i) the iron sulfides in the matte are oxidized with silica, producing slag that is
returned to the reverberatory furnaces, and (ii) the copper contained in the matte sulfides is then oxidized to produce
copper that, after casting, is called blister copper, containing approximately 98% to 99% copper, or anodes, containing
approximately 99.7% copper. Most of the blister and anode production is sent to the refinery and the remainder is sold to
customers.
COPPER REFINING
Anodes are suspended in tanks with a solution containing water, sulfuric acid and copper sulfate. A weak electrical
current is passed through the anodes and chemical solution and the dissolved copper is deposited on very thin starting
sheets to produce copper cathodes containing approximately 99.99% copper. During this process, silver, gold and other
metals (for example, palladium, platinum and selenium), along with other impurities, settle on the bottom of the tank
(anodic muds). This anodic mud is processed at a precious metal plant where selenium, silver and gold are recovered.
COPPER ROD PLANT
To produce copper rod, copper cathodes are first smelted in a furnace and then dosed in a casting machine. The dosed
copper is then extruded and passed through a cooling system that begins solidification of copper into a 60×50 millimeter
copper bar. The resulting copper bar is gradually stretched in a rolling mill to achieve the desired diameter. The rolled
bar is then cooled and sprayed with wax as a preservation agent and collected into a rod coil that is compacted and sent
to market.
SOLVENT EXTRACTION/ELECTROWINNING (“SX-EW”)
A complementary processing method is the leaching and SX-EW process. During the SX-EW process, low-grade
sulfides ore and copper oxides are leached with sulfuric acid to allow copper content recovery. The acid and copper
solution is then agitated with a solvent that contains chemical additives that attract copper ions. As the solvent is lighter
than water, it floats to the surface carrying with it the copper content. The solvent is then separated using an acid
solution, freeing the copper. The acid solution containing the copper is then moved to electrolytic extraction tanks to
produce copper cathodes.
MOLYBDENUM PRODUCTION
Molybdenum is recovered from copper-molybdenum concentrates produced at the concentrator. The copper-
molybdenum concentrate is first treated with a thickener until it becomes slurry with 60% solids. The slurry is then
agitated in a chemical and water solution and pumped to the flotation separator. The separator creates a froth that carries
molybdenum to the surface but not the copper mineral (which is later filtered to produce copper concentrates containing
approximately 27% copper). The molybdenum froth is skimmed off, filtered and dried to produce molybdenum
concentrates of approximately 58% contained molybdenum.
ZINC REFINING
Metallic zinc is produced through electrolysis using zinc concentrates and zinc oxides. Sulfur is eliminated from the
concentrates by roasting and the zinc oxide is dissolved in sulfuric acid solution to eliminate solid impurities. The
purified zinc sulfide solution is treated by electrolysis to produce refined zinc and to separate silver and gold, which are
recovered as concentrates.
Table of Contents
29SULFURIC ACID PRODUCTION
Sulfur dioxide gases are produced in the copper smelting and zinc roasting processes. As a part of our environmental
preservation program, we treat the sulfur dioxide emissions at two of our Mexican plants and at our Peruvian processing
facilities to produce sulfuric acid, some of which is, in turn, used for the copper leaching process; the balance is sold to
mining and fertilizer companies located mainly in Mexico, Peru, United States and Chile.
SILVER AND GOLD REFINING
Silver and gold are recovered from copper, zinc and lead concentrates in the smelters and refineries and from slimes
through electrolytic refining.
PRODUCTION OVERVIEW
The table below provides an overview of Southern Copper’s aggregate annual production for all of its properties during
each of the three most recently completed fiscal years:
 Variance
 Year Ended December 31,  2021 -2020  2020 -2019
    2021     2020     2019     Volume    %     Volume    %
COPPER (thousand pounds):                     
Mined   2,112,465  2,207,638  2,190,999  (95,173)  (4.3)%   16,639  0.8%
Smelted   1,319,619  1,397,291  1,312,131  (77,672)  (5.6)%   85,160  6.5%
Refined   1,401,719  1,491,908  1,412,329  (90,189)  (6.0)%   79,579  5.6%
Rod   330,961  285,363  314,661  45,598  16.0%   (29,298)  (9.3)%
SILVER (thousand ounces)        
Mined   18,962  21,540  20,273  (2,578)  (12.0)%   1,267  6.2%
Refined   13,691  13,888  12,588  (197)  (1.4)%   1,300  10.3%
MOLYBDENUM (thousand
pounds)         
Mined   66,716  66,687  59,272  29  0.0%   7,415  12.5%
ZINC (thousand pounds)                      
Mined   147,617  151,964  162,970  (4,347)  (2.9)%   (11,006)  (6.8)%
Refined   204,306  225,842  231,435  (21,536)  (9.5)%   (5,593)  (2.4)%
GOLD (ounces)
Mined  60,631  73,186  68,698  (12,555)  (17.2)%   4,488  6.5%
Refined  42,628  42,229  45,690  399  0.9%   (3,461)  (7.6)%
Table of Contents
30KEY PRODUCTION CAPACITY DATA
We own and operate all production facilities. The table below provides details on the locations of production facilities as
of December 31, 2021 by reportable segment, the processes used, and the key production and capacity data for each
location:
                2021     2021 Capacity  
Facility Name Location Stage Process Nominal Capacity(1) Production Use(4)  
PERUVIAN OPEN ‑PIT
SEGMENT  
Mining Operations            
Cuajone open ‑pit mine
 Cuajone (Peru) Production
 Copper ore milling and recovery ,
copper and molybdenum
concentrate production  90.0 ktpd—ore milled
  82.2  91.3 %
Toquepala open ‑pit mine;
Concentrator I
 Toquepala (Peru) Production
 Copper ore milling and recovery ,
copper and molybdenum
concentrate production  60.0 ktpd—ore milled
  62.5  104.2 %
Concentrator II   60.0 ktpd—ore milled  61.2  102.1 %  
Toquepala SX ‑EW plant
 Toquepala (Peru) Production
 Leaching, solvent extraction and
cathode electrowinning  56.3 ktpy—refined
  25.8  45.7 %
Processing Operations           
Ilo copper smelter
 Ilo (Peru) Production
 Copper smelting, blister , anodes
production  1,200.0 ktpy—concentrate feed
  1,089.2  90.8 %
Ilo copper refinery  Ilo (Peru) Production  Copper refining  294.8 ktpy—refined cathodes   260.2  88.3 %
Ilo acid plants  Ilo (Peru) Production  Sulfuric acid  1,354.93 ktpy—sulfuric acid   1,066.5  78.7 %
Ilo precious metals refinery
 Ilo (Peru) Production
 Slime recovery & processing,
gold & silver refining  460 tpy
  342.0  74.4 %
MEXICAN OPEN ‑PIT
SEGMENT    
      
 
Mining Operations           
Buenavista open ‑pit mine;
Concentrator I  Sonora (Mexico) Production
 Copper ore milling & recovery ,
copper concentrate production  82.0 ktpd—milling
  85.6  104.4 %
Concentrator II   115.0 ktpd—milling  117.9  102.5 %  
Buenavista: SX ‑EW plant I
 Sonora (Mexico) Production
 Leaching, solvent extraction &
refined cathode electrowinning  11.0 ktpy—refined
  —  —%
SX‑EW plant II   43.8 ktpy—refined  11.8  26.9 %  
SX‑EW plant III   120.0 ktpy—refined  70.1  58.4 %  
La Caridad open ‑pit mine
 Sonora (Mexico) Production
 Copper ore milling & recovery ,
copper & molybdenum
concentrate production  94.5 ktpd—milling
  95.7  101.3 %
La Caridad SX ‑EW plant
 Sonora (Mexico) Production
 Leaching, solvent extraction &
cathode electrowinning  21.9 ktpy—refined
  25.4  115.9 %
Processing Operations           
La Caridad copper smelter
 Sonora (Mexico) Production
 Concentrate smelting, anode
production  1,000 ktpy—concentrate feed
  1,047.3  104.7 %
La Caridad copper refinery  Sonora (Mexico) Production  Copper refining  300 ktpy copper cathode   242.7  80.9 %
La Caridad copper rod plant Sonora (Mexico) Production  Copper rod production  150 ktpy copper rod   150.1  100.1 %
La Caridad precious metals
refinery  Sonora (Mexico) Production
 Slime recovery & processing,
gold & silver refining  1.8 ktpy—slime
  0.9  52.5 %
La Caridad sulfuric acid
plant  Sonora (Mexico) Production
 Sulfuric acid  1,565.5 ktpy—sulfuric acid
  990.0  63.2 %
IMMSA  SEGMENT           
Undergr ound mines           
Charcas
 San Luis Potosi (Mexico) Production
 Copper , zinc, lead milling,
recovery & concentrate
production  1,460 ktpy—ore milled
  1,232.1  84.4 %
San Martin
 Zacatecas (Mexico) Production
 Lead, zinc, copper & silver
mining, milling recovery &
concentrate production  1,606 ktpy—ore milled
  1,217.3  75.8 %
Santa Barbara
 Chihuahua (Mexico) Production
 Lead, copper and zinc mining &
concentrates production  2,190 ktpy—ore milled
  1,516.0  69.2 %
Santa Eulalia
 Chihuahua (Mexico) Suspended
 Lead & zinc mining and milling
recovery & concentrate
production  547.5 ktpy—ore milled
  — %
Taxco(2)
 Guerrero (Mexico) Suspended
 Lead, zinc silver & gold mining
recovery & concentrate
production  730 ktpy—ore milled
  — %
Processing Operations           
San Luis Potosi zinc
refinery  San Luis Potosi (Mexico) Production
 Zinc concentrates refining  105.0 ktpy zinc cathode
  92.7  88.3 %
San Luis Potosi sulfuric
acid plant  San Luis Potosi (Mexico) Production
 Sulfuric acid  180.0 ktpy sulfuric acid
  172.4  95.8 %
Table of Contents
31ktpd = thousands of tonnes per day
ktpy = thousands of tonnes per year
Tpy = tonnes per year
(1) Our estimates of actual capacity under normal operating conditions contemplating an allowance for normal downtime for
repairs and maintenance and are based on the average metal content for the relevant period.
(2) The Taxco mine has been on strike since July 2007.
(3) In some cases, real production exceeds nominal capacity due to higher grades and recovery rates.
OTHER PROPERTIES
The table below provides details on the locations and other information as of December 31, 2021 for our properties
under development or exploration. These properties are also owned and operated by SCC.
Property Name Location Stage Mineralization Mineral rights and acr eage
Other  properties in Peru       
Tia Maria
 Arequipa (Peru) Development
 Porphyry copper deposit; economic mineralization
is oxide copper .Covers an area of 34,790 hectares
in 55 concessions.
Los Chancas
 Apurimac (Peru) Exploration
 Porphyry copper–molybdenum deposit; copper
sulfides are dominant.Consists of 31 concessions,
covering approximately 22,700
hectares.
Michiquillay
 Cajamarca (Peru) Exploration
 Porphyry copper–molybdenum–gold deposit; copper
sulfides are dominant.Consists of 18 concessions with a
total area of 4,051.4 hectares.
Other  properties in
Mexico    
 
Pilares
 Sonora (Mexico) Development
 Porphyry copper deposit; three mineralization
events are recognized.Covers an area of 143.3 hectares
in one concession.
El Pilar
 Sonora (Mexico) Development
 Predominantly consists of the copper oxide mineral
chrysocolla.Covers an area of 9,571.3
hectares in 18 concessions.
El Arco
 Baja California (Mexico) Development
 Porphyry copper deposit; mineralization occurs in
three sub-horizontal zones.Covers an area of 72,133 hectares
in 11 concessions.
Table of Contents
32PROPERTY BOOK VALUE
As of December 31, 2021, net book values of property and mine development were as follows (in millions):
Peruvian operations:         
Cuajone $ 683.6
Toquepala   1,887.6
Tia Maria project   310.2
Ilo and other support facilities  595.7
Construction in progress   692.9
Total Peru $ 4,170.0
Mexican open‑pit operations:  
Buenavista mine and concentrator plants $ 2,355.1
Buenavista SX‑EW and Quebalix   905.1
La Caridad mine and concentrator plant   316.7
La Caridad support facilities   425.4
Construction in progress   475.6
Total Mexico Open Pit $ 4,477.9
Mexican IMMSA unit:    
San Luis Potosi $  74.3
Zinc electrolytic refinery   82.9
Charcas   77.4
San Martin   107.8
Santa Barbara   76.8
Taxco   2.4
Santa Eulalia   45.1
Nueva Rosita   14.5
Construction in progress and other facilities  83.0
Total IMMSA Unit $ 564.2
Other property:    
El Pilar $  92.3
Mexicana del Arco   58.5
Total $ 150.8
Mexican administrative offices $ 101.5
Total Mexico $ 5,294.4
Total Southern Copper Corporation $ 9,464.4
Table of Contents
33SUMMARY OPERATING DATA
The following table contains certain operating data underlying our financial and operating information for each of the
periods indicated.
 Variance
 Year Ended December 31,  2021 -2020  2020 -2019
    2021     2020     2019     Volume    %     Volume    %
COPPER (thousand pounds):                     
Mined                      
Peru open‑pit                      
Toquepala   448,913  505,116  510,752  (56,203)  (11.1)%   (5,636)  (1.1)%
Cuajone   372,559  371,837  344,787  722  0.2%   27,050  7.8%
SX‑EW Toquepala   56,777  57,342  58,045  (565)  (1.0)%   (703)  (1.2)%
Mexico open‑pit                
La Caridad   226,390  241,783  236,249  (15,393)  (6.4)%   5,534  2.3%
Buenavista   752,225  735,398  745,073  16,827  2.3%   (9,675)  (1.3)%
SX‑EW La Caridad   55,942  56,981  57,160  (1,039)  (1.8)%   (179)  (0.3)%
SX‑EW Buenavista   180,437  216,470  220,711  (36,033)  (16.6)%   (4,241)  (1.9)%
IMMSA unit   19,222  22,711  18,222  (3,489)  (15.4)%   4,489  24.6%
Total Mined   2,112,465  2,207,638  2,190,999  (95,173)  (4.3)%   16,639  0.8%
Smelted                      
Peru open‑pit                      
Blister Ilo   5,735  9,177  —  (3,442)  100.0%   9,177 #DIV/0!%
Anodes Ilo   680,263  762,700  700,009  (82,437)  (10.8)%   62,691  9.0%
Mexico open‑pit                
Anodes La Caridad   633,621  625,414  612,122  8,207  1.3%   13,292  2.2%
Total Smelted   1,319,619  1,397,291  1,312,131  (77,672)  (5.6)%   85,160  6.5%
Refined                      
Peru Open‑pit                      
Cathodes Ilo   573,583  631,118  565,810  (57,535)  (9.1)%   65,308  11.5%
SX‑EW Toquepala   56,777  57,342  58,045  (565)  (1.0)%   (703)  (1.2)%
Mexico Open‑pit                
Cathodes La Caridad   534,980  529,997  510,602  4,983  0.9%   19,395  3.8%
SX‑EW La Caridad   55,942  56,981  57,160  (1,039)  (1.8)%   (179)  (0.3)%
SX‑EW Buenavista   180,437  216,470  220,712  (36,033)  (16.6)%   (4,242)  (1.9)%
Total Refined   1,401,719  1,491,908  1,412,329  (90,189)  (6.0)%   79,579  5.6%
Rod Mexico Open‑pit—La
Caridad   330,961  285,363  314,661  45,598  16.0%   (29,298)  (9.3)%
SILVER (thousand ounces)                     
Mined                      
Peru Open‑pit                      
Toquepala   2,681  3,341  3,421  (660)  (19.9)%   (80)  (2.3)%
Cuajone   2,692  2,400  2,207  292  12.3%   193  8.7%
Mexico Open‑pit                
La Caridad   2,227  2,266  1,947  (39)  (1.7)%   319  16.4%
Buenavista   4,774  5,550  5,755  (776)  (14.0)%   (205)  (3.6)%
IMMSA unit   6,588  7,983  6,943  (1,395)  (17.5)%   1,040  15.0%
Total Mined   18,962  21,540  20,273  (2,578)  (12.0)%   1,267  6.2%
Refined                      
Peru—Ilo   3,985  3,967  3,344  18  0.6%   623  18.6%
Mexico—La Caridad   7,612  8,128  8,049  (516)  (6.3)%   79  1.0%
IMMSA unit   2,094  1,793  1,195  301  16.8%   598  50.0%
Total Refined   13,691  13,888  12,588  (197)  (1.4)%   1,300  10.3%
MOLYBDENUM (thousand
pounds)                      
Mined                      
Toquepala   23,462  22,088  16,043  1,374  6.2%   6,045  37.7%
Cuajone   9,237  9,315  7,242  (78)  (0.8)%   2,073  28.6%
Buenavista   11,524  12,058  13,487  (534)  (4.4)%   (1,429)  (10.6)%
La Caridad   22,493  23,226  22,500  (733)  (3.2)%   726  3.2%
Total Mined   66,716  66,687  59,272  29  0.0%   7,415  12.5%
ZINC (thousand pounds)                      
Mined IMMSA   147,617  151,964  162,970  (4,347)  (2.9)%   (11,006)  (6.8)%
Refined IMMSA   204,306  225,842  231,435  (21,536)  (9.5)%   (5,593)  (2.4)%
Table of Contents
34SUMMARY DISCLOSURE OF MINERAL RESOURCES
The following table contains the summary of our mineral resources exclusive of mineral reserves as of December 31,
2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.80 per pound of copper, $11.50 per pound of molybdenum ($10.35
per pound of molybdenum in the case of our Cuajone, Toquepala and El Arco mines), $23.00 per ounce of silver, $1.32
per pound of zinc, $1.04 per pound of lead and $1,725 per ounce of gold.
Measured mineral resources Indicated mineral resourcesMeasured + Indicated mineral
resources Inferred mineral resources
    Amount    Metal Amount    Metal Amount    Metal Amount    Metal
(million
tonnes) GradesContent
(million
lb)(million
tonnes) GradesContent
(million lb)(million
tonnes) GradesContent
(million
lb)(million
tonnes) GradesContent
(million lb)
Copper:           
Peru:     
Cuajone   —  —  —  282.3 0.47%  2,943.6  282.3 0.47%  2,943.6  601.5 0.32%  4,286.4
Toquepala   —  —  —  1,145.2 0.44%  11,185.4  1,145.2 0.44% 11,185.4  7,527.4 0.22%  37,322.2
La Tapada
deposit  —  —  —  90.4 0.21% 420.3  90.4 0.21% 420.3  1.6 0.18% 6.4
Tia Maria deposit  —  —  —  35.5 0.17%  135.2  35.5 0.17%  135.2  21.8 0.22%  107.8
Los Chancas   —  —  —  150.0 0.50%  1,648.0  150.0 0.50%  1,648.0  1,433.0 0.45%  14,165.0
Michiquillay   —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  2,288.0 0.43%  21,554.8
Mexico:  
Buenavista Mill  —  —  —  944.0 0.38%  7,892.5  944.0 0.38%  7,892.5  14,467.0 0.21%  67,113.0
Buenavista Leach  —  —  —  82.0 0.13%  229.3  82.0 0.13%  229.3  3,812.0 0.14%  11,900.5
Buenavista zinc
plant  —  —  —  183.0 0.46% 1,867.3  183.00.46% 1,867.3  194.00.43% 1,829.8
La Caridad Mill  —  —  —  6,455.0 0.17%  23,809.9  6,455.0 0.17% 23,809.9  4,039.0 0.13%  11,243.6
La Caridad Leach  —  —  —  817.0 0.06%  1,102.3  817.0 0.06%  1,102.3  927.0 0.06%  1,322.8
Charcas   —  —  —  5.8 0.53%  68.1  5.8 0.53%  68.1  14.2 0.57%  179.5
Santa Barbara  —  —  —  22.5 0.53%  265.0  22.5 0.53%  265.0  19.4 0.55%  233.2
San Martin  —  —  —  11.7 0.62%  161.4  11.7 0.62%  161.4  8.4 0.53%  97.6
El Arco Mill   —  —  —  826.6 0.41%  7,544.9  826.6 0.41%  7,544.9  2,344.9 0.37%  19,352.3
El Arco Leach  —  —  —  51.3 0.30%  335.3  51.3 0.3%  335.3  63.8 0.25%  350.9
El Pilar   2.2  0.20%  9.5  81.3 0.18%  317.0  83.4 0.18%  326.5  88.6 0.12%  234.4
Pilares Mill   —  —  —  —  —%  —  —  —%  —  71.8 0.56%  879.9
Pilares Leach  —  —  —  —  —%  —  —  —%  —  4.8 0.44%  45.6
Total   2.2  9.5  11,183.8  59,925.5  11,185.9  59,935.0  37,928.1  192,225.6
Molybdenum:  
Peru:  
Cuajone   —  —  —  282.3 0.02%  105.8  282.3 0.02%  105.8  601.4 0.01%  144.2
Toquepala   —  —  —  1,145.2 0.02%  617.2  1,145.2 0.02%  617.2  3,558.2 0.02%  1,360.0
Mexico:  
Buenavista Mill  —  —  —  944.0 0.005%  112.4  944.0 0.005%  112.4  14,467.0 0.004%  1,300.7
Buenavista zinc
plant  —  —  —  183.00.002% 6.6  183.00.002% 6.6  194.00.003% 13.2
La Caridad Mill  —  —  —  6,455.0 0.026%  3,703.8  6,455.0 0.026%  3,703.8  4,039.0 0.025%  2,226.7
El Arco Mill   —  —  —  826.6 0.008%  146.5  826.6 0.008%  146.5  2,344.9 0.006%  298.2
Pilares Mill   —  —  —  —  —%  —  —  —%  —  71.8 0.005%  7.7
Total   —  —  9,836.2  4,692.3  9,836.2  4,692.3  25,276.2  5,350.7
Silver: (2)  
Mexico:  
Charcas   —  —  — 5.8  91.0  17,118  5.8  91.0  17,118 14.2  98.0  44,583
Santa Barbara   —  —  — 22.5  101.0  72,822  22.5  101.0  72,822 19.4  102.0  63,722
San Martin   —  —  — 11.7  97.0  36,647  11.7  97.0  36,647 8.4  107.0  28,716
El Arco Mill   —  —  — 826.6  1.6  41,875  826.6  1.6  41,875  2,344.9  1.5  110,890
Total   —  —  866.7  168,462  866.7  168,462  2,386.8  247,911
Zinc:  
Mexico:  
Buenavista zinc
plant  —  —  —  183.0  0.78% 3,128.4183.0 0.78% 3,128.4  194.00.49% 2,101.0
Buenavista Cu
plant  —  —  —  944.0  0.07% 1,448.4944.0 0.07% 1,448.4  14,467.00.03% 9,490.9
Charcas  —  —  —  5.8  3.45% 443.85.8 3.45% 443.8  14.22.76% 864.4
Santa Barbara  —  —  —  22.5  3.24% 1,610.622.5 3.24% 1,610.6  19.43.89% 1,660.7
San Martin  —  —  —  11.7  2.65% 685.511.7 2.65% 685.5  8.42.18% 402.8
Total  —  —  1,167.1  7,316.7  1,167.1  7,316.7  14,702.9  14,519.8
Table of Contents
35Lead:
Mexico:
Charcas  —  —  —  5.8  0.42% 54.05.8 0.42% 54.0  14.20.36% 112.2
Santa Barbara  —  —  —  22.5  1.92% 956.222.5 1.92% 956.2  19.42.35% 1,001.4
San Martin  —  —  —  11.7  0.55% 141.611.7 0.55% 141.6  8.40.61% 112.9
Total  —  —  40.1  1,151.9  40.1  1,151.9  41.9  1,226.6
Gold: (2)
Mexico:
Santa Barbara  —  —  —  22.5  0.30  21922.5 0.30  219  19.40.19 117
El Arco Mill  —  —  —  826.6  0.12  3,226826.6 0.12  3,226  2,344.90.11 8,053
Total  —  —  849.2  3,445  849.2  3,445  2,364.2  8,170
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021. Mineral resources are reported exclusive of
mineral reserves. Figures have been rounded.
(2) Gold and silver grades are denominated in grams per tonne. Gold and silver contents are expressed in thousand ounces.
(3) For Cuajone, Toquepala, and El Arco a molybdenum price of $10.35/lb was used for mineral resources.
(4) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the mineral resource estimates, please refer to the technical report
summaries prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibits 96.1 to 96.13 to this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
36SUMMARY DISCLOSURE OF MINERAL RESERVES
The following table contains the summary of our mineral reserves as of December 31, 2021, based on long-term price
assumptions of $3.30 per pound of copper, $10.00 per pound of molybdenum ($9.00 per pound of molybdenum in the
case of our Cuajone, Toquepala and El Arco mines), $20.00 per ounce of silver, $1.15 per pound of zinc and $1,500 per
ounce of gold.
Proven mineral reserves Probable mineral reserves Total mineral reserves
    Amount    Metal Amount    Metal Amount    Metal
(million
tonnes) GradesContent
(million
lb)(million
tonnes) GradesContent
(million lb)(million
tonnes) GradesContent
(million lb)
Copper:           
Peru:     
Cuajone   —  —  —  1,355.6  0.49%  14,693.2  1,355.6  0.49%  14,693.2
Toquepala   —  —  —  5,658.5  0.46%  35,379.1  5,658.5  0.46%  35,379.1
La Tapada deposit   —  —  —  487.6  0.41%  4,449.2  487.6  0.41%  4,449.2
Tia Maria deposit  —  —  —  223.8  0.29%  1,412.5  223.8  0.29%  1,412.5
Mexico:  
Buenavista Sulfides   —  —  —  2,172.0  0.36%  17,412.0  2,172.0  0.36%  17,412.0
Buenavista Leach  —  —  —  1,126.0  0.22%  5,506.0  1,126.0  0.22%  5,506.0
La Caridad Mill   —  —  —  372.0  0.24%  1,955.0  372.0  0.24%  1,955.0
La Caridad Leach  —  —  —  43.0  0.09%  81.0  43.0  0.09%  81.0
El Arco Mill   —  —  —  1,229.5  0.40%  10,822.1  1,229.5  0.40%  10,822.1
El Arco Leach  —  —  —  140.5  0.27%  846.3  140.5  0.27%  846.3
El Pilar   63.0  0.266%  221.0  254.0  0.25%  720.0  317.0  0.25%  941.0
Total   63.0  221.0  13,062.5  93,276.3  13,125.5  93,497.3
Molybdenum:  
Peru:  
Cuajone   —  —  —  1,333.6  0.017%  507.6  1,333.6  0.017%  507.6
Toquepala   —  —  —  2,463.3  0.021%  1,145.0  2,463.3  0.021%  1,145.0
Mexico:  
Buenavista   —  —  —  2,104.0  0.007%  343.0  2,104.0  0.007%  343.0
La Caridad   —  —  —  372.0  0.020%  185.0  372.0  0.020%  185.0
El Arco Mill   —  —  —  1,229.5  0.006%  166.7  1,229.5  0.006%  166.7
Total   —  —  7,502.4  2,347.3  7,502.4  2,347.3
Silver: (2)  
Mexico:  
El Arco   —  —  —  1,229.5  1.8  70,465  1,229.5  1.8  70,465
Zinc:  
Mexico:  
Buenavista zinc plant (3)  —  —  —  68.0  1.40%  2,097.0  68.0  1.40%  2,097.0
Gold: (2)
Mexico:
El Arco  —  —  —  1,229.5  0.14  5,585  1,229.5  0.14  5,585
(1) Mineral reserves are current as at December 31, 2021. The reference point for the estimate is delivery to the process plant.
Figures have been rounded.
(2) Gold and silver grades are denominated in grams per tonne. Gold and silver contents are expressed in thousand ounces.
(3) For Cuajone, Toquepala, and El Arco a molybdenum price of $9.00/lb was used for mineral reserves.
(4) The amount of ore reported under the Buenavista zinc plant is included within the Buenavista sulfides.
(5) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the mineral resource estimates, please refer to the technical report
summaries prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibits 96.1 to 96.13 to this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
37Tailings Dams
Tailings are comprised of solid particles originating at the concentrator plants during the grinding process that, combined
with water, are sent to specially built structures where they are impounded. The water is recovered to be reused in the
process.
Tailings dams are basically built in two manners: by using the coarse fraction from the same tailings or by using external
material, often known as “borrowed material” such as rock, clay etc. We believe SCC’s tailings dams are built with the
highest quality standards and engineering practices. We comply with and at times exceed the national norms and
recommendations of the International Commission on Large Dams (ICOLD). In addition, we maintain a committee
including both internal and external specialists, which periodically review the safety and operation of each dam. In 2020,
we implemented the project “Automation and Real Time Monitoring of geotechnical instrumentation in the Pit and
Quebrada Honda Tailings Dam” and conditioned a location to install three radars to conduct geotechnical monitoring of
the Quebrada Honda Tailings Dam. We do not expect that these activities will generate any adverse material effects in
our operations.
We have six tailings dams in operation in Mexico and one in Peru as follows:
Country     Operation     Name     Current Height    Material     Method
Mexico  Buenavista  Tailings dam # 3 100 meters Borrowed  Downstream
Mexico  Buenavista  New tailings dam 99 meters Borrowed  Downstream
Mexico  La Caridad  Tailings dam # 7 189 meters Borrowed  Downstream
Mexico  Charcas  Tailings dam  55 meters Coarse tailings Upstream
Mexico  Santa Barbara Noriega dam  45 meters Coarse tailings Upstream
Mexico  San Martin  Tailings dam 5 & 7 50 meters Coarse tailings Upstream
Peru
 Cuajone and
Toquepala  Quebrada Honda
 138 meters Coarse tailings Downstream
INDIVIDUAL PROPERTY DISCLOSURE
In 2021, we adopted the disclosure requirements of S-K 1300. The definitions and allowed assumptions for mineral
reserves under previous guidance (Industry Guide 7) are significantly different from the defined terms and allowed
assumptions for mineral reserves under S-K 1300. Consequently, we believe that because of the differences in the
definitions and allowed assumptions between both regulations, a meaningful comparison between mineral reserves
reported in the 2020 Form 10-K to the 2021 Form 10-K cannot be made. Additionally, Industry Guide 7 did not allow
the reporting of mineral resources, hence there is no comparable information on this matter.
PERUVIAN OPERATIONS
Operations in our Peruvian segment include the Cuajone and Toquepala mine complexes and the smelting and refining
plants, the industrial railroad that links Ilo, Toquepala and Cuajone and the port facilities. Other properties include our
Tia Maria, Los Chancas and Michiquillay projects. We conduct ongoing maintenance and improvement programs to
ensure the satisfactory performance of our equipment. We believe all our Peruvian plant’s equipment is in good physical
condition and suitable for our operations.
Table of Contents
38The map below indicates the approximate location of, and access to, our Cuajone and Toquepala mine complexes and
our Ilo processing facilities:
Cuajone
The Cuajone operations consist of an open-pit copper mine and a concentrator and are located in the Torata District, 
Mariscal Nieto Region, of Moquegua, approximately 878 km from the city of Lima and 27 km from the city of 
Moquegua. The Cuajone mine is accessible by paved road from Lima or Tacna by the Pan-American Highway. The 
Quebrada Honda tailings storage facility (“TSF”) is about 120 km via local roads, south of the Cuajone operations.  
Access within the project area is via developed roads that are routinely maintained. Tacna, Moquegua, and Ilo have
regularly scheduled air services from Lima. Additionally, a spur railway runs from the Toquepala operations to the
Cuajone operations.
The Cuajone operations are owned and operated by SPCC Peru Branch and contain a single mining concession,
“Acumulación Cuajone”, which covers an area of 15,024.5 hectares. Power is transmitted for process needs from the
Peruvian grid using two Southern Copper-owned transmission lines of 138 kV and 220 kV. Additionally, the Cuajone 
operations use surface and underground water from a variety of sources as a fresh make up water.  
The property is currently in the production stage. Southern Copper has had an interest in the Cuajone area since 1954. 
Predecessor companies included Cerro de Pasco Corporation, Newmont and Asarco.  Overburden removal commenced 
in 1970 and ore production commenced in 1976. Our Cuajone operations utilize a conventional open-pit mining method 
to drill/blast/haul copper ore for further processing at the concentrator, which has a milling capacity of 90,000 tonnes per 
day. Book value of the property and its associated plant and equipment is available under “Property Book Value” on 
page 32 of this report.

Table of Contents
39The table below shows production information for 2021, 2020 and 2019 for our Cuajone operations:
  Variance 2021 -
 2020
        2021     2020     2019     Amount    %
Mine annual operating days      365  366  365      
Mine               
Total ore mined  (kt)  29,548  30,183  29,017  (635)  (2.1)%
Copper grade  (%)  0.674  0.666  0.644  0.008  1.2%
Leach material mined  (kt)  1,983  2,084  1,513  (101)  (4.8)%
Leach material grade  (%)  0.668  0.704  0.483  (0.036)  (5.1)%
Stripping ratio  (x)  3.70  3.03  4.04  0.67  
22.1%
Total material mined  (kt)  
148,302  
130,047  153,911  
18,255  
14.0%
Concentrator             
Total material milled  (kt)  29,617  30,110  29,056  (493)  (1.6)%
Copper recovery  (%)  84.70  84.23  83.65  0.47  0.6%
Copper concentrate  (kt)  670.1  664.1  625.5  6.0  0.9%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)  169.0  168.7  156.4  0.3  0.2%
Copper concentrates average grade  (%)  25.22  25.40  25.00  (0.18)  (0.7)%
Molybdenum             
Molybdenum grade  (%)  0.022  0.022  0.019  —  —%
Molybdenum recovery  (%)  63.27  64.28  59.23  (1.01)  (1.6)%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt)  7.8  7.8  6.1  (0.0)  (0.1)%
Molybdenum concentrate average grade  (%)  53.76  54.29  54.03  (0.53)  (1.0)%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt)  4.2  4.2  3.3  (0.0)  (0.2)%
Key: kt = thousand tonnes
x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste by leachable material plus ore mined.
Copper and molybdenum grades are referred to as total copper grade and total molybdenum grade, respectively.
Geology
The Cuajone deposit is considered to be an example of a porphyry copper–molybdenum deposit. The basal regional 
geology consists of Precambrian metamorphic rocks that are cut by Paleozoic granite, unconformably overlain by Upper 
Triassic to Jurassic marine volcanic and sedimentary lithologies.  Overlying these rocks are late Cretaceous to early 
Tertiary rhyolite, andesite and agglomerate of the Toquepala Group. These lithologies are intruded by the composite, 
polyphase Cretaceous to Paleogene Coastal (Andean) Batholith.
Mineralization and alteration at the Cuajone deposit is directly related to a multi-stage latite porphyry that intrudes 
basaltic andesites and the overlying 370 m of rhyolite porphyries of the Toquepala Group.  The Cuajone porphyry 
deposit exhibits a zoned alteration pattern that includes potassic, propylitic, sericitic and intermediate argillic 
hydrothermal alteration styles. The mineralogy is typically simple and consists of pyrite, chalcopyrite, and bornite, with 
sparse sphalerite, galena, and enargite.  
Concentrator
Our Cuajone operations use state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems at the concentrator, the crushing plant and the
flotation circuit to coordinate inflows and optimize operations. The process designs were based on existing technologies
and proven equipment, and the plants constructed using those designs have a 45-year operating history. Material with a
copper grade over 0.35% is loaded onto an overland conveyor belt and sent to the milling circuit, where giant rotating
crushers reduce the size of the rocks to approximately one-half of an inch. The ore is then sent to the ball mills, which
grind it to the consistency of fine powder. The finely ground powder is agitated in a water and reagents solution and is
then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the cells to produce foam for floating the copper and molybdenum
minerals while waste materials called tailings are separated. This copper-molybdenum bulk concentrate is then treated
by inverse flotation, where molybdenum is floated and copper is depressed. The copper concentrate is shipped by rail to
Table of Contents
40the smelter at Ilo and the molybdenum concentrate is packaged for shipment to customers. Sulfides under 0.35% copper
are considered waste.
Tailings are sent to thickeners to recover water. The remaining tailings are sent to the Quebrada Honda dam, our
principal tailings storage facility.
A major mill expansion was completed in 1999 and the eleventh primary mill began operations in January 2008. In
December 2013, the high-pressure grinding roll was put in operation. At the end of 2016, the Larox filter press for
molybdenum concentrate began operations. The overland primary crusher began operations in May 2018. The new
tailings thickener began operations in September 2019.
Slope stability
The Cuajone pit is approximately 930 meters deep. Under the present mine plan configuration the Cuajone pit will reach
a depth of 1,320 meters. The increases in the depth of the pit present us with a number of geotechnical challenges.
Perhaps the foremost concern is the possibility of slope failure, which all open pit mines face. To meet the geotechnical
challenges relating to slope stability of the open pit mines, we have taken the following steps:
At the Cuajone mine, in 2007 in order to minimize the damage to the slopes caused by production blast vibrations,
blasting control using three pre-split drills was implemented. Also, the slope monitoring system with reflection prisms
has been replaced by a system using slope monitoring radar. In February 2012, the first radar equipment was put in
service and in August 2013, the second radar installation and a geotechnical surveillance camera was added. This system
improved the reliability and continuity of monitoring, improved the quality of information used to evaluate the
performance of the slopes and helped better anticipate the risk of instability. The sub-surface deformation and the water
level are still monitored with inclinometers and piezometers. In September 2012, we completed a program of oriented
geotechnical drilling totaling 17,938 meters, and in May 2013 we completed a program of vertical geotechnical drilling
totaling 2,814 meters, with hydraulic tests performed on rock and subsequently instrumented with
inclinometers/piezometers. The geotechnical and hydraulic information obtained from the two programs will be used in
the development of a geotechnical study for the new 15-year mine development plan (2015-2029). Additionally, in 2013,
we drilled 772 meters of sub-horizontal holes to drain the east slope of the pit. The geotechnical study for the new 15-
year mine development plan was completed at the end of 2015, and the result of this study is the increase of the inter
ramp angle by an average of three degrees and include 40 meters wide geotechnical berms for inter ramp heights above
150 meters. This study also contains recommendations for improving the stability of the pit slopes.
In 2017, we installed three vibration monitoring stations and ten digital extensometers to monitor surface deformations
on waste dumps in real time. We also completed the detailed engineering for the construction of the coronation channel
in the west Torata waste dump. In 2018, we began to operate the first radar to monitor blasting vibrations and set up a
second geotechnical surveillance camera. This equipment will allow us to improve control over the walls of the pit and
to anticipate possible damages.
In 2020, equipment to extract rock samples was implemented in the rock mechanics laboratory. This equipment allows
us to obtain cylindrical rock specimens and perform rock mechanics tests under current technical standards and norms. A
drone was also incorporated in the slope reconciliation activities to obtain detailed topographic information on the slopes
and identify good practices or opportunities to build stable walls.
In 2021, as part of the equipment update and the requirement to improve the slope monitoring coverage due to the
growth of the pit, two slope monitoring radars were acquired. Three pieces of monitoring equipment have also been
added to monitor slopes in the leaching pads. Likewise, the first study of the physical stability of waste rock deposits
was carried out by a consulting firm.
Table of Contents
41Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of copper and molybdenum mineral resources for Cuajone as of December
31, 2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.80 and $10.35 per pound, respectively:
Copper     Amount (thousand
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(thousand pounds)
Measured mineral resources  —  — %  — %  —
Indicated mineral resources   282,338  0.47 % 47 - 84 %  2,943,603
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  282,338  0.47 % 47 - 84 %  2,943,603
Inferred mineral resources  601,452  0.32 % 47 - 84 %  4,286,353
Molybdenum     Amount (thousand
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(thousand pounds)
Measured mineral resources  —  —  — %  —
Indicated mineral resources   282,338  0.02 %  54 %  105,843
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  282,338  0.02 %  54 %  105,843
Inferred mineral resources  601,363  0.01 %  54 %  144,217
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) Mineral resources are reported exclusive of mineral reserves. Figures have been rounded.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the Cuajone
operations technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.1 to this Form 10-K.
Mineral reserves
The following table contains the summary of copper and molybdenum mineral reserves for Cuajone as of December 31,
2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.30 and $9.00 per pound, respectively:
Copper     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Proven mineral reserves  —  —%  — %  —
Probable mineral reserves (mill)   1,333.6  0.49 %  85 %  14,452.2
Probable mineral reserves (leach)  22.0  0.50 %  58 %  241.0
Total mineral reserves  1,355.6  0.49 % 58 - 85 %  14,693.2
Molybdenum     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Proven mineral reserves  —  —%  — %  —
Probable mineral reserves   1,333.6  0.017 %  63 %  507.6
Total mineral reserves  1,333.6  0.017 %  63 %  507.6
(1) Mineral reserves are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) The reference point for the estimate is delivery to the process plant. Figures have been rounded.
(3) Metallur gical recovery for mill ore is 85% and for leach recovery is 58%.  Leach ore is made up of an existing stockpile.
(4) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 12 of the Cuajone
operations technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.1 to this Form 10-K.
Toquepala
The Toquepala operations are situated in Southern Peru, approximately 150 km by road from the city of Tacna and 30
kilometers from Cuajone. Road access from Tacna is via the Pan-American highway and other local roads. Alternative
access is from Lima, using the Pan-American highway to Alto Camiara, and then driving for 70 km on a paved road to
the Toquepala camp. The Quebrada Honda tailings storage facility (TSF) is 40 km south of the mine, and is accessed via
the MO-107 route that that connects Alto Camiara with Toquepala. Within the operations area, access is by unpaved 
mine and exploration roads.  The city of Tacna has a regional airstrip, with regular service within Peru. Additionally, 
railways extend from Ilo to Toquepala, and a spur railway runs from the Toquepala operations to the Cuajone operations.
Table of Contents
42The Toquepala operations are owned and operated by SPCC Peru Branch and contain a single mining concession, 
“Acumulación Toquepala 1”, which covers an area of 17,552.4 hectares.  Power is transmitted for process needs from 
the Peruvian grid using two Southern Copper-owned transmission lines of 138 kV and 220 kV. Additionally, the 
Toquepala operations use surface and underground water from a variety of sources as a fresh make up water.  
The property is currently under the production stage. Our Toquepala operations consist of an open-pit copper mine and
two concentrators; each with a milling capacity of 60,000 tonnes per day. We also refine copper at the SX-EW facility
through a leaching process. The SX-EW facility has a production capacity of 56,336 tonnes per year of LME grade A
copper cathodes. Southern Copper has had an interest in the Project area since 1945. Prior to Southern Copper’s Project
interests, the area had been subject to artisanal mining activities. Overburden removal commenced in 1957 and ore
production commenced in 1960. Our Toquepala operations utilize a conventional open-pit mining method to collect
copper ore for further processing in our concentrators. The second concentrator began operations in the fourth quarter of
2018. Book value of the property and its associated plant and equipment is available under “Property Book Value” on
page 32 of this report.
The table below contains production information for 2021, 2020 and 2019 for our Toquepala operations:
  Variance 2021 -
 2020
         2021     2020     2019     Amount    %
Mine annual operating days      365  366  365      
Mine               
Total ore mined  (kt)  40,827  39,383  38,248  1,444  3.7%
Copper grade  (%)  0.539  0.634  0.682  (0.095)  (15.0)%
Leach material mined  (kt)  53,226  52,838  96,700  388  0.7%
Leach material grade  (%)  0.225  0.195  0.161  0.030  15.4%
Stripping ratio  (x)  1.16  0.83  0.85  0.33  39.8%
Total material mined  (kt)  
203,150  
168,715  
249,083  
34,435  20.4%
Concentrator             
Total material milled  (kt)  41,699  39,894  38,121  1,805  4.5%
Copper recovery  (%)  90.60  90.44  89.64  0.16  0.2%
Copper concentrate  (kt)  791.6  899.3  885.2  (107.7)  (12.0)%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)  203.6  229.1  231.7  (25.5)  (11.1)%
Copper concentrate average grade  (%)  25.72  25.48  26.20  0.24  0.9%
SX‑EW plant             
Estimated leach recovery  (%)  23.54  23.71  23.72  (0.17)  (0.7)%
SX‑EW cathode production  (kt)  25.8  26.0  26.3  (0.2)  (0.8)%
Molybdenum             
Molybdenum grade  (%)  0.035  0.036  0.033  (0.001)  (2.8)%
Molybdenum recovery  (%)  72.91  69.76  57.84  3.15  4.5%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt)  19.0  18.1  13.1  0.9  5.0%
Molybdenum concentrate average grade  (%)  56.02  55.34  55.64  0.68  1.2%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt)  10.6  10.0  7.3  0.6  6.4%
Key: kt = thousand tonnes
x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste by leachable material plus ore mined.
Copper and molybdenum grades are referred to as total copper grade and total molybdenum grade, respectively.
Table of Contents
43Geology
The Toquepala deposit is an example of a copper–molybdenum porphyry deposit. The basal regional geology consists of
Precambrian metamorphic rocks that are cut by Paleozoic granite, unconformably overlain by Upper Triassic to Jurassic
marine volcanic and sedimentary lithologies. Overlying these rocks are late Cretaceous to early Tertiary rhyolite,
andesite and agglomerate of the Toquepala Group. These lithologies are intruded by the composite, polyphase
Cretaceous to Paleogene Coastal (Andean) Batholith.
Mineralization consists of leached capping, oxide, enriched, transitional and primary mineralization.  Leached capping, 
oxide, enriched and transition mineralization is mostly mined out. Primary mineralization occurs as hypogene sulfides 
mainly restricted to the dacite porphyry and breccias.  Chalcopyrite is the dominant economic mineral with lesser 
bornite, molybdenite, and enargite as disseminations, fracture fillings, and breccia matrix. Economic molybdenite 
mineralization is associated with quartz veinlets and locally, with disseminated chalcopyrite.
Concentrators
Our Toquepala concentrators use state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems to coordinate inflows and optimize
operations. Material with a copper grade over 0.25% is loaded onto an overland conveyor belt and sent to the crushing
circuit, where rotating crushers reduce the size of the rocks by approximately 85% to less than one-half of an inch. The
ore is then sent to the rod and ball mills, which grind it in a mix with water to the consistency of fine powder. The finely
ground powder mixed with water is then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the cells producing a froth,
which carries the copper mineral to the surface but not the waste rock, or tailings. The bulk concentrate with sufficient
molybdenum content is processed to recover molybdenum by inverse flotation. This final copper concentrate with a
content of approximately 26.5% of copper is filtered to reduce moisture to 8.5% or less. Concentrates are then shipped
by rail to the Ilo smelter.
Tailings are sent to thickeners where water is recovered. The remaining tailings are sent to the Quebrada Honda dam, our
principal tailings storage facility.
SX-EW Plant
The SX-EW facility at Toquepala produces grade A LME electrowon copper cathodes of 99.999% purity from solutions
obtained by leaching low-grade ore stored at the Toquepala and Cuajone mines. The leach plant commenced operations
in 1995 with a design capacity of 35,629 tonnes per year of copper cathodes. In 1999, the capacity was expanded to
56,336 tonnes per year.
This facility processes copper oxides from Cuajone and copper sulfides from Toquepala. Copper oxides from Cuajone
with a copper grade higher than 0.293%; acid solubility index higher than 43%; and a cyanide solubility index higher
than 20% are leached. At Toquepala, the copper sulfides cutoff grade is 0.080% and therefore, material with a total
copper grade between 0.080% and 0.253% is leached. Copper in solution produced at Cuajone is sent to Toquepala
through an eight-inch pipe laid alongside the Cuajone-Toquepala railroad track.
Plant and equipment are supported by a maintenance plan and a quality management system to assure good physical
condition and high availability. The SX-EW plant management quality system (including leaching operations) has been
audited periodically since 2002 by an external audit company and found to be in compliance with the requirements of
ISO 9001-2008 and ISO 14001-2015 standards. We are currently implementing the ISO 45000:2018 standard.
Slope stability
The Toquepala pit is approximately 990 meters deep. Under the present mine plan configuration the Toquepala pit will
reach a depth of 1,680 meters. The increases in the depth of the pit present us with a number of geotechnical challenges.
Perhaps the foremost concern is the possibility of slope failure, which all open pit mines face. To meet the geotechnical
challenges relating to slope stability of the open pit mines, we have taken the following steps:
Table of Contents
44In 2007, we installed 20 meter wide geotechnical berms every 10 benches at the Toquepala mine. We believe this will
further strengthen the stability of the Toquepala pit. In October 2012, two interferometric radars were put in place to
monitor slope stability at the Toquepala mine, and in September 2013, new full monitoring software (FMS360) was
installed. These systems improve the reliability of instrumentation, the information quality for assessing the behavior of
the slopes and anticipates the risks of instability.
In 2013, a mining consulting group began a study of dump stability at the Toquepala mine. This study assessed the
current stability of the dumps and is developing a geotechnical campaign to obtain information to assess the stability of
the future and final stages of the dumps. In 2016, the stability study was resumed by executing geophysical test and test
pits to characterize the dumps. The execution of sonic perforations and complementary geophysical tests are currently
pending. On December 2016, the consultants also presented the report “Slope Stability Analysis in Deposits of Waste and
Leachable Material”.
In 2016, the mining consultants presented the final report “Physical Stability of the Quebrada Honda tailings dam.” This
study consisted in the development of geotechnical investigations, static, seismic and post-seismic stability analysis,
filtration analysis, deformation analysis, liquefaction potential analysis and dynamic analysis.
In 2016, as part of the slope stability upgrade study, a geotechnical and hydrological oriented drill program of 3,470
meters was executed at the Toquepala mine. This program was conducted in order to complement the study and to gain a
better understanding of the behavior of the rock mass. The geotechnical drilling program involved 11 diamond drill
holes, six geotechnical drills and five hydrogeological drills, all of which entailed geological and geotechnical logging.
During the execution of these hydrogeological drills, permeability tests in the rock were executed as well as slug tests
and constant load tests. Additionally, instrumentation was implemented with five vibrating wire piezometers for the
monitoring of water table and to give support to the hydrogeological model. In 2016, the external mining consultants
began the report for phase three of this study, which was concluded in 2017. They submitted and updated the block
models of inter-ramp angles, the model of rock mass, the hydrogeological model and the 3D structural model. In
addition, fieldwork continued on the “Slope Stability Analysis in Deposits of Waste and Leachable Material” study by
executing geophysical tests, sampling and laboratory tests of soil mechanics. This study was concluded and submitted by
the external consultants in 2018.
Additionally, in 2018 we dedicated efforts to update the geotechnical pit models, which are essential to perform the
analysis of slope stability. Related to this, we have carried out actions, including the completion of the geotechnical
database implementation, laboratory testing, training, and other important aspects. In 2019, external consultants
performed the “2019 Update of Slope Stability Analysis in Deposits of Waste and Leachable Material” study. In
addition, an IBIS ArcSAR radar was incorporated into the pit slope monitoring system; this radar equipment offers
greater coverage, five kilometers of maximum range and reduced scanning time. Sub- horizontal drains were also
implemented for pit slope depressurization.
In 2020, external consultants performed the “Stability Study of the Toquepala Pit in Current Conditions” and “Stability
Study of the North, South, East, Northwest Waste Deposits and South Run of Mine (ROM) and Northwest Leach
Deposits.” In addition, another IBIS ArcSAR radar, which has a maximum range of five kilometers and offers reduced
scanning time, was incorporated into the pit slope monitoring system. We also implemented a database for geotechnical
drillholes, implemented the project “Automation and Real Time Monitoring of geotechnical instrumentation in the Pit
and Quebrada Honda Tailings Dam” and conditioned a location to install three radars to conduct geotechnical
monitoring of the Quebrada Honda Tailings Dam.
In 2021, external consultants performed the “Stability Study of the Quebrada Honda Tailings Dam – Toquepala Mine”
and installed the Quebrada Honda Radar System (which consists of two IBIS M units and one IBIS FM unit) to conduct
geotechnical monitoring of the Quebrada Honda Tailings Dam.
Table of Contents
45Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of copper and molybdenum mineral resources for Toquepala as of December
31, 2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.80 and $10.35 per pound, respectively:
Copper     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Measured mineral resources  —  —%  —%  —
Indicated mineral resources   1,145  0.44 % 18.8 - 82.2 %  11,185
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  1,145  0.44 % 18.8 - 82.2 %  11,185
Inferred mineral resources  7,527  0.22 % 18.8 - 82.2 %  37,322
Molybdenum     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Measured mineral resources  —  —  —%  —
Indicated mineral resources   1,145  0.02 %  54%  617
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  1,145  0.02 %  54%  617
Inferred mineral resources  3,558  0.02 %  54%  1,360
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021. Figures have been rounded.
(2) Mineral resources are reported exclusive of mineral reserves.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the Toquepala
operations technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.2 to this Form 10-K.
Mineral reserves
The following table contains the summary of copper and molybdenum mineral reserves for Toquepala as of December
31, 2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.30 and $9.00 per pound, respectively:
Copper     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Proven mineral reserves  —  —%  —%  —
Probable mineral reserves (mill)   2,463.3  0.46 %  88%  25,132.8
Probable mineral reserves (dump leach)  3,195.2  0.15 %  8%  10,246.3
Total mineral reserves  5,658.5  0.28 % 8 - 88 %  35,379.1
Molybdenum     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Proven mineral reserves  —  —%  —%  —
Probable mineral reserves   2,463.3  0.021 %  69%  1,145.0
Total mineral reserves  2,463.3  0.021 %  69%  1,145.0
(1) Mineral reserves are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) The reference point for the estimate is delivery to the process plant. Figures have been rounded.
(3) Dump leach is made up of dump leach material to be mined, and dump leach material on leach dump.
(4) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 12 of the Toquepala
operations technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.2 to this Form 10-K.
Processing Facilities—Ilo
Our Ilo smelter and refinery complex is located in the southern part of Peru, 17 kilometers north of the city of Ilo, 121
kilometers from Toquepala, 147 kilometers from Cuajone and 871 kilometers from the city of Lima. Access is by plane
from Lima to Tacna (1:40 hours) and then by highway to the city of Ilo (2:00 hours). Additionally, we operate a port
facility in Ilo, from where we ship our products and receive supplies. Products shipped and supplies received are moved
between Toquepala, Cuajone and Ilo on our industrial railroad.
Table of Contents
46Smelter
Our Ilo smelter produces copper anodes for the refinery we operate as part of the same facility. When the copper
produced by the smelter exceeds the refinery’s capacity, the excess is sold to other refineries around the world. In 2007,
we completed a major modernization of the smelter. The nominal installed capacity of the smelter is 1,200,000 tonnes of
copper concentrate per year. Copper concentrates from Toquepala and Cuajone are transported by railroad to the smelter,
where they are smelted using an ISASMELT furnace, converters and anode furnaces to produce copper anodes with
99.7% copper. At the smelter, the concentrates are mixed with flux and other material and sent to the ISASMELT
furnace producing a mixture of copper matte and slag, which is tapped through a taphole to either of two rotary holding
furnaces, where these smelted phases will be separated. Copper matte contains approximately 63% copper. Copper matte
is then sent to the four Pierce Smith converters, where the material is oxidized in two steps: (1) the iron sulfides in the
matte are oxidized with oxygen enriched air and silica is added producing slag that is sent to the slag cleaning furnaces,
and (2) the copper contained in the matte sulfides is then oxidized to produce blister copper, containing approximately
99.3% copper. The blister copper is refined in two anode furnaces by oxidation and sulfur is removed with compressed
air injected into the bath. Finally, the oxygen content of the molten copper is adjusted by reduction by injecting liquefied
petroleum gas with steam into the bath. Anodes, containing approximately 99.7% copper, are cast in two casting wheels.
The smelter also can produce blister copper bars, especially when an anode furnace is undergoing general repairs.
The table below contains production information for 2021, 2020 and 2019 for our Ilo smelter plant:
  Variance 2021 -
 2020
Smelter          2021    2020    2019    Volume    %
Concentrate smelted  (kt)  
1,089.2  
1,210.6  
1,075.5  (121.4)  (10.0)%
Average copper recovery  (%)  97.4  97.4  97.4  —  —
Anode production  (kt)  309.2  346.7  318.2  (37.5)  (10.8)%
Average anode grade  (%)  99.78  99.77  99.78  0.01  —%
Blister production  kt  2.6  4.2  —  (1.6)  (38.1)%
Average blister grade  (%)  99.03  99.29  —  (0.26)  (0.26)%
Sulfuric acid produced  (kt)  
1,066.5  
1,203.9  
1,072.6  (137.4)  (11.4)%
Key: kt = thousand tonnes
The off gases from the smelter are treated to recover over 92% of the incoming sulfur received in the concentrates to
produce 98.5% sulfuric acid. The gas stream from the smelter with 11.34% SO2 is split between two plants: The No. 1
acid plant (single absorption/single contact) and the No. 2 plant (double absorption/double contact). Approximately, 16%
of the acid produced is used at our facilities with the balance sold to third parties. We anticipate that our internal usage
will be over 80% when the Tia Maria project begins operation. The smelter also has two oxygen plants. Plant No. 1, with
272 tonnes per day of production capacity, and Plant No.2, with 1,045 tonnes per day of capacity.
In 2010, the Ilo smelter marine trestle started operation. This facility allows us to offload directly to offshore ships the
sulfuric acid produced, avoiding hauling cargo through the city of Ilo. The 500 meter long marine trestle is the last part
of the Ilo smelter modernization project. Currently, all overseas shipments of sulfuric acid are shipped using the marine
trestle.
Refinery
The Ilo refinery consists of an electrolytic plant, a precious metal plant and a number of ancillary installations. The
refinery is producing grade A copper cathode of 99.998% purity. The plant was acquired in 1994 and modernized to
produce 246,000 t/a of copper cathodes. It was subsequently expanded to the current nominal capacity of 294,763 tonnes
per year. Anodic slimes are recovered from the refining process and then sent to the precious metals facility to produce
refined silver, refined gold and commercial grade selenium.
Anodes are suspended in tanks containing a solution of sulfuric acid and copper sulfate. A low voltage but high
amperage electrical current is passed through the anodes, chemical solution and cathodes to dissolve copper which is
Table of Contents
47initially deposited on very thin starting sheets until thickness is increased to produce high grade copper cathodes. During
this process, silver, gold and other metals, including palladium, platinum and selenium, along with other impurities,
settle to the bottom of the tank in the form of anodic slime. This anodic slime is processed in a precious metal plant
where silver, gold and selenium are recovered.
The table below contains production information for 2021, 2020 and 2019 for our Ilo refinery and precious metals
plants:
  Variance 2021 -
 2020
Refinery          2021    2020    2019    Volume    %
Cathodes produced  (kt)  260.2  286.3  256.7  (26.1)  (9.1)%
Average copper grade  (%)  
99.999  
99.999  
99.998  —  —%
Refined silver produced  (000 Kg)  124.0  123.4  104.0  0.6  0.5%
Refined gold produced  (kg)  215.8  227.5  258.1  (11.7)  (5.1)%
Commercial grade selenium produced  (tonnes)  48.2  52.7  55.7  (4.5)  (8.5)%
Key: kt = thousand tonnes
In addition to the processing facilities, the refinery has a production control section, a laboratory that provides sample
analysis throughout the Company, a maintenance department, a desalinization plant and other support facilities.
Other facilities in Ilo include a coquina plant with a production capacity of 200,000 tonnes of seashells per year; this
facility, however, has been declared in progressive closure. In addition, we had a lime plant with a capacity of 80,000
tonnes per year, which has suspended its operations. We also operate an industrial railroad to haul production and
supplies between Toquepala, Cuajone and Ilo.
The industrial railroad’s main equipment includes locomotives of different types and rolling stock with different types of
cars and capacities. The track runs in a single 214 kilometer standard gauge line and supports a 30-ton axle load. The
total length of the track system is around 257 kilometers including main yards and sidings. The infrastructure includes
27 kilometers of track under tunnels and one concrete bridge. The industrial railroad includes a car repair shop which is
responsible for maintaining and repairing the car fleet. Annual transported tonnage is approximately 5.9 million tonnes.
Tia Maria Project
The Tía María Project is in the District of Cocachacra, Mejia and Deán Valdivia, Province of Islay, and Arequipa Region.  
The Project is located 118 km from Moquegua, 125 km from Arequipa, 120 km from the District of Ilo, and 980 km 
from Lima. The Project centroid is at approximately 17º 00’ 21.06” S and 71º 49’ 44.94” W. The mine gate will be 
situated at Pampa Cachendo.  Mine access will be from the Pan-American Highway, diverting off the highway to the 
Project access road at km 1027–1028, between Arequipa and Moquegua, approximately 17 km before the town of El 
Fiscal.
The Project covers an area of 34.689.6 hectares in 55 concessions. We have easement agreements in place that cover the
proposed powerline route and the planned water pipeline that will run from the envisaged desalination plant to the mine.
Additionally, the project currently holds no water rights and the mine plan assumes that water for process operations will
be sourced from a desalination plant. The project envisions a 120,000 ton annual SX-EW plant and the mine plans
assume conventional open pit mining methods from the La Tapada and Tia Maria deposits.
The property is currently under the development stage. From 1994 through 1999, prior to involvement by Southern
Copper, the Tia Maria Project area was evaluated by Teck Corporation, Phelps Dodge and Rio Tinto. We acquired the
project in 2003, and we were granted the construction permit on July 2019. Additionally, on October 2019, the Mining
Council of the Peruvian Ministry of Energy and Mines ratified the construction permit for the Tia Maria project. We
expect the Peruvian government to acknowledge the significant progress the project has made on the social front and the
important contributions that Tia Maria will generate for Peru´s economy and, consequently, take the necessary steps to
provide SCC with adequate support to initiate construction.
Table of Contents
48Geology
The La Tapada and Tía Maria deposits are within the northwest–southeast-trending Tambo–El Toro structural corridor
that appears to be a large dextral shear zone. There are a number of vein-hosted copper–gold–hematite deposits also
associated with the corridor, outside our mineral tenure package. Alteration within the project area is associated with the
two porphyry systems currently outlined. The only known mineralization is derived from oxidation of low-grade
porphyry copper systems.
Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of copper mineral resources for the La Tapada and Tia Maria deposits as of
December 31, 2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.80 per pound:
La Tapada     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Measured mineral resources  —  —%  —%  —
Indicated mineral resources   90.4  0.21 %  69%  420.3
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  90.4  0.21 %  69%  420.3
Inferred mineral resources  1.6  0.18 %  69%  6.4
Tia Maria     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Measured mineral resources  —  —%  —%  —
Indicated mineral resources   35.5  0.17 %  65%  135.2
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  35.5  0.17 %  65%  135.2
Inferred mineral resources  21.8  0.22 %  65%  107.8
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021. Figures have been rounded.
(2) Mineral resources are reported exclusive of mineral reserves.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the Tia Maria project
technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.3 to this Form 10-K.
Mineral reserves
The following table contains the summary of copper mineral reserves for the La Tapada and Tia Maria deposits as of
December 31, 2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.30 per pound:
La Tapada     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Proven mineral reserves  —  —%  —%  —
Probable mineral reserves   487.6  0.41 %  69%  4,449.2
Total mineral reserves  487.6  0.41 %  69%  4,449.2
Tia Maria     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Proven mineral reserves  —  —%  —%  —
Probable mineral reserves   223.8  0.29 %  65%  1,412.5
Total mineral reserves  223.8  0.29 %  65%  1,412.5
(1) Mineral reserves are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) The reference point for the estimate is delivery to the process plant.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 12 of the Tia Maria project
technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.3 to this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
49Los Chancas Project
The Los Chancas project is located in the Andes Range in southern Peru. The site is approximately 65 km southwest of 
the city of Abancay in the Department of Apurimac, Peru at coordinates 14° 9.904’S, 73° 6.608’W. The project site can 
be accessed using a Highway 1, a paved road, from Lima to Nazca (460 km), from Nazca to Santa Rosa (250 km), using 
road 30A, and a gravel road from Santa Rosa to the Project site (32 km). Alternatively, access is available from Cuzco, 
via paved road, to Santa Rosa (170 km), and uses the same gravel road from Santa Rosa to the Project site (32 km). 
Access within the project area is via gravel roads.  
The closest airport is at Cuzco, which is served by daily flights from Lima (approximately one hour flying time). There
are a number of port options that may be available to the project for concentrate shipment. These include San Juan de
Marcona (approximately 500 km by road), General San Martin at Pisco (about 640–800 km depending on the road route)
and Matarani (about 600–750 km depending on the road route).
  
The project covers 22,700 hectares in 31 concessions. Surface rights are currently being negotiated. The area where
surface rights are required is within the Tiaparo and Tapairíhua rural community boundaries. Additionally, we hold two
water rights that cover water from four spring sources.
The property is currently under the exploration stage. We commenced exploration in the Los Chancas area in 1997. The
initial Environmental Assessment of the Los Chancas Project was conducted in 2001 and updated in 2008. A semi-
detailed environmental impact assessment was completed in 2010. Additionally, we completed baseline studies from
2012 through 2020 and have community initiatives in place in the project area of influence. Los Chancas envisions an
open-pit mine with a combined operation of concentrator and SX-EW processes.
Geology
The Los Chancas deposit is considered to be an example of a porphyry copper–molybdenum deposit. The deposit is 
about 1,200 m in diameter, extends for at least 1,000 m at depth, and most drill holes bottom in mineralization. The 
deposit remains open to the southeast and at depth.  Sedimentary rocks of the Jurassic–Cretaceous Ferrobamba, Mara, 
Soraya, and Chuquibambilla Formations form a north-facing anticline that is eroded along the axial plane. The sediments 
were intruded by three generations of monzonite intrusion.
Mineralization is hosted by quartz monzonite and surrounding quartzite and siltstone country rocks. Sulfide 
mineralization consists of hypogene chalcopyrite, bornite, molybdenite, and pyrite.  Sulfides are hosted in quartz veins, 
occur as small sulfide streaks/veins, or form disseminations in the intrusive and sedimentary rocks. This primary 
mineralization was oxidized and leached, and a zone of supergene enrichment developed.  The major area of leaching is 
to the east, and vertically above, the primary mineralized zone. The oxide zone is sub-parallel to topography.  
Brochantite and chrysocolla are the dominant copper oxide minerals, with subordinate azurite and malachite. Sulfide 
minerals within the supergene enrichment zone include chalcocite, covellite, digenite, cuprite, and native copper.  
Copper oxides are also present as a minor constituent.
Table of Contents
50Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of copper mineral resources for Los Chancas as of December 31, 2021, based
on long-term price assumptions of $3.80 per pound:
Copper     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Measured mineral resources  —  —%  — %  —
Indicated mineral resources   150  0.50 % 82 - 84 %  1,648
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  150  0.50 % 82 - 84 %  1,648
Inferred mineral resources  1,433  0.45 % 82 - 84 %  14,165
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the Los Chancas
project technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.4 to this Form 10-K.
Michiquillay Project
The Michiquillay project is located in the Western Cordillera of the Andes in northwest Peru, approximately 45 km from
Cajamarca and 900 km northeast of Lima. The main access route to the Project is via road from Cajamarca. Initially, the
paved Route 8B is used from Cajamarca to the town of La Encañada, a distance of approximately 33 km. A gravel road
is then used from La Encañada to the project site, approximately 14 km. The communities of Michiquillay and Encañada
are 2 km and 14 km from the project, respectively. Access within the project is via various gravel and two-track roads
that link areas where drilling is planned.The closest airport is at Cajamarca, which is serviced by regular flights from
Lima.
The Michiquillay Project consists of 18 mining concessions with a total area of 4,051.4 hectares. The Michiquillay
deposit is located on lands of the Michiquillay Rural Community and the Encañada Rural Community. We have signed
surface land use agreements with both communities which allow us to conduct exploration activities. Permits for the use
of water for exploration purposes are currently being processed by the National Water Authority and the Marañon Local
Authority.
The property is currently under the exploration stage. Previous work in the project was conducted by Northern Peru 
Mining Company, American Smelting and Refining Company, later Asarco LLC, Minero Peru S.A., and various Anglo 
American subsidiaries. In June 2018, Southern Copper purchased the project from Activos Mineros S.A.C. for a total 
purchase price of US$400 million and made an initial payment of $12.5 million. In June 2021, we paid an additional 
$12.5 million. The remaining balance of $375 million will be paid if we decide to develop the project. In 2021, we 
signed Social Agreements with the Michiquillay and La Encañada communities.  Additionally, on October 1, 2021 the 
Peruvian Ministry of Energy and Mines approved the semi-detailed Environmental Impact Study for the project.
Geology
The Michiquillay deposit is considered to be an example of a porphyry copper–molybdenum–gold deposit. The project 
is located within a northwest–southeast-oriented metallogenetic corridor of the Andes, that hosts several porphyry 
copper deposits in the Cajamarca region. Those deposits are characterized by calc-alkaline magmatic rocks covered by 
folded and faulted sedimentary formations.  Mineralization is zoned vertically due to oxidation and remobilization of 
copper by supergene processes.  
The porphyry mineralization and the porphyritic intrusion at Michiquillay appear to be related to, and controlled by, a
regional-scale strike change on a series of pre-mineral west–northwest to northwest striking brittle–ductile fault zones.
The porphyry intrusions appear to be controlled by intense, concentrated extension on releasing bends, splays, overlaps
in dextral fault segments and on the margins of brittle fault zones with development of multiple extensional phases in
stockworks, synthetic/antithetic extensional faults and extensional duplexes.
Table of Contents
51Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of copper mineral resources for Michiquillay as of December 31, 2021, based
on long-term price assumptions of $3.80 per pound:
Copper     Amount (million
tonnes)     Grades     Metallurgical
recoveryMetal content
(million pounds)
Measured mineral resources  —  —%  —%  —
Indicated mineral resources   —  —%  —%  —
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  —  —%  —%  —
Inferred mineral resources  2,288.0  0.43 %  85%  21,554.8
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the Michiquillay
project technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.5 to this Form 10-K.
MEXICAN OPERATIONS
The map below indicates the approximate locations of our Mexican mines and processing facilities:

Table of Contents
52MEXICAN OPEN-PIT SEGMENT
Our Mexican open-pit segment operations combine two units of Minera Mexico, La Caridad and Buenavista, which
include La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and smelting and refining plants and support facilities, which
service both complexes.
The map below indicates the approximate location of, and access to, our Mexican open-pit mine complexes and our
processing facilities:
We have ongoing maintenance and improvement programs to ensure the satisfactory performance of our equipment. We
believe all our Mexican open-pit segment equipment is in good physical condition and suitable for our operations.
Table of Contents
53Buenavista
The Buenavista mining unit operates an open-pit porphyry copper mine, two concentrators and three SX-EW plants. It is
located within the Cananea mining district in the north-central part of the State of Sonora, Mexico. The property is
located about 222 kilometers northeast of the city of Hermosillo, Sonora and 150 kilometers southeast of the city of
Tucson, Arizona. The property covers an area of 89,220.5 hectares of mining concessions. The elevation of the mine is
of the order of 1,604 meters above mean sea level.
The Buenavista del Cobre (“BVC”) deposit is divided into two pit areas, namely BVC and Buenavista Zinc (“BVZ”).
The BVZ pit area lies within the largest BVC pit. Buenavista is connected by paved highways to the border city of Agua
Prieta to the northeast, to the town of Nacozari in the southeast and to the town of Imuris to the west. Buenavista is also
connected by railway to Agua Prieta and Nogales. A municipal airport is located approximately 20 kilometers to the
northeast of Buenavista. All required fixed and permanent infrastructure of power, pipelines and primary roadways, and
Project access are established. Drainage, water controls and mine access roads are established for current operations and
will be expanded and continued as the pit progresses through its planned life of operations.
In 2016 we concluded our $3.5 billion investment program in Mexico. The program included a third SX-EW plant,
which was completed in June 2014 with a rated annual capacity of 120,000 tonnes of copper and a new concentrator,
completed in 2015, with an annual copper production capacity of 188,000 tonnes. The program also included two
molybdenum plants with a combined annual capacity of 4,600 tonnes. The first plant was completed in 2013 and the
second in 2016. Additionally, the program included the Crushing, Conveying and Spreading System for Leachable Ore
(Quebalix IV), which was completed on time and under budget and is currently operating steadily. This project will
reduce mining costs and increase SX-EW copper recovery, allowing the Buenavista unit to reach its copper production
capacity of 500,000 tonnes.
The original concentrator currently has a nominal milling capacity of 82,000 tonnes per day. The second concentrator
began operations in 2016 and currently has a nominal milling capacity of 115,000 tonnes per day. The SX-EW facilities
have a cathode production capacity of 174,470 tonnes per year. The Buenavista ore body is considered one of the
world’s largest porphyry copper deposits. Buenavista is the oldest continuously operated copper mine in North America,
with operations dating back to 1899. High grade ore deposits in the district were mined exclusively using underground
methods. The Anaconda Company acquired the property in 1917. In the early 1940s, Anaconda started developing the
first open-pit in Buenavista. In 1990, through a public auction procedure, Minera Mexico acquired 100% of the
Buenavista mining assets for $475 million. Buenavista is currently applying conventional open-pit mining methods to
extract copper ore for further processing in the concentrator. Additionally, a new zinc concentrator is under construction,
which will increase milling capacity and will allow us to recover zinc, along with copper and molybdenum contents.
This new zinc plant is expected to begin operations in 2023.
Table of Contents
54The following table contains production information for 2021, 2020 and 2019 for Buenavista:
2021 - 2020  
Variance  
        2021     2020     2019     Volume    %  
Mine annual operating days      365  366  365      
Mine:               
Total ore mined  (kt) 74,234  72,895   70,323  1,339  1.8%
Copper grade  (%) 0.527  0.527   0.554  —  —%
Leach material mined  (kt) 139,070  128,1 18  141,096  10,952  8.5%
Leach material grade  (%) 0.196  0.211  0.216  (0.015)  (7.1)%
Stripping ratio  (x)  0.52  0.29   0.37  0.23  79.3%
Total material mined  (kt) 324,860  259,860   288,882  65,000  25.0%
Concentrator:          
Total material milled  (kt) 74,302  73,01 1  70,371  1,291  1.8%
Copper recovery  (%) 87.18  86.72   86.66  0.46  0.5%
Copper concentrate  (kt) 1,464.9  1,398.4   1,420.5  66.5  4.8%
Copper in concentrate  (kt) 341.0  334.0   338.0  7.0  2.1%
Copper concentrate average grade  (%) 23.28  23.88   23.80  (0.6)  (2.5)%
SX‑EW plant          
Estimated leach recovery  (%)  65.00  66.00  62.00  (1.00)  (1.5)%
SX‑EW cathode production  (kt)  81.8  98.2  100.1  (16.4)  (16.7)%
Molybdenum          
Molybdenum grade  (%) 0.01  0.011  0.013  (0.001)  (9.1)%
Molybdenum recovery  (%) 68.97  67.26   65.63  1.71  2.5%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt) 10.21  10.44   11.80  (0.23)  (2.2)%
Molybdenum concentrate average grade (%) 51.22  52.39   51.83  (1.17)  (2.2)%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt) 5.23  5.47   6.12  (0.24)  (4.4)%
Key: kt = thousand tonnes
x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste by leachable material plus ore mined.
The copper and molybdenum grade are total grade.
Geology
The Cananea mining district lies within the eastern section of the Sonora Basin and Range Province of northern Mexico.
Sustained magmatic activity along the North American Cordillera during the late Mesozoic through Paleogene resulted
in the development of numerous porphyry copper deposits. The Precambrian Cananea basement rocks are overlain by
several Paleozoic sedimentary units ranging from the Cambrian Capote Quartzite through thick limestone sequence of
Upper Paleozoic age. Overlying the Paleozoic sediments and Precambrian granite of Cananea are the Henrietta and
Elenita formations which are Triassic to late Jurassic in age and are comprised of volcanic rocks of latite to andesite
composition. The youngest volcanic units in the district are andesitic tuffs and rhyolites of the Mesa formation.
The intrusions of diorite, granodiorite and quartz monzonite formed after the emplacement of the Mesa Formation. In the
final stage of intrusive activity, diabase dikes intruded faults and fractures with a NW-SE trend. Pipe-like breccias
formed as late-stage products of the quartz-monzonite porphyries. During the Cenozoic, alluvian and fluvial sediments
were deposited as erosion of the Cananea Mountains occurred. Exhumation of the upper part of the Cananea minig
district porphyry system resulted in the formation of a supergene enrichment and an oxidation overburden overlying the
porphyry system.
Table of Contents
55Concentrator
Buenavista uses state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems at the concentrators, the crushing plant and the flotation
circuit in order to coordinate inflows and optimize operations. In the original concentrator, material with a copper grade
above a cut-off grade of approximately 0.30% is currently loaded onto trucks and sent to the milling circuit, where giant
rotating crushers reduce the size of the ore to approximately one-half of an inch. The ore is then sent to the ball mills,
which grind it to the consistency of fine powder. The finely ground powder is agitated in a water and reagents solution
and is then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the cells producing a froth, which carries the copper mineral
to the surface but not the waste rock, or tailings. Recovered copper, with the consistency of froth, is filtered and dried to
produce copper concentrates with an average copper content of approximately 24%. Concentrates are then shipped by
rail to the smelter at La Caridad.
In the second concentrator, material with a copper grade above a cut-off grade of aprroximately 0.30% is sent to a three-
phase milling circuit, where the ore size is reduced to approximately one-half inch. The ore is then sent to a circuit of six
ball mills, which grind it to the consistency of fine powder. The finely ground powder is agitated in a water and reagents
solution and is then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the cells producing a froth, which carries the copper
mineral to the surface but not the waste rock, or tailings. Recovered copper, with the consistency of froth, is filtered and
dried to produce copper concentrates with an average copper content of approximately 24%. Concentrates are then sent
by trucks or by railroad to the La Caridad smelter or to the Guaymas port, at Sonora, for export.
The current cut-off grade assumptions used on site for both concentrator 1 and 2 and material assigned for leach is
recommended to be reassessed. The mineral reserves reported for Buenavista have been estimated by determining
economic value of each block containing mineral resource. This takes into account the potential revenue of the block
whether it is processed in a concentrator or on the leach pad along with the downstream selling costs. The approximate
cut-off grade for the concentrators is estimated to be 0.11% copper and the approximate cut-off grade for the leachable
material is estimated to be 0.05% copper. The approximate cut-off grade for the zinc concentrator (once it has been
constructed) was estimated to be 0.22% copper equivalent.
As part of the expansion program for this unit, in 2013 we completed the construction of the first molybdenum plant
with an annual production capacity of 2,000 tonnes of molybdenum contained in concentrate. The plant was designed to
process 1,500 tonnes of copper-molybdenum concentrates per day with a content recovery of approximately 80% copper
and 50% molybdenum. The molybdenum plant consists of thickeners, homogenizer tanks, flotation cells, column cells
and a holo-flite dryer. The second molybdenum plant was designed to process 3,040 tonnes of copper-molybdenum
concentrates per day for a content recovery between 80% and 87% for copper and 60% for molybdenum. The plant
generated its first production lot in July 2016 and fully initiated operations in November 2016.
SX-EW Plant
The Buenavista unit operates a leaching facility and three SX-EW plants. All copper ore with a grade lower than the mill
cut-off grade of 0.30%, but higher than 0.15%, is delivered to the leach dumps. A cycle of leaching and resting occurs
for approximately five years in the run-of-mine dumps and three years for the crushed leach material. A review of the
cut-off grades based on economics is recommended to be reassessed as described above..
There are three irrigation systems for the dumps and eleven dams for the pregnant leach solution (PLS). Plant I has four
solvent extraction tanks with a nominal capacity of 18,000 liters per minute of PLS and 54 electrowinning cells and has
a daily production capacity of 30 tonnes of copper cathodes with 99.999% purity. Plant II has five trains of solvent
extraction with a nominal capacity of 62,000 liters per minute of PLS and 220 cells distributed in two bays and has a
daily production capacity of 120 tonnes of copper cathodes with 99.9% purity. Plant III has three trains of solvent
extraction with a nominal capacity of 167,100 liters per minute of PLS and 270 cells distributed in two bays and has a
daily production capacity of 328 tonnes of copper cathodes with 99.9% purity. The plant produces copper cathodes of
LME grade A.
Table of Contents
56Slope stability
At the Buenavista mine, we are following the recommendations produced by a geotechnical evaluation of the design
slope for the 15-year pit plan. This evaluation was prepared by an independent mine consulting firm. The assessment
included the determination of optimum pit slope design angles and bench design parameters for the proposed mine plan.
The objective of the study was: (1) to determine optimum inter-ramp slope angles and bench design parameters for the
15-year plan and (2) to identify and analyze any potential major instability that could adversely impact mine operation.
In 2012, we installed a radar system to monitor the walls of the mine.
The following recommendations were made for the Buenavista mine: inter-ramp slope design angles for the 15-year pit
plan for all of the 21 design sectors defined on a rock-fabric-based catch bench analysis, using double bench, can range
from 48° and 55°, and the inter-ramp slope angles are based on geometries obtained from the back-break analysis using
80% reliability of achieving the required 7.6 meter catch bench width for a single bench configuration and 10.6 meter
catch bench width for a double bench configuration. Preliminary observations suggest the 15-year pit walls may be
relatively free-draining; the back-break analysis assumed depressurized conditions of mine benches, and the inter-ramp
stability analysis were performed for both saturated and depressurized conditions.
A pit dewatering/depressurization plan for the Buenavista mine was also recommended to address the issues of open-pit
drainage, dewatering plan and future slope depressurization. Phase I of the geohydrological study was completed by an
independent consultant. The analysis included a preliminary assessment and work plan implementation.
Between 2011 and 2014, we conducted well drilling and dewatering programs to ensure the ability to continue with the
mining plan. We also executed a geophysical study to determine the best locations for water extraction wells and
continued collecting new geotechnical information from two exploration drilling projects. Following the
recommendations of the geotechnical evaluation, we continued monitoring the walls using the radar system.
Various studies are now being conducted by outside specialized consultants to establish long-range mine water
management objectives and implement recommendations for the efficient use of this resource. We are also conducting a
geotechnical study and a diamond drilling program with an independent consulting firm in order to obtain additional
geotechnical information, which will allow us to verify the slope stability for the long-term mine plan. In addition, slope
monitoring continues with the SSR 160 radar.
In July 2020, the OMNI 505 radar began operating. As such, we currently have two working radars, which allow us to
cover 95% of the slopes in the operating areas of the mine. In 2021, we acquired two pieces of equipment for additional
monitoring and began developing a geotechnical study for the mine with the support of a specialized consulting firm. We
expect to conclude this study in 2022 to optimize the slopes in the long term.
Table of Contents
57Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of copper, molybdenum and zinc mineral resources for Buenavista as of
December 31, 2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.80, $11.50 and $1.32 per pound, respectively:
Copper plant     Amount
(million
tonnes)    Copper
grades    Molybdenum
gradesZinc
gradesContained copper
(thousand tonnes) Contained
molybdenum
(thousand tonnes)Contained zinc
(thousand tonnes)
Measured mineral
resources  —  —%  —%  —%  —  —  —
Indicated mineral
resources   944  0.38 %  0.005 % 0.07 %  3,580  51  657
Measured + Indicated
mineral resources  944  0.38 %  0.005 % 0.07 %  3,580  51  657
Inferred mineral
resources  14,467  0.21 %  0.004 % 0.03 %  30,442  590  4,305
Zinc plant     Amount
(million
tonnes)    Copper
grades    Molybdenum
gradesZinc
gradesContained copper
(thousand tonnes)Contained
molybdenum
(thousand tonnes)Contained zinc
(thousand tonnes)
Measured mineral
resources  —  —%  —%  —%  —  —  —
Indicated mineral
resources   183  0.46 %  0.002 % 0.78 %  847  3  1,419
Measured + Indicated
mineral resources  183  0.46 %  0.002 % 0.78 %  847  3  1,419
Inferred mineral
resources  194  0.43 %  0.003 % 0.49 %  830  6  953
Leach plant     Amount
(million
tonnes)    Copper
grades    Molybdenum
gradesZinc
gradesContained copper
(thousand tonnes)Contained
molybdenum
(thousand tonnes)Contained zinc
(thousand tonnes)
Measured mineral
resources  —  —  —%  —%  —  —  —
Indicated mineral
resources   82  0.13 %  —%  —%  104  —  —
Measured + Indicated
mineral resources  82  0.13 %  —%  —%  104  —  —
Inferred mineral
resources  3,812  0.14 %  —%  —%  5,398  —  —
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) Mineral resources are reported exclusive of mineral reserves.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the Buenavista del
Cobre technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.6 to this Form 10-K.
Mineral reserves
The following table contains the summary of copper, molybdenum and zinc mineral reserves for Buenavista as of
December 31, 2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.30, $10.00 and $1.15 per pound, respectively:
Probable mineral r eserves     Amount
(million
tonnes)    Copper grades    Molybdenum
grades  Zinc
gradesContained
copper
(million
pounds) Contained
molybdenum
(million
pounds)Contained
zinc
(million
pounds)
Sulfide ROM Ore -
Copper plant  2,104  0.36%  0.007%  —%  16,881  343  —
Sulfide ROM Ore - Zinc
plant   68  0.36%  —%  1.40 %  531  —  2,097
Sulfide ROM Ore - Total  2,172  0.36%  —%  —%  17,412  343  2,097
Leachable Ore  1,126  0.22%  —%  —%  5,506  —  —
(1) Mineral reserves are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) The reference point for the estimate is delivery to the process plant.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 12 of the Buenavista
operations technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.6 to this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
58La Caridad
The La Caridad complex includes an open-pit mine, concentrator, smelter, copper refinery, precious metals refinery, rod
plant, SX-EW plant, lime plant and two sulfuric acid plants.
La Caridad mine and mill are located about 23 kilometers southeast of the town of Nacozari in northeastern Sonora at an
average altitude of 1,500 meters above mean sea level. Nacozari is about 266 kilometers northeast of the Sonora state
capital of Hermosillo and 125 kilometers south of the U.S.—Mexico border. Nacozari is connected by paved highway
with Hermosillo and Agua Prieta and by rail with the international port of Guaymas, and the Mexican and United States
rail systems. An airstrip with a reported runway length of 2,500 meters is located 36 kilometers north of Nacozari, less
than one kilometer away from the La Caridad copper smelter and refinery. The smelter and the sulfuric acid plants, as
well as the refineries and rod plant, are located approximately 24 kilometers from the mine. Access is by paved highway
and by railroad.
The mining claims held by La Caridad unit cover an area of about 103,821 hectares for exploration and exploitation
activities. Surface rights are held by a combination of private ownership and agreements with local ejidos. Ejidos are
agrarian land grants held by a group of people. The agreements allow for exploration and mining activities. The La
Caridad complex imports natural gas from the United States through its pipeline (between Douglas, Arizona and
Nacozari, Sonora). The electrical power is supplied to site from the utility grid via 230 kV overhead transmission lines.
The bulk of demand is supplied by MGE, a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico. The primary fresh water source is the La
Angostura Dam located approximately 29km to the northeast of the La Caridad mine.
The ore at La Caridad is recovered using open-pit conventional truck and shovel mining methods due to the proximity of
the ore to the surface and the physical characteristics of the deposit. The concentrator began operations in 1979; the
molybdenum plant was added in 1982 and the smelter in 1986; the first sulfuric acid plant was added in 1988 and the
SX-EW plant in 1995; the second sulfuric acid plant was added in 1997 and the copper refinery in 1997; the rod plant
was added in 1998 and the precious metals refinery in 1999; and the dust and effluents plant was incorporated in 2012.
Table of Contents
59The table below contains production information for 2021, 2020 and 2019 for La Caridad:
Variance  
2021 - 2020  
        2021     2020     2019     Volume    %  
Mine annual operating days      365  366  365      
Mine               
Total ore mined  (kt)  34,876  34,949  34,401  (73)  (0.2)%
Copper grade  (%)  0.340  0.361  0.356  (0.021)  (5.8)%
Leach material mined  (kt)  35,230  29,561  28,457  5,669  19.2%
Leach material grade  (%)  0.212  0.220  0.224  (0.008)  (3.6)%
Stripping ratio  (x)  0.43  0.45  0.50  (0.02)  (4.4)%
Total material mined  (kt)  100,412  93,373  94,578  7,039  7.5%
Concentrator          
Total material milled  (kt)  34,929  34,858  34,648  71  0.2%
Copper recovery  (%)  86.44  87.14  86.80  (0.70)  (0.8)%
Copper concentrate  (kt)  456.8  473.1  446.2  (16.3)  (3.4)%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)  102.7  109.7  107.2  (7.0)  (6.4)%
Copper concentrate average grade  (%)  22.48  23.18  24.01  (0.70)  (3.0)%
SX‑EW plant          
Estimated leach recovery  (%)  38.11  38.04  38.06  0.07  0.2%
SX‑EW cathode production  (kt)  25.38  25.85  25.93  (0.47)  (1.8)%
Molybdenum          
Molybdenum grade  (%)  0.035  0.036  0.036  (0.001)  (2.8)%
Molybdenum recovery  (%)  82.44  82.82  82.17  (0.38)  (0.5)%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt)  18.9  19.3  18.8  (0.4)  (2.1)%
Molybdenum concentrate average grade (%)  53.92  54.48  54.26  (0.6)  (1.0)%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt)  10.2  10.5  10.2  (0.3)  (2.9)%
Key: kt = thousand tonnes
x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste by leachable material plus ore mined
The copper and molybdenum grade are total grade.
Geology
La Caridad is a porphyry copper deposit, that is currently the largest copper producer in Mexico and the youngest dated
porphyry copper system in the American Southwest region. The La Caridad district lies within the eastern section of the
Sonora Basin and Range Province of northern Mexico. Sustained magmatic activity along the North American Cordillera
during the late Mesozoic through Paleogene resulted in the development of numerous porphyry copper deposits. The
basement rocks of area consist of strongly deformed greenschist-grade volcanic and sedimentary rocks that are intruded
by granites emplaced at 1.4 and 1.1 billion years ago. Above the sequence Late Proterozoic and Paelozoic rocks are
overlain by volcanic and plutonic rocks of Mesozoic and Cenozoic age. Middle Jurassic rocks characterized by volcanic
and volcano-sedimentary sequences, with occasional granite intrusions, outcrop in the northern and northeastern portion
of Sonora. In the La Caridad district, these rocks outcrop in the Sierra Cobriza area, west of the town of Nacozari.
The main mineralization at La Caridad occurs in the Quartz-monzonite porphyry and hydrothermal breccias. The host
rock at La Caridad are andesites, with the oldest rocks corresponding to the Laramide volcanic rocks, which are
regionally correlated with the Tarahumara Formation. Locally, this andesitic volcanic sequence was intruded by a
granodiorite which is well exposed to the east-southeast of the La Caridad mine, which are in turn intruded by diorite
dikes that range from fine to coarse grain. Discordantly overlying this igneous complex is a sequence of rhyolitic flows.
Table of Contents
60Concentrator
La Caridad uses state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems at the concentrator, the crushing plant and the flotation
circuit to coordinate inflows and optimize operations. The concentrator has a current capacity of 94,500 tonnes of ore per
day.
Ore extracted from the mine with a copper grade over 0.30% is currently sent to the concentrator and processed into
copper concentrates and molybdenum concentrates. The copper concentrates are sent to the smelter and the molybdenum
concentrate is sold to a Mexican customer. The molybdenum recovery plant has a capacity of 2,000 tonnes per day of
copper-molybdenum concentrates. The lime plant has a capacity of 340 tonnes of finished product per day.
The mineral reserves estimated for La Caridad were estimated utilizing an economic cut-off to assign material to either
the concentrator or leach pad. Each block in the mineral resource model is assigned an economic value based on the total
potential revenue whether the block is processed in the concentrator or on a leach pad and takes into account the various
recoveries, selling costs, and payability. The resulting cut-off grade for the concentrator is approximately 0.08% copper
and the leachable cutoff grade is approximately 0.01% copper.
SX-EW Plant
Approximately 953.8 million tonnes of leaching ore with an average grade of approximately 0.24% copper was extracted
from the La Caridad open-pit mine and deposited in leaching dumps through December 31, 2021. All copper ore with a
grade lower than the current mill cut-off grade 0.30%, but higher than 0.15% copper, is at present delivered to the
leaching dumps. In 1995, we completed the construction of a SX-EW facility at La Caridad that has allowed us to
process this ore and certain leach mineral reserves that were not mined; this has led to a subsequent reduction in our
copper production costs. The SX-EW facility has an annual design capacity of 21,900 tonnes of copper cathodes. These
cut-off grades need to be re-assessed as the mineral reserves stated were estimated utilizing an economic cut-off value.
The plant has three trains of solvent extraction with a nominal capacity of 2,400 cubic meters per hour and has 94
electrowinning cells, which are distributed in a single electrolytic bay. The plant has a daily production capacity of 65
tonnes of copper cathodes with 99.999% purity.
Slope stability
In 2004, our 15-year mine plan study for the La Caridad mine was awarded to an independent consulting firm to conduct
a geotechnical evaluation. The purpose of the plan was to develop a program of optimum bench design and inter-ramp
slope angles for the open-pit. The results of the evaluation presented by the consultants included a recommendation of a
maximum average bench face angle of 72 degrees. Additionally, single benching was recommended for the upper
sections of the west, south and east walls of the main pit. Double benching was recommended for the lower levels of the
main pit and single benching for the upper slope segments that consist of either alluvial material, mine waste dumps or
mineralized stockpile material. Alternatively, slopes in these types of materials, may be designed with an overall 37-
degree slope. The geostructural and geotechnical parameters recommended were applied in the pit design for the new
life of mine plan for La Caridad mine, which was prepared in 2015. This mine plan replaced the 15-year mine plan
prepared in 2010. However, since final pit limits have yet to be established at La Caridad, all current pit walls are
effectively working slopes. Geostructural and geotechnical data collected at the open-pit mine from cell-mapping and
oriented-core drilling databases provided the basis for the geotechnical evaluation and recommendations.
In 2019, we assigned an independent consulting firm to conduct a geotechnical study of La Caridad, which included the
Bella Union area, based on a 15-year mining plan. The results of this study included recommendations on geostructural
and geotechnical parameters. These were applied to the pit design for the new mine plan for La Caridad, which replaced
the 15-year mine plan prepared in 2015. A hydrogeological study was also recommended to determine the distribution of
pore pressure. In September 2021, the SSR-OMNI and the SSR-FX radars began operating. These two working radars
will allow us to cover up to 80% of the slopes in the operating areas of the mine.
Table of Contents
61Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of copper and molybdenum mineral resources for La Caridad as of December
31, 2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.80 and $11.50 per pound, respectively:
Leach process     Amount (million
tonnes)     Copper grades    Molybdenum
gradesContained
copper
(million
tonnes)  Contained
molybdenum
(million
tonnes)
Measured mineral resources  —  —%  — %  —  —
Indicated mineral resources   817  0.06 %  — %  0.5  —
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  817  0.06 %  — %  0.5  —
Inferred mineral resources  927  0.06 %  — %  0.6  —
Mill process     Amount (million
tonnes)     Copper grades    Molybdenum
gradesContained
copper
(million
tonnes)Contained
molybdenum
(million
tonnes)
Measured mineral resources  —  —%  — %  —  —
Indicated mineral resources   6,455  0.17 %  0.026 %  10.8  1.68
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  6,455  0.17 %  0.026 %  10.8  1.68
Inferred mineral resources  4,039  0.13 %  0.025 %  5.1  1.01
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) Mineral resources are reported exclusive of mineral reserves.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the La Caridad
operations technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.7 to this Form 10-K.
Mineral reserves
The following table contains the summary of copper and molybdenum mineral reserves for La Caridad as of December
31, 2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.30 and $10.00 per pound, respectively. When comparing our 
mineral reserves for La Caridad as of December 31, 2021, it should be noted that, due to the absence of pre-feasibility 
level studies for life-of-line tailing capacity, certain of our mineral resources could not be converted to mineral reserves.  
Consequently, our reserves as of December 31, 2021 included in this report may not be easily comparable to those 
reported in prior years. Once such studies are completed, we expect to be able to add these resources back to the reserve 
category later this year.
Probable mineral r eserves     Amount (million
tonnes)     Copper grades    Molybdenum
grades  Contained
copper
(million
pounds)  Contained
molybdenum
(million
pounds)
Leach process  43  0.09%  — %  81  —
Mill process   372  0.24%  0.02 %  1,955  185
(1) Mineral reserves are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) The reference point for the estimate is the leach pad or concentrator .
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 12 of the La Caridad
operations technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.7 to this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
62Processing Facilities—La Caridad
Our La Caridad complex includes a smelter, an electrolytic copper refinery, a precious metal refinery, a copper rod plant
and an effluent and dust treatment plant. The distance between this complex and the La Caridad mine is approximately
24 kilometers.
Smelter
Copper concentrates from Buenavista, Santa Barbara, Charcas and La Caridad are transported by rail and truck to the La
Caridad smelter where they are processed and cast into copper anodes of 99.2% purity. Sulfur dioxide off-gases collected
from the flash furnace, the El Teniente converter and conventional converters are processed into sulfuric acid at two
sulfuric acid plants. Approximately 2% to 3% of this acid is used by our SX-EW plants and the balance is sold to third
parties.
All of the anodes produced in the smelter are sent to the La Caridad copper refinery. The actual installed capacity of the
smelter is 1,000,000 tonnes per year, a capacity that is sufficient to treat all the concentrates of La Caridad and almost
40.5% of total production of the OMIMSA I and OMIMSA II concentrators from Buenavista. In 2010, the smelter also
began processing concentrates from the IMMSA mines, as we closed the San Luis Potosi smelter.
Other facilities in the smelter include two sulfuric acid plants with capacities of 2,625 and 2,135 tonnes per day, three
oxygen plants each with a production capacity of 275 tonnes per day; and one power turbine which generates 11.5 MWh.
Refinery
La Caridad includes an electrolytic copper refinery that uses permanent cathode technology. The installed capacity of the
refinery is 300,000 tonnes per year. The refinery consists of an anode plant with a preparation area, an electrolytic plant
with an electrolytic cell house with 1,115 cells and 32 liberator cells, two cathode stripping machines, an anode washing
machine, a slime treatment plant and a number of ancillary installations. The refinery is producing grade A (LME) and
grade 1 (COMEX) copper cathode of 99.99% purity. Anodic slimes are recovered from the refining process and sent to
the slime treatment plant, where additional copper is extracted. The slimes are then filtered, dried, packed and shipped to
the La Caridad precious metals refinery to produce silver and gold.
Precious Metals Plant
The operations at the precious metal refinery begin with the reception of anodic slimes, which are dried in a steam dryer.
After this, the dried slime is smelted and a gold and silver alloy is obtained, which is known as Dore. The precious metal
refinery plant has a hydrometallurgical stage and a pyrometallurgical stage, in addition to a steam dryer, Dore casting
system, Kaldo furnace, 20 electrolytic cells in the silver refinery, one induction furnace for fine silver, one silver ingot
casting system and two reactors for obtaining fine gold. The process ends with the refining of the gold and silver alloy.
We also recover commercial selenium from the gas produced by the Kaldo furnace process.
Copper Rod Plant
A rod plant at the La Caridad complex began operations in 1998 and reached its full annual operating capacity of
150,000 tonnes in 1999. The plant is producing eight-millimeter copper rods with a purity of 99.99%.
Effluent and Dust Treatment Plant
In 2012, we started operating a dust and effluent plant with a treatment capacity of 5,000 tonnes of smelter dusts
per year, which will produce 1,500 tonnes of copper by-products and 2,500 tonnes of lead sulfates per year. This plant is
designed to reduce dust emissions from La Caridad metallurgical complex.
Table of Contents
63The table below contains production information for 2021, 2020 and 2019 for the La Caridad processing facilities:
Variance  
2021 - 2020  
        2021    2020    2019    Volume    %  
Smelter                   
Total copper concentrate smelted  (kt)  
1,047.3  
1,029.5  1,011.4  17.8  1.7%
Anode copper production  (kt)  289.0  285.3  279.1  3.7  1.3%
Average copper content in anode  (%)  99.46  99.45  99.47  0.01  0.0%
Average smelter recovery  (%)  96.3  96.3  97.1  —  —%
Sulfuric acid production  (kt)  990.0  967.5  966.2  22.5  2.3%
Refinery          
Refined cathode production  (kt)  242.7  240.4  231.6  2.3  1.0%
Refined silver production  (000 kg)  236.7  252.8  250.3  (16.1)  (6.4)%
Refined gold production  (Kg)  
1,029.1  
1,028.1  
1,125.8  1.0  0.1%
Rod Plant          
Copper rod production  (kt)  150.1  129.4  142.7  20.7  
16.0%
Key: kt = thousand tonnes
Kg = kilograms
Pilares Project
Pilares is considered part of the La Caridad unit and ore from Pilares will be routed to the leach pads and processing
facilities at the La Caridad operations. The Pilares mineral development project is located in northeastern Sonora,
Mexico, about 266 kilometers northeast of the city of Hermosillo and 125 kilometers south of the city of Agua Prieta
Sonora, Mexico, which is on the international U.S. – Mexico border. The Pilares project is located between 30°19’ and
30°20’ N, and between 109°38’ and 109°37’47’’ W, at elevations ranging between 1,400 to 1,460 meters above mean sea
level. It is about 6 kilometers from the La Caridad mining unit and 22 kilometers from the town of Nacozari.
The mining claims held by Pilares project cover an area of about 143.3 hectares for exploration and exploitation
activities. Surface rights are held by a combination of private ownership and agreements with the local ejido “Pilares”,
which consists of about 40 members. Ejidos are agrarian land grants held by a group of people. The agreements allow
for exploration and mining activities, plus conservation of the historical town of Pilares. Additionally, the Pilares Project
was included in the regional environmental permit obtained for the entire La Caridad complex dated September 2018
and valid for 60 years.
Geology
The La Caridad mining district, where the Pilares porphyry copper deposit is located, lies within the eastern section of
the Sonora Basin and Range Province in Northern Mexico. Sustained magmatic activity along the North American
Cordillera during the late Mesozoic through Paleogene resulted in the development of numerous porphyry copper
deposits.
The local geology of the Pilares area consists of two main lithological packges, a volcanic sequence and a set of
hypabyssal bodies that intrude the volcanic sequence. The volcanic sequence is comprised from the base to the top by
the following units: andesitic flows from intercallations of Crystal Tuff, Tobaceous Sandstone, tuff-breccia (ignimbrite),
basalt-andesite flows and Lapilli Tuffs. The Lapilli Tuff is composed of lapilli-sized volcanic fragments outcropping in
the topographic highs and distributed in the central, southeastern and northeastern portion of the Pilares area. The Lapilli
Tuff hosts the mineralized structure of the Pilares Breccia.
Table of Contents
64Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of copper and molybdenum mineral resources for Pilares as of December 31,
2021, based on long-term price assumptions of $3.80 and $11.50 per pound, respectively:
Process     Classification    Amount
(million tonnes)    Total copper    Copper oxideMolybdenum
gradeContained
copper
(thousand
tonnes)Contained
molybdenum
(thousand
tonnes)
Leach Inferred  4.8  0.44%  0.22%  0.002%  20.7  —
Mill  Inferred  71.8  0.56%  0.05%  0.005%  399.1  3.5
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the Pilares project
technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.8 to this Form 10-K.
El Pilar Project
The El Pilar Property is located in north central Sonora, Mexico, about 15 kilometers south of the international border
with United States. The property is situated within lands of Ejido Miguel Hidalgo (also referred
to as San Lazaro), in the Santa Cruz Municipality. The El Pilar property comprises 9,571.3 hectares in eighteen
concessions. These concessions are wholly owned by Recursos Stingray de Cobre S.A de C.V., our wholly owned
Mexican subsidiary. Additionally, a total of 1,926 hectares of surface rights have been successfully negotiated with the
Ejido Miguel Hidalgo, which allows for all required land ownership rights needed for project development.
The El Pilar deposit is located at the southwest margin of the Patagonia Mountains near the base of a mountain range.
The topography near the deposit permits sufficient surface space for a mining operation, leaching pads, waste disposal
areas, and other facilities. The property can be reached by road from Hermosillo, Sonora in Mexico and from Tucson,
Arizona in the United States. The route from Hermosillo to Miguel Hidalgo takes about 3.5 hours of driving time. The
route from Tucson to Miguel Hidalgo is currently a two-hour drive. The site is a green-field mining site with no existing
infrastructure. Experienced mining personnel and related contractors are available within driving distance.
The project area climate allows year-round mining and processing operations. A power line is located 3 km to the south,
in the village of Miguel Hidalgo where SCC has an office and warehouse facilities, but the project will require the
construction of a high voltage power line from the site to connect with the high voltage power lines accessible in
Nogales, which is 28 km northwest of the property. A railroad is located 3 km south of the deposit. Construction of a
new railway spur approximately 4 km in length is planned for the delivery of molten sulfur or sulfuric acid.
Geology
The deposit is located within the Sonora-Arizona Porphyry Copper Province, along the southwest flank of the Patagonia
Mountains. The geology of the El Pilar property consists of Precambrian intrusive rocks overlain by Paleozoic
sedimentary rocks. These units are overlain by Tertiary sedimentary rocks. Intrusives of granitic to monzonitic
composition with some pegmatitic and aplitic facies intrude all the older units. Tertiary and Quaternary alluvial fan and
alluvial wash sediments cover the flanks of the ranges and the intervening valleys.
The El Pilar copper deposit occurs within unconsolidated, poorly sorted, poorly bedded, proximal facies alluvial wash
deposits that are overlain by dissected younger alluvial fan deposits. The copper bearing sediments at El Pilar are
comprised solely of alluvial wash gravels deposited into a paleo topographic range-front depression. At the northern
boundary of the deposit, these basin-fill sediments are juxtaposed against unmineralized Precambrian granitic rocks
by an east-west to northwest-trending, south dipping zone of faulting and hydrothermal brecciation. Mineralization
predominantly consists of the copper oxide mineral chrysocolla, which occurs as coatings on clasts of highly silicified
breccia and as grains in the sedimentary gravel matrix.
Table of Contents
65Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of copper mineral resources for El Pilar as of December 31, 2021, based on
long-term price assumptions of $3.80 per pound:
Copper     Amount (million
tonnes)     Total copper    Soluble copperContained copper
(thousand tonnes) 
Measured mineral resources  2.2  0.20%  0.10%  4.3
Indicated mineral resources   81.3  0.18%  0.08%  143.8
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  83.4  0.18%  0.08%  148.1
Inferred mineral resources  88.6  0.12%  0.06%  106.3
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) Mineral resources are reported exclusive of mineral reserves.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the El Pilar project
technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.9 to this Form 10-K.
Mineral reserves
The following table contains the summary of copper mineral reserves for El Pilar as of December 31, 2021, based on
long-term price assumptions of $3.30 per pound:
Copper     ROM Ore (million
tonnes)     Copper grade     Contained copper
(thousand tonnes)  Recovered
copper (million
pounds)
Proven mineral reserves  63  0.27 %  168  221
Probable mineral reserves   254  0.25 %  623  720
Total mineral reserves  317  0.25%  790  941
(1) Mineral reserves are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) The reference point for the estimate is delivery to the leach pad.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 12 of the La Caridad
operations technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.9 to this Form 10-K.
El Arco Project
The El Arco deposit is located near the village of El Arco in Baja California, Mexico, which lies near the center of the
Baja California Peninsula in the municipalities of San Quintin, Baja California and Mulegé, Baja California Sur,
Mexico. Route 1 is the only paved highway connecting the northern and southern parts of the Baja Peninsula. El Arco
located between the towns of Santa Rosalía and Guerrero Negro at kilometer 189. The El Arco site is accessed by taking
Highway 1 approximately 30 kilometers south of the town of Guerrero Negro to the intersection with the highway MX
18, and following MX 18 for 42 kilometers east to the project site. Highway 1 is paved and in good condition and
Highway 18 was originally paved but currently all pavement is gone, leaving a gravel roadbed.
The nearest port is Santa Rosalía on the Sea of Cortez, 240 km by road southeast of El Arco. We plan to construct a port
at El Barril, located 70 km northeast of the proposed mine site. The site is currently a greenfields site with limited
infrastructure that is only suitable to support exploration-level activities. Planned on-site infrastructure includes an open
pit mine, two waste rock storage facilities, mill complex and oxide fine crushing facilities, temporary ore stockpile, heap
leach facility, tailings storage facility, administration building, truck shop and warehouse, main 230 kV electrical
substation and a water storage dam and reservoir.
We hold 11 mining concessions, covering 72,133 hectares. Surfaces rights in the deposit area are held by a combination
of agrarian cooperatives (ejidos) and private owners. Project water is planned to be sourced from a desalination plant, to
be constructed at El Barril. Additionally, we expect to obtain power from a private provider.
Table of Contents
66Geology
The El Arco deposit is considered to be an example of a porphyry copper deposit. The Alisitos arc is an approximately
300 × 30 kilometer oceanic arc terrane that accreted to the western edge of the Peninsular Ranges batholith within the
North American Cordillera. A chain of granitic batholithic intrusions intrude the Alisitos Formation, and El Arco, the
oldest known porphyry deposit in this chain, is located at the extreme southern end of the chain.
The El Arco area basement consists of serpentinite, with blocks of peridotite, pyroxenite and amphibolite that are
tectonically overlain by diorites, gabbros, and rocks interpreted to be pillow lavas. These units are overlain by
metavolcanic agglomerates, metagraywackes, meta-andesite flows and breccias, and thinly-bedded marble. Andesite
flows in the upper part of this sequence host granodiorite porphyry intrusions that generated the El Arco deposit. Barren
diabase dikes cut the andesite and granodiorite porphyry. All lithologies have been subject to greenschist facies
metamorphism, characterized by development of chlorite–epidote–calcite–quartz. Mineralization at El Arco occurs in
three sub-horizontal zones.
Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of mineral resources for El Arco as of December 31, 2021, based on long-
term price assumptions of $3.80 and $10.35 per pound for copper and molybdenum, respectively.
Mill plant     Amount
(million
tonnes)    Copper
grades    Molybdenum
gradesGold
grade
(g/t)Silver
grade
(g/t)Contained
copper
(million
pounds) Contained
molybdenum
(million
pounds)Contained
gold
(million
ounces)Contained
silver
(million
ounces)
Measured mineral resources  —  —%  —%  —  —  —  —  —
Indicated mineral resources   826.6  0.41 %  0.008 % 
0.12  1.6  7,544.9  146.5  3.23  41.88
Measured + Indicated mineral
resources  826.6  0.41 %  0.008 % 
0.12  1.6  7,544.9  146.5  3.23  41.88
Inferred mineral resources 
2,344.9  0.37 %  0.006 % 0.11 1.5  19,352.3  298.2  8.05  110.89
Leach plant     Amount
(million
tonnes)    Copper
grades    Molybdenum
gradesGold
grade
(g/t)Silver
grade
(g/t)Contained
copper
(million
pounds) Contained
molybdenum
(million
pounds)Contained
gold
(million
ounces)Contained
silver
(million
ounces)
Measured mineral resources  —  —%  —%  —  —  —  —  —  —
Indicated mineral resources   51.3  0.30 %  —%  —  —  335.3  —  —  —
Measured + Indicated mineral
resources  51.3  0.30 %  —%  —  —  335.3  —  —  —
Inferred mineral resources  63.8  0.25 %  —%  —  —  350.9  —  —  —
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) Mineral resources are reported exclusive of mineral reserves.
(3) Mineral resources are reported within a conceptual pit shell that is based on copper and molybdenum values only .
Metallur gical recoveries considered are of 86% copper and 55% molybdenum for material sent to the mill facility , and
recovery of 80% total copper for material sent to the heap leach pad.
(4) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the El Arco project
technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.10 to this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
67Mineral reserves
The following table contains the summary of copper mineral reserves for El Arco as of December 31, 2021, based on
long-term price assumptions of $3.30 and $9.00 per pound for copper and molybdenum, respectively.
Probable mineral
reserves     Amount
(million
tonnes)    Copper
grades    Molybdenum
grades  Gold
grade
(g/t)Silver
grade
(g/t)Contained
copper
(million
pounds) Contained
molybdenum
(million
pounds)Contained
gold
(million
ounces)Contained
silver
(million
ounces)
Sulfide mill 
1,229.54  0.40%  0.006% 0.14  1.8  10,822  166.7  5.59  70.47
Oxide leach   140.52  0.27%  —% —  —  846  —  —  —
(1) Mineral reserves are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) The reference point for the estimate is the point of delivery to the processing facility .
(3) Mineral reserves are constrained within an optimized pit shell based on copper and molybdenum only . Metallur gical
recoveries considered were 86% copper and 55% molybdenum for material sent to the mill facility , and recovery of 80%
total copper for material sent to the heap leach pad.
(4) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 12 of the El Arco operations
technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.10 to this Form 10-K.
MEXICAN IMMSA UNIT
Our IMMSA unit (underground mining poly-metallic division) owns five underground mining complexes situated in
central and northern Mexico, three out of which are currently operating. It produces zinc, lead, copper, silver and gold.
These complexes include industrial processing facilities for zinc, lead, copper and silver. All of IMMSA’s mining
facilities employ exploitation systems and conventional equipment. We believe that all the plants and equipment are in
satisfactory operating condition. IMMSA’s principal mining facilities are Charcas, Santa Barbara, San Martin, Santa
Eulalia and Taxco.
Table of Contents
68The table below contains production information for 2021, 2020 and 2019 for our Mexican IMMSA unit:
Variance  
2021 - 2020  
        2021    2020    2019    Volume    %  
Average annual operating days(*)   336  341  352
Total material mined and milled  (kt)   3,965  4,242  3,911  (277)  (6.5)%
Zinc:          
Average ore grade  (%)   2.04  2.03  2.24  0.01  0.5%
Average recovery  (%)   82.87  80.01  84.46  2.86  3.6%
Concentrate produced  (kt)   135.1  133.6  146.7  1.5  1.1%
Concentrate average grade  (%)   49.58  51.61  50.40  (2.03)  (3.9)%
Zinc in concentrate  (kt)   67.0  68.9  73.9  (1.9)  (2.8)%
Lead:          
Average ore grade  (%)   0.62  0.72  0.78  (0.10)  (13.9)%
Average recovery  (%)   69.20  66.93  74.01  2.27  3.4%
Concentrate produced  (kt)   33.8  38.5  43.8  (4.7)  (12.2)%
Concentrate average grade  (%)   50.66  52.86  51.47  (2.20)  (4.2)%
Lead in concentrate  (kt)   17.1  20.4  22.6  (3.3)  (16.2)%
Copper:          
Average ore grade  (%)   0.41  0.44  0.38  (0.03)  (6.8)
Average recovery  (%)   53.71  55.02  55.50  (1.31)  (2.4)%
Concentrate produced  (kt)   38.0  45.7  33.9  (7.7)  (16.8)%
Concentrate average grade  (%)   22.94  22.52  24.40  0.42  1.9%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)   8.7  10.3  8.3  (1.6)  (15.5)%
Silver:          
Average ore grade  (ounces)  2.17  2.58  2.26  (0.41)  (15.9)%
Average recovery  (%)   76.59  73.08  78.53  3.51  4.8%
Concentrate average grade  (%)   31.9  36.6  30.9  (4.7)  (12.8)%
Silver in concentrates  ((000) ounces)  
6,588.5  
7,982.8  
6,942.5  
(1,394.3)  (17.5)%
kt = thousand tonnes
(*)Weighted average annual operating days based on total material mined and milled in the four active mines: Charcas,
Santa Barbara, Santa Eulalia and San Martin.
Charcas
The Charcas mining complex is located approximately 110 kilometers north of the city of San Luis Potosi in the State of
San Luis Potosi, Mexico. Charcas is connected to the state capital by a paved highway of 130 kilometers. It was
discovered in 1573 and operations in the 20th century began in 1911. The complex includes three underground mines
(San Bartolo, Rey-Reina and La Aurora) and one flotation plant that produces zinc, lead and copper concentrates with
significant amounts of silver. The Charcas mine is characterized by low operating costs and good quality ores and is
situated near the zinc refinery. Charcas is exploited underground by room and pillar with hydraulic cut and fill. The
crushed ore is transported to the surface for processing in the flotation plant.
We currently hold 13 mining concessions over the Charcas property, which covers a total area of 88,643.26 hectares.
Additionally, we own surface lands covering an area of 1,744.4 hectares with rights to conduct any work or exploration
required to advance or continue of activities within the Charcas project. Water is obtained from three main sources:
recovery of process water from the tailings dam, recovery of the working water from the mine and fresh water from
concession wells. Additionally, the unit receives a power supply of 115,000 volts in two 7.5-Mega Volt-Amp (MVA)
transformers, distributed to electrical substations located in the different areas of mining operation. Fuel comes from a
local distribution point in the city of San Luis Potosi and is stored in a series of tanks located on the surface.
In October 2015, an earthquake damaged some underground facilities as well as the access to the mine. Consequently,
normal mine operations were interrupted. In 2016, operations took place normally and a production compliance level of
97% was reached.
Table of Contents
69Geology
The Charcas mining district is in the east-central part of the central mesa of Mexico, which is part of the larger
metallogenic province of Sierra Madre. The mineral deposits found within the Charcas mining district are tertiary
polymetallic skarn (silver, lead, zinc and copper) deposits hosted in carbonate rocks of the Jurassic-Cretaceous periods
and in shales and sandstones of the Late Triassic. In the carbonate rocks, veins and mantos form the predominant
mineralization, while less mineralized fractures tend to occur within the shales and sandstones. The varied style of
mineralization largely corresponds to the lithological variety of units that serve as host rocks.
The Charcas intrusive complex (“CIC”) was emplaced in Triassic to upper Cretaceous sedimentary rocks. Some dikes
from the CIC have developed metamorphic halos with related polymetallic mineralization. There are two recognized
stages of mineralization. In the first stage, the mineralization is enriched in silver, lead, and zinc and characterized with
calcite and small quantities of quartz and chalcopyrite (CuFeS) present. In the second stage, the mineralization is copper
and silver rich with lesser amounts of chalcopyrite. The mineralization also includes lead ore with associated silver, plus
pyrite and only minor amounts of sphalerite (ZnS). The mineralization occurs as replacement sulfides in carbonate rocks
and as filling fracture veins. The typical sulfides found at the Charcas include chalcopyrite, sphalerite, galena (PbS), and
silver minerals.
Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of mineral resources for Charcas as of December 31, 2021, based on long-
term metal price assumptions:
Silver  Metal price
(per ounce)     Amount
(thousand
tonnes)     Grades (grams
per tonne)     Metal content
(thousand
ounces)
Measured mineral resources  23.00  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  23.00   5,831  91   17,118
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  23.00  5,831  91   17,118
Inferred mineral resources  23.00  14,206  98  44,583
Zinc  Metal price
(per pound)     Amount
(thousand
tonnes)     Grades     Metal content
(thousand
tonnes)
Measured mineral resources  1.32  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  1.32   5,831  3.45 %  201.3
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  1.32  5,831  3.45 %  201.3
Inferred mineral resources  1.32  14,206  2.76 %  392.1
Lead  Metal price
(per pound)     Amount
(thousand
tonnes)     Grades     Metal content
(thousand
tonnes)
Measured mineral resources  1.04  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  1.04   5,831  0.42 %  24.5
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  1.04  5,831  0.42 %  24.5
Inferred mineral resources  1.04  14,206  0.36 %  50.9
Copper  Metal price
(per pound)     Amount
(thousand
tonnes)     Grades     Metal content
(thousand
tonnes)
Measured mineral resources  3.80  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  3.80   5,831  0.53 %  30.9
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  3.80  5,831  0.53 %  30.9
Inferred mineral resources  3.80  14,206  0.57 %  81.4
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) Mineral resources are reported exclusive of mineral reserves.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the Charcas operations
technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.1 1 to this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
70Santa Barbara
The Santa Barbara mining complex is located approximately 26 kilometers southwest of the city of Hidalgo del Parral in
southern Chihuahua, Mexico. The area can be reached via a paved road of from Hidalgo del Parral, a city on a federal
highway. The area is also connected to the state capital of Chihuahua 250 km along Highway 24. It was discovered in
1536 and mining activities in the 20th century began in 1913. Santa Barbara includes three main underground mines
(San Diego, Segovedad and Tecolotes) as well as a flotation plant and produces lead, copper and zinc concentrates, with
significant amounts of silver.
IMMSA currently holds 33 mining concessions over the Santa Barbara property, covering a total area of 27,772.5082
hectares (ha), with the titles held 100% by the Company. There are also surface lands that cover an area of 20.92
hectares and are owned by IMMSA, which provide us within sufficient rights to any work or exploration that we require
to carry out for the advancement and continuity of activities in the Santa Bárbara propert. There are an additional 371.07
hectares covered by a contract with the community of Santa Barbara that allows for any further work or exploration
required.
Due to the variable characteristics of the ore bodies, four types of mining methods are used: shrinkage stoping, long-hole
drilled open stoping, cut-and-fill stoping and horizontal bench stoping. The ore, once crushed, is processed in the
flotation plant to produce concentrates. All the water used in industrial operations at Santa Barbara comes from the mine
and the concentrator plant, where a large part of this water is recovered from the tailings dam, creating a closed circuit
for its proper use. Electricity is supplied by Eolica el Retiro, Energia Chihuahua, S.A. de C.V. and the CFE.
Geology
The pre-mineral rock types found at Santa Barbara consist of a thick calcareous shale formation and andesite flows. The
post-mineral rock types consist of dikes and sills of rhyolite and diabase, a thin conglomerate formation, basalt flows,
and unconsolidated stream sediments. Pre-mineral faulting took place in two stages, forming four fault systems. All
faults within each system have similar strike and dip. Movement along these faults, vertical in the first-stage faults and
horizontal in the second-stage faults, formed openings and breccia zones.
Hydrothermal solutions, emanating from depth, were introduced into the faults. The walls and breccia fragments within
the faults were silicified, and the high-temperature silicates, garnet, pyroxene, and epidote were formed. Accompanying
and following the formation of the silicates, the sulfides, such as sphalerite, galena, chalcopyrite, pyrite, and
arsenopyrite, with associated gold and a silver mineral, were introduced with quartz, calcite, and fluorite. Most of these
minerals replaced the silicates and altered shale. The parts of the faults where wide pre-mineral openings were located
filled with quartz and a higher ratio of sulfides than in the narrow portions of the faults. Quartz, calcite, fluorite, and
barite were among the last minerals deposited.
Table of Contents
71Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of mineral resources for Santa Barbara as of December 31, 2021, based on
long-term metal price assumptions:
Silver  Metal price (per ounce)    Amount (thousand tonnes)    Grades (grams per tonne)    Metal content (thousand ounce
Measured mineral resources  23.00  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  23.00  22,534  101  72,82
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  23.00  22,534  101  72,82
Inferred mineral resources  23.00  19,357  102  63,72
Zinc  Metal price (per pound)    Amount (thousand tonnes)    Grades     Metal content (thousand tonne
Measured mineral resources  1.32  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  1.32  22,534  3.24%  730.
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  1.32  22,534  3.24%  730.
Inferred mineral resources  1.32  19,357  3.89%  753.
Lead  Metal price (per pound)    Amount (thousand tonnes)    Grades     Metal content (thousand tonne
Measured mineral resources  1.04  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  1.04  22,534  1.92%  433.
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  1.04  22,534  1.92%  433.
Inferred mineral resources  1.04  19,357  2.35%  454.
Copper  Metal price (per pound)    Amount (thousand tonnes)    Grades     Metal content (thousand tonne
Measured mineral resources  3.80  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  3.80  22,534  0.53%  120.
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  3.80  22,534  0.53%  120.
Inferred mineral resources  3.80  19,357  0.55%  105.
Gold  Metal price (per ounce)    Amount (thousand tonnes)    Grades (grams per tonne)    Metal content (thousand ounce
Measured mineral resources  1,725  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  1,725  22,534  0.30  21
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  1,725  22,534  0.30  21
Inferred mineral resources  1,725  19,357  0.19  11
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) Mineral resources are reported exclusive of mineral reserves.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the Santa Barbara
operations technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.12 to this Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
72San Martin
The San Martin mining complex is located in the municipality of Sombrerete in the northwestern part of the state of 
Zacatecas, Mexico. It is located approximately 185 kilometers from the city of Zacatecas.  It was discovered in 1555 and 
mining operations in the 20th century began in 1949. The complex includes an underground mine and a flotation plant. 
The ore body contains lead, copper and zinc concentrates, with significant amounts of silver. The state of Zacatecas has 
an extensive infrastructure of roads and highways that connect the San Martín to the rest of the country. The San Martin 
mining unit has a paved road to Highway 45, which leads to the town of Sombrerete, 17 kilometers away. Highway 45 
then connects Sombrete to Fresnillo, Zacatecas and Durango at distances of 110, 171 and 125 kilometers, respectively.
The San Martin property consists of 73 mining concessions with a total surface of 10,360.9508 hectares, with the titles
held by IMMSA. Water is currently extracted via three deep wells in the Proaño area, storing it in a pool adjacent to the
wells. Electric power is provided by the national grid via a 45 kilometer extension. The unit receives a power supply of
115 KV, the main substation has a capacity of 24 MWA.
After eleven years of an illegal stoppage, we resumed control of the San Martin mine in August 2018. The San Martin
facilities deteriorated during this period and we undertook a major renovation to restart operations in the second quarter
of 2019, with a capital budget of $97.7 million. Production at this mine was restored to full capacity at the end of the
third quarter of 2019.
Geology
San Martín mine is located in the Central Mesa of Mexico, between Sierra Madre Occidental and Sierra Madre Oriental.
The Cuesta del Cura (Upper Cretaceous) limestone is the main sedimentary formation in the district. This is a sequence
of shallow marine limestone and black chert which is overlain by Indura Formation that consists of alternating shales
and fine-grained clayey limestones.
The mineral deposits in this district are associated with replacement veins and bodies formed in the skarn in close
proximity to the Cerro de la Gloria granodiorite intrusion. The main mineralized veins are San Marcial, Ibarra and Gallo-
Gallina which are oriented parallel to the intrusive contact and have thicknesses varying from 0.4 m to 4 m and
horizontal extents of up to 1,000 m to the east/northeast from the granodiorite contact. The mineralization is associated
with massive and disseminated sulfides occurring in replacement ore bodies between the main veins and in the skarn and
include chalcopyrite (CuFeS), sphalerite (ZnS), galena (PbS), bornite (CuFeS), tetrahedrite (CuFe Sb S), native Silver
(Ag), Pyrite (FeS), arsenopyrite (FeAsS) and stibnite (SbS).
Table of Contents
73Mineral resources
The following table contains the summary of mineral resources for San Martin as of December 31, 2021, based on long-
term metal price assumptions:
Silver  Metal price (per
ounce)     Amount
(thousand tonnes)    Grades (grams
per tonne)     Metal content
(thousand
ounces)
Measured mineral resources  23.00  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  23.00   11,728  97   36,647
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  23.00  11,728  97   36,647
Inferred mineral resources  23.00  8,369  107  28,716
Zinc  Metal price (per
pound)     Amount
(thousand tonnes)    Grades     Metal content
(thousand
tonnes)
Measured mineral resources  1.32  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  1.32  11,728  2.65%  310.9
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  1.32  11,728  2.65%  310.9
Inferred mineral resources  1.32  8,369  2.18%  182.7
Lead  Metal price (per
pound)     Amount
(thousand tonnes)    Grades     Metal content
(thousand
tonnes)
Measured mineral resources  1.04  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  1.04  11,728  0.55%  64.2
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  1.04  11,728  0.55%  64.2
Inferred mineral resources  1.04  8,369  0.61%  51.2
Copper  Metal price (per
pound)     Amount
(thousand tonnes)    Grades     Metal content
(thousand
tonnes)
Measured mineral resources  3.80  —  —   —
Indicated mineral resources  3.80  11,728  0.62%  73.2
Measured + Indicated mineral resources  3.80  11,728  0.62%  73.2
Inferred mineral resources  3.80  8,369  0.53%  44.3
(1) Mineral resources are reported in situ and are current as at December 31, 2021.
(2) Mineral resources are reported exclusive of mineral reserves.
(3) For further information on assumptions used in preparing the estimates, please refer to Chapter 1 1 of the San Martin
operations technical report summary prepared by qualified persons, under Exhibit 96.13 to this Form 10-K.
Santa Eulalia
The mining district of Santa Eulalia is located in the central part of the state of Chihuahua, Mexico, approximately 26
kilometers east of the city of Chihuahua, and is connected to the city of Chihuahua by a paved road (highway no. 45). It
was discovered in 1590 but exploitation began in 1870. The main mines in Santa Eulalia are The Buena Tierra mine and
the San Antonio mine.
Regarding its geology, the majority of mineralization corresponds to ore skarns: silicoaluminates of calcium, iron and
manganese with variable quantities of lead, zinc, copper and iron sulfides. Economic ore include sphalerite (ZnS), galena
(PbS) and small quantities of pyrargyrite (Ag3SbS3).
Table of Contents
74In the first quarter of 2020, the Santa Eulalia mine temporarily suspended its operations due to flooding. We are
currently evaluating different options to supply the Santa Eulalia concentrator. We are also evaluating drainage at the
mining facilities and determining if it is possible to sell the water for agricultural or other uses.
Taxco
The Taxco mining complex has been on strike since July 2007. It is located on the outskirts of the city of Taxco in the
northern part of the state of Guerrero, Mexico. It was discovered in 1519 and mining activities in the 20th century began
in 1918. The complex includes several underground mines (San Antonio, Guerrero and Remedios) and a flotation plant.
The ore contains lead and zinc concentrates, with some amounts of gold and silver.
There was no mine exploration drilling at Taxco during the three-year period ended December 31, 2021 due to the
strikes. Please see Note 13 “Commitments and Contingencies—Labor matters” to the consolidated financial statements.
Processing Facilities—San Luis Potosi
Our San Luis Potosi electrolytic zinc refinery is located in the city of San Luis Potosi, in the state of San Luis Potosi,
Mexico. The city of San Luis Potosi is connected to our refinery by a major highway.
Zinc Refinery
The San Luis Potosi electrolytic zinc refinery was built in 1982 and was designed to produce 105,000 tonnes of refined
zinc per year by treating up to 200,000 tonnes of zinc concentrate from our own mines, principally Charcas, which is
located 113 kilometers from the refinery. The refinery produces special high-grade zinc (99.995%), high-grade zinc
(over 99.9%) and zinc-based alloys with aluminum, lead, copper or magnesium in varying quantities and sizes
depending on market demand. Refined silver and gold production is obtained from tolling services provided by a third
party mining company.
The electrolytic zinc refinery has an acid plant, a steam recovery boiler and a roaster. There is also a calcine processing
area with five leaching stages: neutral, hot acid, intermediate acid, acid, purified fourth and jarosite, as well as two stages
for solution purifying.
The table below contains production information for 2021, 2020 and 2019 for our San Luis Potosi zinc refinery:
Variance  
2021 - 2020  
        2021    2020    2019    Volume    %  
Total zinc concentrate treated  (kt)  203.6  211.6  209.3  (8.0)  (3.8)%
Refined zinc produced  (kt)  92.7  102.4  104.9  (9.7)  (9.5)%
Sulfuric acid produced  (kt)  172.4  181.0  187.2  (8.6)  (4.8)%
Refined silver produced  (kt)  19.1  16.3  16.1  2.8  17.2%
Refined gold produced  (k)  20.5  21.0  19.2  (0.5)  (2.4)%
Refined cadmium produced  (kt)  0.5  0.6  0.6  (0.1)  (16.7)%
Average refinery recovery  (%)  91.9  93.4  93.4  (1.5)  (1.6)%
kt = thousand tonnes
Nueva Rosita Coal and Coke Complex
The Nueva Rosita coal and coke complex began operations in 1924 and is located in the state of Coahuila, Mexico, on
the outskirts of the city of Nueva Rosita near the Texas border. It included: (a) an underground coal mine, which has
been closed since 2006; (b) an open-pit mine with a yearly capacity of approximately 350,000 tonnes of coal; (c) a coal
washing plant with a capacity of 900,000 tonnes per year that produces high quality clean coal; and d) a re-engineered
and modernized 21 ovens coke facility capable of producing 100,000 tonnes of coke per year (metallurgical, nut and
fine) of which, 95,000 tonnes are metallurgical coke. The complex also has a by-product plant to clean the coke gas oven
Table of Contents
75in which tar, ammonium sulfate and light crude oil are recovered and two boilers, which produce 80,000 pounds of
steam that is used in the by-products plant. In September 2017, a decision was made by the Company to close the coke
plant and to initiate the cleaning and remediation process with a current budget of $14.0 million. As of December 31,
2021, expenses totaled $6.8 million.
In July 2019, the Company decided to suspend coal mining operations. On February 19, 2020, the Company announced
the decision to return the underground coal mine (the Olivo concession), which had been closed since 2006, to the
Mexican government in response to a request of the President of Mexico to resume efforts to locate the remains of
miners lost in a 2006 mining accident. On February 20, 2020 the Company presented the offer to return the concession
to the General Direction of Mines. On September 3, 2020, the authorities accepted the offer. On August 2021, the
Company donated the land and buildings located in the mine to the CFE.
MINERAL RESOURCES AND RESERVES
Mineral resources are concentrations or occurrences of material of economic interest in or on the Earth's crust in such
form, grade or quality, and quantity that there are reasonable prospects for economic extraction. A mineral resource is a
reasonable estimate of mineralization, taking into account relevant factors such as cut-off grade, likely mining
dimensions, location or continuity, that, with the assumed and justifiable technical and economic conditions, is likely to,
in whole or in part, become economically extractable. Such a deposit cannot qualify as recoverable proven and probable
mineral reserves until engineering, legal and economic feasibility are confirmed based upon a comprehensive evaluation
of development and operating costs, grades, recoveries and other material factors. Mineral resources include measured,
indicated and inferred mineral classifications.
Measured mineral resource is that part of a mineral resource for which quantity and grade or quality are estimated on the
basis of conclusive geological evidence and sampling. The level of geological certainty associated with a measured
mineral resource is sufficient to allow a qualified person to apply modifying factors, as defined in this section, in
sufficient detail to support detailed mine planning and final evaluation of the economic viability of the deposit. Because
a measured mineral resource has a higher level of confidence than the level of confidence of either an indicated mineral
resource or an inferred mineral resource, a measured mineral resource may be converted to a proven mineral reserve or
to a probable mineral reserve.
Indicated mineral resource is that part of a mineral resource for which quantity and grade or quality are estimated on the
basis of adequate geological evidence and sampling. The level of geological certainty associated with an indicated
mineral resource is sufficient to allow a qualified person to apply modifying factors in sufficient detail to support mine
planning and evaluation of the economic viability of the deposit. Because an indicated mineral resource has a lower level
of confidence than the level of confidence of a measured mineral resource, an indicated mineral resource may only be
converted to a probable mineral reserve.
Inferred mineral resource is that part of a mineral resource for which quantity and grade or quality are estimated on the
basis of limited geological evidence and sampling. The level of geological uncertainty associated with an inferred
mineral resource is too high to apply relevant technical and economic factors likely to influence the prospects of
economic extraction in a manner useful for evaluation of economic viability. Because an inferred mineral resource has
the lowest level of geological confidence of all mineral resources, which prevents the application of the modifying
factors in a manner useful for evaluation of economic viability, an inferred mineral resource may not be considered when
assessing the economic viability of a mining project, may not be converted to a mineral reserve and no assurance can be
given that the estimated mineral resources not included in mineral reserves will become proven and probable mineral
reserves.
Mineral reserves are estimates of tonnage and grade or quality of indicated and measured mineral resources that, in the
opinion of the qualified person, can be the basis of an economically viable project. More specifically, it is the
economically mineable part of a measured or indicated mineral resource, which includes diluting materials and
allowances for losses that may occur when the material is mined or extracted. Mineral reserves, as used in the mineral
reserve data presented in this report, means the economically mineable part of a measured or indicated resource, which
includes diluting materials and allowances for losses that may occur when the material is mined or extracted. Proven
Table of Contents
76mineral reserve is the economically mineable part of a measured mineral resource and can only result from conversion of
a measured mineral resource. Probable mineral reserve is the economically mineable part of an indicated and, in some
cases, remaining portions of a measured mineral resource.
Our estimates of mineral reserves and mineral resources have been prepared in accordance with the disclosure 
requirements of S-K 1300. Pursuant to SEC guidance, qualified persons used forecast metal prices for mineral resource 
and mineral reserve estimation and the economic analysis. These projected prices were derived from forecasts from 
several analysts and banks. The commodity price forecast covered the period 2021–2025 and provided a long-term 
forecast for 2025 onward.  As of December 31, 2021, we considered $3.30 per pound of copper and $10.00 per pound of 
molybdenum. 
Our engineering department reviews reserve computations in detail on an annual basis. In addition, our engineering
department reviews the computation when changes in assumptions occur. Changes can occur for price or cost
assumptions, results in field drilling or new geotechnical parameters. We also engage third party consultants to review
mine planning procedures.
We periodically reevaluate estimates of our mineral reserves, which represent our estimate as to the amount of unmined
copper remaining in our existing mine locations that can be produced and sold at a profit. These estimates are based on
engineering evaluations derived from samples of drill holes and other openings, combined with assumptions about
copper market prices and production costs at each of our mines. See Risk Factors in Item 1A for a discussion of risks
associated with our estimates of mineral reserves and resources.
The qualified persons responsible for mineral reserve and resource estimates are as follows:
Peruvian open-pit:
Cuajone mine – Wood Group USA Inc.
Toquepala mine - Wood Group USA Inc.
Tia Maria project:
Wood Group USA Inc.
Mexican open-pit:
La Caridad - Golder Associates USA Inc.
Buenavista del Cobre - Golder Associates USA Inc.
IMMSA unit:
Santa Barbara - SRK Consulting (U.S.), Inc.
Charcas - SRK Consulting (U.S.), Inc.
San Martin – SRK Consulting (U.S.), Inc.
El Arco project:
Wood Group USA Inc.
El Pilar project:
M3 Engineering & Technology Corp., Ingenieria Geomex, S.A. de C.V., and Golder Associates USA Inc.
Table of Contents
77Pilares project:
Golder Associates USA Inc.
MINERAL RESERVES AND MINERAL RESOURCES INTERNAL CONTROLS DISCLOSURE
In 2021, we adopted the new requirements of S-K 1300. As part of this process, we developed an implementation plan
with a high-level cross functional team, which performed a completeness assessment over the Technical Report
Summaries for each material property prepared by a third-party Qualified Person. Additionally, we established new
policies, procedures and internal controls related to the new regulation. The review includes, among others, an analysis
of the reasonableness of technical information, a thorough review of the mineral resources and reserves estimates, and
the economic analysis which supports these estimates.
In addition, as part of the adoption of the requirements of S-K 1300, a significant component of our internal controls and
quality assurance procedures on the information from material properties was performed by qualified persons
responsible for mineral reserve and resource estimates. These include an intensive review of our procedures, as well as
database verification, validation of mineral resource and reserve estimates, and the elaboration of technical report
summaries. These controls and methods help to validate the reasonabless of the estimates. The effectiveness of the
controls are reviewed periodically to address changes in conditions and the degree of compliance with policies and
procedures.
EXPLORATION ACTIVITIES
We are engaged in ongoing extensive exploration to locate additional ore bodies in Peru, Mexico, Argentina, Ecuador
and Chile. We also conduct exploration in the areas of our current mining operations. We invested $43.4 million on
exploration programs in 2021, $32.6 million in 2020 and $30.0 million in 2019 and we expect to spend approximately
$71.4 million on exploration programs in 2022.
Currently, we directly control 82,134 hectares and 493,533  hectares of exploration concessions in Peru and Mexico, 
respectively. We also currently hold 246,346 hectares, 29,888 hectares and 7,299 hectares of exploration concessions in 
Argentina, Chile and Ecuador, respectively.
Peru
In 2021, we drilled 3,373 meters to explore an anomalous area with evidence of copper-molybdenum oxides. The results
obtained indicate a disseminated system with low contents of disseminated copper, with evidence of having been highly
eroded.
For 2022, we plan to conduct a diamond drilling program of 4,000 meters at the Chapara project, which is a system that
has shown evidence of copper porphyry mineralization. Additionally, we will conduct a diamond drilling program of
5,000 meters to explore prospective areas with copper mineralization, mainly located in southern Peru. We will also
continue conducting several prospection programs at other Peruvian metallogenic zones, associated mainly to copper
porphyry systems.
Mexico
In addition to exploration and drilling programs at existing mines, we are currently conducting exploration to locate
mineral deposits at various other sites in Mexico. The following are some of the more significant exploration projects:
The Chalchihuites. This is a skarn type deposit located in the state of Zacatecas, close to the San Martin mining unit.
Drilling programs conducted between 1980 and 2014 identified 12.6 million of mineralized material with an average
silver content of 110 grams per ton, 2.66% of zinc, 0.37% of lead and 0.67% of copper. Current results indicate that
mineralization consists of a complex mixture of oxides and sulfides of silver, lead and zinc that requires additional
metallurgical research. In 2017, we started a new drilling program of 21,000 meters to continue metallurgical research
Table of Contents
78and testing. In 2018, this exploration program, which included 48 drill holes was completed. This program has been
carried out in compliance with QA/QC protocol, which includes testing the specific density of different rocks and
mineralized types and geochemistry sampling. In addition, 5,000 meters of core sample from the drilling program were
analyzed with a hyperspectral scanner, and a study of 498 kilometers of hyperspectral imaging was conducted to
recognize the geology of the entire Chalchihuites mineral district. In 2019, with the complete data from the diamond
drilling program, we made a geological model of the Cronos deposit using Leapfrog software. In 2020, the sample
design for a metallurgical test was completed and three metallurgical samples were delivered to an external consultant.
Metallurgical tests for silver recovery will continue with semi-sulfide and oxide ores. The drilling plan for 2022 is 6,000
meters, in the area known as Virgen Morena.
Bella Union (La Caridad). This prospect is a mineralized copper and molybdenum breccia deposit; the site is located at
less than one kilometer from the border of La Caridad pit. In 2016 and 2017, we conducted a 28,217 meter drilling
program to define the geometry of the deposit. The results identified 36.2 million tonnes of mineralized material with an
average of 0.44% copper content and 0.05% of molybdenum. In May 2018, the drilling in this project was completed,
totaling 46,400 meters distributed in 113 drill holes. The test results were received in June 2018. In 2019, the final ore 
reserve estimation report was completed. In 2020 it was integrated into the La Caridad Block Model and in 2021 it was 
considered in the new life of mine that has been delivered in January 2022. Therefore, this project is concluded.  
Campo Medio (Santa Eulalia). This prospect is located close to the west border of the Santa Eulalia mine. Results of
geological surveying and drilling programs indicated that its mineralization consists of sulfides with 2.85 meters of
width, 219 grams of silver, 6.60% of lead and 7.55% of zinc. Exploration at the Campo Medio area did not render
positive results and exploration activities were suspended. In order to continue exploration towards the southern end of
the San Antonio mine, the area must be drained because it was affected by flooding at Santa Eulalia.
Chile
El Salado (Montonero). A copper-gold prospect located in the Atacama region, northern Chile has been under
exploration for copper and molybdenum porphyry since 2014. In 2016 and 2017, we conducted a diamond drilling
program of 22,108 meters and finished the conceptual study. We plan to conduct a pre-feasibility study of the project in
the first quarter of 2022.
Other Chilean Prospects. In 2021, we concluded geological and geochemical exploration work at prospects located in
the copper-gold strip of the Antofagasta region in the north of Chile. In 2022, we plan to conduct a diamond drilling
programs of 2,000 meters each at the Taruca and Chapalele prospects; located in the Antofagasta region.
Ecuador
Chaucha. The Ruta del Cobre (“Copper Road”) project is located west of Cuenca city and south of Guayaquil. The
mineralization in this area is characteristic of a copper-molybdenum porphyry system which is being explored since
2014. In 2021, the infill-drilling program was concluded, totaling 121,000 meters of diamond drilling. With this
information, we began the project’s feasibility study. We expect to conclude it in the second quarter of 2022.
Argentina
In 2011, we started exploration activities in Argentina in the Neuquen province. In 2015, we performed geological
exploration in the Salta, Rio Negro and Neuquen provinces where we expected to locate copper porphyry with precious
metals epithermal systems. Starting 2017, we performed prospection and geological evaluation work in the provinces of
San Juan and Rio Negro with the exploration of silver-gold epithermal systems through geological mapping and surface
sampling. In 2021, superficial geological and geochemical work was concluded at the Cerro La Mina and Tanque Negro
prospects.
Cañadon del Moro. This is a low sulfidation epithermal deposit with high longitude seams located in the Rio Negro
province. We are conducting a 3,500 diamond drilling program in this prospect, of which we have drilled 1,300 meters
through 2021. We expect to conclude this program in 2022.
Table of Contents
79In 2022, we also plan to conduct a diamond drilling program of 3,000 meters at the Esperanza prospect, located in the
Rio Negro province. In addition, in 2022 we plan to conclude geological mapping and superficial geochemistry work at
the La Hoyada prospect, located in the province of Catamarca. We also expect to conduct a diamond drilling program of
2,000 meters at this prospect in 2022.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
Reference is made to the information under the caption “Litigation Matters” in the consolidated financial statement
Note 13 “Commitments and contingencies.”
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURE
Not applicable.
Table of Contents
80PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
AND ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
SCC COMMON STOCK:
SCC’s common stock is traded on the New York Stock Exchange (“NYSE”) and the Lima Stock Exchange (“BVL”).
SCC’s common stock symbol is SCCO on both the NYSE and the BVL. At December 31, 2021, there were 862 holders
of record of our common stock.
DIVIDEND AND STOCK MARKET PRICES:
The table below contains information on the cash dividends paid per share of capital stock and the high and low stock
prices on both the NYSE and the BVL for the periods indicated.
For the year 2021
    Dividend    NYSE:     BVL:
Quarters per Share High Low High Low
1st $ 0.60$ 
81.53$ 
65.82$ 
82.40$ 
65.50
2nd $ 0.70$ 
81.41$ 
59.41$ 
81.76$ 
59.66
3rd $ 0.90$ 
67.71$ 
56.14$ 
66.98$ 
55.80
4th $ 1.00$ 
66.21$ 
56.20$ 
66.50$ 
56.43
Year $ 3.20$ 
81.53$ 
56.14$ 
82.40$ 
55.80
For the year 2020
    Dividend    NYSE:     BVL:
Quarters per Share High Low High Low
1st $ 0.40$ 
44.41$ 
23.53$ 
44.23$ 
24.29
2nd $ 0.20$ 
39.77$ 
26.54$ 
39.50$ 
26.82
3rd $ 0.40$ 
48.52$ 
38.59$ 
48.32$ 
38.60
4th $ 0.50$ 
65.82$ 
44.49$ 
65.90$ 
45.85
Year $ 1.50$ 
65.82$ 
23.53$ 
65.90$ 
24.29
For a description of limitations on our ability to make dividend distributions, see “Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—“Liquidity and Capital Resources” and Note 11 “Financing”
to the consolidated financial statements.
DIRECTORS’ STOCK AWARD PLAN
The following table contains certain information related to our shares held as treasury stock for the Directors’ stock
award plan as of December 31, 2021:
Equity Compensation Plan Information
    Number of securities to be    Weighted-average    Number of securities
issued upon exercise of exercise price of remaining available
Plan Category outstanding options outstanding optionsfor future issuance
Directors’ stock award plan  N/A  N/A   194,800
For additional information see Note 14—“Stockholders Equity—Directors’ Stock Award Plan.”
Table of Contents
81SCC COMMON STOCK REPURCHASE PLAN:
In 2008, our BOD authorized a $500 million share repurchase program that has since been increased by the BOD and is
currently authorized to $3 billion. Pursuant to this program, the Company purchased common stock as shown in the table
below. These shares are available for general corporate purposes. The Company may purchase additional shares of its
common stock from time to time, based on market conditions and other factors. This repurchase program has no
expiration date and may be modified or discontinued at any time.
Period
                Total     Maximum     
Number of Number of
Shares Shares that
Total Purchased May Yet Be
Number of Average as Part of Purchased
Shares Price Paid Publicly Under the Total Cost
From To Purchased per ShareAnnounced PlanPlan @ $61.71(1)($ in millions)
2008  2012  46,914,486$ 18.72  46,914,486     878.1
2013:      10,245,000  27.47  57,159,486     281.4
2014:      22,711,428  30.06  79,870,914     682.8
2015:      36,689,052  27.38  116,559,966     1,004.4
2016:      2,937,801  24.42  119,497,767     71.7
Total purchased      119,497,767$ 24.42     1,322,855$ 2,918.4
(1)NYSE closing price of SCC common shares at December 31, 2021.
The SCC share repurchase program has registered no activity since the third quarter of 2016. The NYSE closing price of
SCC common shares at December 31, 2021 was $61.71 and the maximum number of shares that the Company could
purchase at that price was 1.3 million.
As a result of the repurchase of shares of SCC’s common stock, Grupo Mexico’s direct and indirect ownership was
88.9% as of December 31, 2021 and 2020.
SHAREHOLDER RETURN PERFORMANCE PRESENTATION
Set forth below is a line graph comparing the yearly change in the cumulative total returns on the Company’s common
stock against cumulative total return on the S&P 500 Stock Index and the S&P Metals and Mining Select Industry Index
for the five-year period ending December 31, 2021. The chart below analyzes the total return on SCC’s common stock
for the period commencing December 31, 2016 and ending December 31, 2021, compared to the total return of the
S&P 500 and the S&P Metals and Mining Select Industry Index for the same five-year period.
Table of Contents
82Comparison of Five Year Cumulative Total Return *
SCC Stock, S&P 500 Index and S&P Metals and Mining Select Industry Index **
*Total return assumes reinvestment of dividends
**The comparison assumes $100 invested on December 31, 2016
Total Return per Year  
    2017    2018    2019    2020    2021 
SCC   
50.8%   (33.0)%   
44.6%   
59.0% (0.4)%
S&P 500   
19.4%   (6.2)%   
28.9%   
16.3% 
26.9%
S&P M + MS   
19.4%   (27.0)%   
13.0%   
14.4% 
34.0%
The foregoing Performance Graph and related information shall not be deemed “soliciting material” or “filed” with the
SEC or subject to Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, nor shall such information be
incorporated by reference into any future filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or Securities Exchange Act of 1934,
each as amended, except to the extent that the Company specifically incorporates it by reference into such filing.

Table of Contents
83ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
This Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations relates to and should be
read together with our Audited Consolidated Financial Statements as of and for each of the years in the three-year
period ended December 31, 2021. Therefore, unless otherwise noted, the discussion below of our financial condition and
results of operations is for Southern Copper Corporation and its subsidiaries (collectively, “SCC,” “Southern Copper,”
“the Company,” “our,” and “we”) on a consolidated basis for all periods. Our financial results may not be indicative of
our future results.
This discussion contains forward-looking statements that are based on management’s current expectations, estimates
and projections about our business and operations. Our actual results may differ materially from those currently
anticipated and expressed in the forward-looking statements as a result of a number of factors. See Item 1 “Business—
Cautionary Statement.”
EXECUTIVE OVERVIEW
Business:  Our business is primarily the production and sale of copper. In the process of producing copper, a number of 
valuable metallurgical by-products are recovered, which we also produce and sell. Market forces outside of our control 
largely determine the sale prices for our products. Our management, therefore, focuses on value creation through copper 
production, cost control, production enhancement and maintaining a prudent capital structure to remain profitable. We 
endeavor to achieve these goals through capital spending programs, exploration efforts and cost reduction programs. Our 
aim is to remain profitable during periods of low copper prices and to maximize financial performance in periods of high 
copper prices. We are one of the world’s largest copper mining companies in terms of production and sales and our 
principal operations are in Peru and Mexico. We also have an active ongoing exploration program in Chile, Argentina 
and Ecuador. 
We believe we hold one of the world’s largest copper reserves and resources positions. As of December 31, 2021, our
copper mineral reserves, calculated at a copper price of $3.30 per pound, totaled 93,497 million pounds of contained
copper, at the following locations:
Copper contained in ore reserves     Million pounds
Mexican open‑pit   24,954
Peruvian operations   50,072
Development projects   18,471
Total   93,497
Outlook:  Various key factors affect our outcome. These include, but are not limited to, the following:
●Sales structure:  In the last three years, approximately 81.0% of our revenues came from the sale of copper, 8.0% 
from molybdenum, 5.0% from silver, 3.0% from zinc, and 3.0% from various other products, including gold, 
sulfuric acid and other materials.
●Copper: In the last quarter of 2021, the LME copper price increased from an average of $3.25 per pound in the
fourth quarter of 2020 to $4.40 (+35.4%). Currently, we are seeing prices in the range of $4.40 to $4.50 per pound,
still higher than the 2021 average of $4.23 per pound and bodes a positive outlook for the Company. We believe the
following factors are influencing the market:
●The most relevant market intelligence houses for the copper market are expecting a market balance for
2022.
Table of Contents
84●This assumes a growth in demand of 3% in 2022, particularly in terms of cathode consumption in the U.S.
and Europe. An economic slowdown is expected in China, with growth estimated at 5.1% (according to the
World Bank) due to its real estate troubles and the impact of the Omicron variant.
●The combined inventories of the LME, Comex, Shanghai and Bonded warehouses remain at very low
levels. The combined sum of these inventories fell from 569,000 tonnes in September 2021 to 369,000
tonnes at the end of December 2021; a 35% reduction. This unusually low inventory represents about one
week of consumption.
●The uncertainty regarding future production growth in Chile and Peru, which together represent about 40%
of the world supply.
●Molybdenum:  It represented approximately 9.6% of our sales in 2021. Molybdenum prices averaged $15.51 per 
pound in 2021, compared to $8.57 in 2020, a 81.0% increase.
Molybdenum is mainly used to produce special alloys of stainless steel that require significant hardness, corrosion
and heat resistance. A new use for this metal is in lubricants and sulfur filtering of heavy oils and shale gas
production.
●Silver:  We believe that silver prices will have support due to its industrial uses as well as being perceived as a value 
shelter in times of economic uncertainty. Silver represented 4.3% of our sales in 2021.
●Zinc: Average zinc prices increased by 32.0% in 2021 compared with 2020. We believe zinc has very good long-
term fundamentals due to its significant industrial consumption and expected production. Zinc represented 2.7% of
our sales in 2021.
●Production: For 2022, we expect to produce 922,000 tonnes of copper, a decrease of 3.8% compared to 2021; as
production will still be affected by a temporary reduction in ore grade and recovery at our Peruvian operations.
We expect our copper production to recover by 2023 and reach 992,000 tonnes of production as we get Peruvian
production back on track and generate new production on our Pilares, El Pilar and Buenavista-Zinc Concentrator
projects.
We also expect to produce 25,100 tonnes of molybdenum, which represents a decrease of 17.2% compared to 2021
production levels. In 2022, we expect to produce 19.0 million ounces of silver, in line with 2021 production.
Additionally, we expect to produce 71,200 tonnes of zinc from our mines, up 6.3% from 2021 production level.
●Capital investments:  Capital investments were $892.3 million for 2021. This is 50.7% higher than in 2020, and 
represented 26.3% of net income. Our growth program to develop the full production potential of our Company is 
underway. We are currently developing a new organic growth plan whose goal is to increase our copper volume 
production to 1.8 million tonnes by the end of this decade.
For 2022, the Board of Directors approved a capital investment program of $1,542.4 million.
COVID-19
The full impact of the COVID-19 pandemic worldwide is not yet known and, accordingly, the magnitude of the COVID-
19 impact on the Company’s financial condition, liquidity and future operating results is still uncertain. However, we
believe we are beginning a new stage in the COVID-19 crisis, where outbreaks will be better controlled worldwide,
which, we hope, will bode well for a strong recovery across the globe in the near future. Senior Management continues
to actively monitor the global situation´s effect on the Company´s financial condition, liquidity, operations, suppliers,
industry and workforce and is focusing principally on the health, safety and well-being of our employees, their families
and the communities where we have operations. As of December 31, 2021, the strong global economic recovery has
generated significant challenges for the global shipping industry, which have led to congestion at ports, shortage of
containers and a lack of space on ships. This situation has caused the Company to experience some delays in the
Table of Contents
85reception of imported materials as well as in the shipment of its products and receivable collections. This, however, has
had no material impact on the financial position of the Company.
Considering the market outlook previously described, we have a positive view for the copper market in the near future.
The Company maintains a solid financial position and performance level. We believe this has allowed and will continue
to allow us to deal with the effects of the pandemic in a way that prevents adverse material effects on our operations and
financial results. The table below compares some of our financial information as follows:
2021 2020
($ in millions, except ratios)
Cash and cash equivalents 3,002.0 2,183.6
Accounts receivable 1,446.6 1,136.6
Total assets 18,297.616,946.5
Long term debt 6,247.9 6,544.2
Sales 10,934.1 7,984.9
RATIOS
Current assets to current liabilities 2.73 3.49
Accounts receivable turnover (1) 7.56 7.03
Total debt ratio (2) 0.36 0.39
Net income margin (3) 31.1% 19.7%
(1)Represents net sales divided by accounts receivable.
(2)Represents total debt divided by total assets.
(3)Represents net income divided by net sales, as a percentage.
At the present time, our operations are in compliance with all sanitary and government regulations and maintain proper
environmental safeguards. Our COVID-19 emergency protocol has reinforced preventive measures such as disinfecting,
clinical monitoring before work, cleaning and sanitizing of work areas and respect for social distancing. We have also
restricted the access of contractors, suppliers and personnel to our facilities if visits are not indispensable and enforced
multiple actions to limit workforce exposure to COVID-19 by imposing travel restrictions, prohibiting face-to-face
meetings and urging frequent hand washing, as well as adhering to all other health, safety and social distancing measures
required by governmental authorities.
For the full year 2021, our production facilities in Mexico and Peru were working at approximately 95% of their
production capacity. As of December 31, 2021, approximately 96% of the workforce in Mexico and 74% of the
workforce in Peru was working on site or at home under strict safety measures; the remaining labor force was not
working, including all individuals at high risk due to age and/or preexisting medical conditions. We have also fully
restored exploration activities at all of our locations.
The Company has launched several programs and initiatives in all of the regions where we operate to help communities
combat the COVID-19 pandemic. In Peru, a partnership was established with the government in July 2021 to help
vaccinate 40% of the population in the five regions where Southern Copper Corporation has operations (Apurimac,
Arequipa, Cajamarca, Moquegua and Tacna). The Company donated over $2.45 million to help build, modernize, equip
and operate vaccination centers. In the context of this partnership, more than one million doses of COVID-19 vaccines
were administered in these five regions of Peru. This achievement surpassed our intial goal of administering 850
thousand doses and reached 48% of the target population. As of December 31, 2021, 96.1% of our workforce was fully
vaccinated against COVID-19.
In addition, Minera Mexico has invested approximately $600,000 to purchase and operate a molecular laboratory for
PCR tests in the community of Cananea, Sonora. This facility is offering testing to members of the community and
beneficiaries of the Federal Public Health System. The federal healthcare authority is currently using the Company
Table of Contents
86facilities as vaccination sites, where Minera México’s personnel are providing medical support, food and technical 
assistance to register vaccination in the official portal of the Mexican Federal Government.  
KEY MATTERS
Below, we discuss several matters that we believe are important to understand our results of operations and financial
condition. These matters include (i) earnings, (ii) production, (iii) “operating cash costs” as a measure of our
performance, (iv) metal prices, (v) business segments, (vi) the effect of inflation and other local currency issues and
(vii) our capital investment and exploration program.
Earnings:  The table below highlights key financial and operational data of our Company for the three years ended 
December 31, 2021 (in millions, except copper price and per share amounts):
                        Variance
2021     2020     2019     2021 - 2020    2020 - 2019
Copper price LME  4.23  2.80  2.72  1.43  0.08
Pounds of copper sold  2,052.9  2,305.9  2,173.8  (253.0)  132.1
Net sales $ 
10,934.1$ 7,984.9$ 7,285.6$ 2,949.2$ 699.3
Operating income $ 6,065.1$ 3,120.7$ 2,753.0$ 2,944.4$ 367.7
Income before income
taxes $ 5,696.8$ 2,745.8$ 2,426.5$ 2,951.0$ 319.3
Net income attributable
to SCC $ 3,397.1$ 1,570.4$ 1,485.8$ 1,826.7$ 84.6
Earnings per share $  4.39$  2.03$  1.92$ 2.36$  0.11
Dividends per share $  3.20$  1.50$  1.60$ 1.70$ (0.10)
Net sales in 2021 of $10.9 billion were the highest in our history and exceeded those recorded in 2020 by
$2,949.2 million. This increase was mainly the result of higher copper (+51.1% - LME), molybdenum (+81.0%), silver
(+22.1%) and zinc (+32.0%) prices; this effect was partially offset by lower copper (-11.0%), silver (-14.1%) and zinc
(-12.6%) sales volumes, which were mainly attributable to lower production and a decrease in sales of copper purchased
from third parties. Net sales in 2020 of $8.0 billion exceeded those recorded in 2019 by $699.3 million. This increase
was mainly the result of higher copper (+6.1%), molybdenum (+12.7%) and silver (+8.8%) sales volumes, as well as
higher copper (+2.9%) and silver (+27.6%) prices; this effect was partially offset by lower molybdenum (-24.0%) prices.
The two largest components of operating costs and expenses are cost of sales and depreciation, amortization and
depletion. In 2021, cost of sales decreased by $35.4 million and depreciation, amortization and depletion increased by
$30.4 million. The decrease in cost of sales in 2021 was mainly due to a significant decrease in the cost of metals
purchased from third parties; which was partially offset by increases in fuel, power and operating contractors costs. In
2020, cost of sales increased by $323.4 million and depreciation, amortization and depletion increased by $11.2 million.
The increase in cost of sales in 2020 was mainly due to an increase in the cost of metals purchased from third parties and
a decrease in the capitalization of leachable material. This increase was partially offset by a reduction in the cost of
diesel and fuel.
Net income attributable to SCC in 2021 was 116.3% higher than reported in 2020; this was mainly due to higher metal
prices and our strict cost control measures. Net income attributable to SCC in 2020 was 5.7% higher than reported in
2019; this was mainly due to higher sales volumes and to higher copper and silver prices.
Table of Contents
87Production: The table below contains mine production data of our Company for the three years ended December 31,
2021:
Variance
2021 - 2020 2020 - 2019  
2021     2020     2019     Volume    % Volume    %  
Copper (in million pounds)   2,112.5  2,207.6  2,191.0  (95.1)  (4.3)%   16.6  0.8%
Molybdenum (in million
pounds)   66.7  66.7  59.3  —  —%   7.4  12.5%
Zinc (in million pounds)   147.6  152.0  163.0  (4.4)  (2.9)%   (11.0)  (6.7)%
Silver (in million ounces)   19.0  21.5  20.3  (2.5)  (12.0)%   1.2  5.9%
The table below contains copper production data from each of our mines for the three years ended December 31, 2021:
Variance
2021 - 2020 2020 - 2019  
Copper (in million pounds): 2021    2020    2019    Volume    %     Volume    %  
Toquepala   505.7  562.4  568.8  (56.7)  (10.1)%   (6.4)  (1.1)%
Cuajone   372.6  371.8  344.8  0.8  0.2%   27.0  7.8%
La Caridad   282.4  298.8  293.4  (16.4)  (5.5)%   5.4  1.8%
Buenavista   932.6  951.9  965.8  (19.3)  (2.0)%   (13.9)  (1.4)%
IMMSA   19.2  22.7  18.2  (3.5)  (15.4)%   4.5  24.7%
Total mined copper   2,112.5  2,207.6  2,191.0  (95.1)  (4.3)%   16.6  0.8%
2021 compared to 2020:
Copper mine production in 2021 decreased 4.3% to 2,112.5 million pounds, from 2,207.6 million pounds in 2020. This
decrease was due to a decrease in production at the Toquepala mine (-10.1%; lower grades and recoveries), a decrease in
production at the La Caridad mine (-5.5%; lower ore grades), a decrease in production at the Buenavista operations
(-2.0%; lower ore grades). This was offset by a slight increase in production at the Cuajone mine (+0.2%).
Molybdenum production maintained the same level in 2021 compared to 2020 due to an increase in production at our
Toquepala (+6.2%) operations; this was offset by a decrease in production at our Buenavista (-4.4%), La Caridad
(-3.2%) and Cuajone (-0.8%) mines.
Zinc production decreased 2.9% in 2021, driven by decreases in production at our Santa Barbara (-22.1%) and Charcas
(-11.0%) operations due to lower ore grades; this was partially offset by an increase in production at our San Martin
(+4.3%) mine.
Mined silver production decreased 12.0% in 2021 compared to the level recorded in 2020; this was mainly due to a
decrease in production at our Toquepala (-19.7%), IMMSA (-17.5%), Buenavista (-14.0%) and La Caridad (-1.7%)
operations, which was partially offset by an increase in production at the Cuajone (+12.1%) mine.
2020 compared to 2019:
Copper mine production in 2020 increased 0.8% to 2,207.6 million pounds, up from 2,191.0 million pounds in 2019.
This increase was due to:
●Higher production at the Cuajone mine (+7.8%), which was driven by an increase in ore grades and recoveries.
●Higher production at the La Caridad mine (+1.8%).
●Higher production at the IMMSA operations (+24.6%), which was attributable to an increase in ore grades.
Molybdenum production increased 12.5% in 2020 compared to the level in 2019 due to an increase in production at our
Toquepala (+37.7%), Cuajone (+28.6%) and La Caridad (+3.2%) operations; this was partially offset by a decrease in
production at our Buenavista (-10.6%) mine.
Table of Contents
88Zinc production decreased 6.8% in 2020, which was driven by a decrease in ore grades and in production at our Santa
Eulalia (-96.0%) and Los Charcas (-5.0%) operations; this was partially offset by an increase in production at our San
Martin (+151.0%) mine, which restored production to full capacity at the end of the third quarter of 2019.
Mined silver production increased 6.2% in 2020 compared to the level recorded in 2019; this was mainly due to an
increase in production at our Cuajone (+8.8%), La Caridad (+16.4%) and IMMSA (+15.0%) operations, which was
partially offset by a decrease in production at the Toquepala (-2.4%) and Buenavista (-3.6%) mines.
Operating Cash Costs:  An overall benchmark used by us and a common industry metric to measure performance is 
operating cash costs per pound of copper produced. Operating cash cost is a non-GAAP measure that does not have a 
standardized meaning and may not be comparable to similarly titled measures provided by other companies. This non-
GAAP information should not be considered in isolation or as substitute for measures of performance determined in 
accordance with GAAP. A reconciliation of our operating cash cost per pound of copper produced to the cost of sales 
(exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) as presented in the consolidated statement of earnings is 
presented under the subheading, “Non-GAAP Information Reconciliation” on page 113. We disclose operating cash cost 
per pound of copper produced, both before and net of by-product revenues.
We define operating cash cost per pound of copper produced before by-product revenues as cost of sales (exclusive of
depreciation, amortization and depletion), plus selling, general and administrative charges, treatment and refining
charges net of sales premiums; less the cost of purchased concentrates, workers’ participation and other miscellaneous
charges, including royalty charges, and the change in inventory levels; divided by total pounds of copper produced by
our own mines.
In our calculation of operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, we exclude depreciation, amortization and
depletion, which are considered non-cash expenses. Exploration is considered a discretionary expenditure and is also
excluded. Workers’ participation provisions are determined on the basis of pre-tax earnings and are also excluded.
Additional exclusions from operating cash costs are items of a non-recurring nature and the mining royalty charge as it is
based on various calculations of taxable income, depending on which jurisdiction, Peru or Mexico, is imposing the
charge. We believe these adjustments will allow our management and stakeholders to see a presentation of our
controllable cash cost, which we believe is one of the lowest of all copper-producing companies of similar size.
We define operating cash cost per pound of copper produced net of by-product revenues as operating cash cost per
pound of copper produced, as defined in the previous paragraph, less by-product revenues and net revenue (loss) on sale
of metal purchased from third parties.
In our calculation of operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, net of by-product revenues, we credit against our
costs the revenues from the sale of all our by-products, including, molybdenum, zinc, silver, gold, etc. and the net
revenue (loss) on sale of metals purchased from third parties. We disclose this measure including the by-product
revenues in this way because we consider our principal business to be the production and sale of copper. As part of our
copper production process, much of our by-products are recovered. These by-products, as well as the processing of
copper purchased from third parties, are a supplemental part of our production process and their sales value contribute to
covering part of our incurred fixed costs. We believe that our Company is viewed by the investment community as a
copper company, and is valued, in large part, by the investment community’s view of the copper market and our ability
to produce copper at a reasonable cost.
We believe that both of these measures are useful tools for our management and our stakeholders. Our cash costs before
by-product revenues allow us to monitor our cost structure and address areas of concern within operating management.
The measure operating cash cost per pound of copper produced net of by-product revenues is a common measure used in
the copper industry and is a useful management tool that allows us to track our performance and better allocate our
resources. This measure is also used in our investment project evaluation process to determine a project’s potential
contribution to our operations, its competitiveness and its relative strength in different price scenarios. The expected
contribution of by-products is generally a significant factor used by the copper industry to determine whether to move
forward or not in the development of a new mining project. As the price of our by-product commodities can have
significant fluctuations from period to period, the value of its contribution to our costs can be volatile.
Table of Contents
89Our operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, as defined above, is presented in the table below for the
three years ended December 31, 2021:
Operating cash cost per pound of copper produced(1)
(In millions, except cost per pound and percentages)
2021 - 2020 2020 - 2019  
2021     2020     2019     Variance    %     Variance    %     
Total operating cash cost before
by‑product revenues $ 3,357.4$ 2,923.7$ 3,230.9$ 433.7  
14.8%  $ 
(307.2)  (9.5)%
Total by‑product revenues $ 
(1,997.7)$ 
(1,455.9)$ 
(1,359.2)$ 
(541.8)  
37.2%    (96.7)  7.1%
Total operating cash cost net of
by‑product revenues $ 1,359.7$ 1,467.8$ 1,871.7$ 
(108.1)  (7.4)%  $ 
(403.9)  
(21.6)%
Total pounds of copper produced(2)  2,041.7  2,136.1  2,133.3  (94.4)  (4.4)%    2.8  0.1%
Operating cash cost per pound
before by‑product revenues $  1.64$  1.37$  1.52$ 0.27  
19.7%  $ (0.15)  (9.9)%
By‑products per pound revenues$ (0.97)$ (0.68)$ (0.64)$ (0.29)  
42.6%  $ (0.04)  6.3%
Operating cash cost per pound net
of by‑product revenues $  0.67$  0.69$  0.88$ (0.02)  (2.9)%  $ (0.19)  
(21.6)%
(1)These are non-GAAP measures, see page 113 for reconciliation to GAAP measure.
(2)Net of metallurgical losses.
2021 compared to 2020:
As seen in the table above, our per pound cash cost before by-product revenues in 2021 was 19.7% higher than that
recorded in 2020. This result was mainly attributable to an increase in production costs and to the unit cost effect
generated by a decrease in pounds of copper produced. Our cash cost per pound net of by-product revenues for 2021 was
2.9% below that seen for the same period of 2020 and was mainly attributable to an increase in by-product revenue
credits, which was partially offset by an uptick in production costs.
2020 compared to 2019:
As seen in the table above, our per pound cash cost before by-product revenues in 2020 was 9.9% lower than that
recorded in 2019. This reduction is mainly attributable to a temporary decrease in production costs, as some operating,
stripping and maintenance costs were reduced or postponed due to the COVID-19 pandemic. Our cash cost per pound
net of by-product revenues for 2020 was 21.6% below that seen for the same period of 2019 and was also attributable to
the temporary decrease in production costs outlined above.
Metal Prices:  The profitability of our operations is dependent on, and our financial performance is significantly 
affected by, the international market prices for the products we produce, especially for copper, molybdenum, zinc and 
silver.
We are subject to market risks arising from the volatility of copper and other metals prices. For instance, during the 
period from January 2012 through December 2021, the London Metal Exchange (LME) copper settlement price varied 
from a low of $1.96 per pound in 2016 to a  record high of $4.86 per pound in 2021, and the Metals Week Molybdenum 
Dealer Oxide weekly average price ranged from a low of $4.46 per pound in 2015 to a high of $20.01 per pound in 2021. 
Metal prices historically have been subject to wide fluctuations and are affected by numerous factors beyond our control, 
as described further in Item 1A Risk Factors. These factors, which affect each commodity to varying degrees, include 
international economic and political conditions, levels of supply and demand, the availability and cost of substitutes, 
inventory levels maintained by producers and others and, to a lesser degree, inventory carrying costs and currency 
exchange rates. In addition, the market prices of certain metals have on occasion been subject to rapid short-term 
changes due to economic concerns and financial investments.
Table of Contents
90For 2022, assuming that expected metal production and sales are achieved; 2021 tax rates are unchanged and giving no
effects relative to potential hedging programs, metal price sensitivity factors indicate the following change in estimated
annual net income attributable to SCC resulting from metal price changes:
    Copper     Molybdenum    Zinc     Silver
Change in metal prices (per pound except silver—per ounce)$  0.10$  1.00$  0.10$  1.00
Change in net earnings (in millions) $  119.4$  33.6$  14.5$  11.3
Business Segments:  We view our Company as having three reportable segments and manage it on the basis of these 
segments. These segments are (1) our Peruvian operations, (2) our Mexican open-pit operations and (3) our Mexican 
underground operations, known as our IMMSA unit. Our Peruvian operations include the Toquepala and Cuajone mine 
complexes and the smelting and refining plants, industrial railroad and port facilities that service both mines. Our 
Mexican open-pit operations include La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes, the smelting and refining plants and 
support facilities, which service both mines. Our IMMSA unit includes five underground mines and several industrial
processing facilities.
Segment information is included in our review of “Results of Operations” in this item and also in Note 19 “Segment and
Related Information” of the consolidated financial statements.
Inflation and Exchange Rate Effect of the Peruvian sol and the Mexican peso:  Our functional currency is the 
U.S. dollar and our revenues are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars. Significant portions of our operating costs are 
denominated in Peruvian sol and Mexican pesos. Accordingly, when inflation and currency devaluation/appreciation of 
the Peruvian and Mexican currency occur, our operating results can be affected. In recent years, we believe these 
changes have had no material effect on our results and financial position. Please see Item 7A “Quantitative and 
Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk” for more detailed information.
Capital Investment Program:  We made capital investments of $892.3 million in 2021, $592.2 million in 2020 and 
$707.5 million in 2019. In general, the capital investments and projects described below are intended to increase 
production, decrease costs or address social and environmental commitments.
Table of Contents
91The table below contains information on our capital investments for the three years ended December 31, 2021 (in
millions):
    2021     2020     2019
Peruvian projects:
Toquepala expansion project $ 21.8$  5.1$ 41.1
Quebrada Honda dam expansion   86.3  30.9  1.6
Relocation of facilities at Toquepala   23.8  6.6  0.3
Toquepala mine truck acquisition   —   9.7  —
Fresh water pipeline replacement at Suches   6.2  14.3  —
Tailings disposal—Quebrada Honda dam   0.8  0.4  1.0
Ilo sulfuric acid plant N°1 modification   0.2  2.0  5.1
Building of the containment dike N°4 at Quebrada Santallana  6.5  9.5  —
Other projects   28.8  21.5  51.5
Sub‑total projects   174.4  100.0  100.6
Maintenance and replacement   150.6  109.4  216.3
Net change in capital expenditures incurred but not yet paid   (4.1)  (14.4)  33.2
Total Peruvian expenditures   320.9  195.0  350.1
Mexican projects:   
New Buenavista concentrator   18.9  68.3  1.0
Buenavista Zinc project  126.1  58.4  1.2
Pilares Mine  30.9  33.4  —
Expansion of mine pit at Buenavista   24.6  23.9  —
Lime plant - Sonora  30.7  9.3  1.4
Solutions system improvements of Tinajas   0.7  10.0  6.0
Quebalix IV   2.8  0.1  0.7
New tailing disposal deposit at Buenavista mine   59.7  27.0  35.8
Over elevation of tailings deposit N° 7 at La Caridad mine   1.4  11.0  25.4
Sonora River water restitution system in Moritas Basin   —   —   1.8
San Martin mine restoration  20.7  21.1  48.9
Other projects   59.2  17.9  84.2
Sub‑total projects   375.7  280.4  206.4
Maintenance and replacement   184.0  132.5  148.6
Net change in capital expenditures incurred but not yet paid   11.7  (15.7)  2.4
Total Mexican expenditures   571.4  397.2  357.4
Total capital investments $ 892.3$ 592.2$ 707.5
In 2022, we plan to invest $1,542.4 million in capital projects. In addition to our ongoing capital maintenance and
replacement spending, our principal capital programs include the following:
Projects in Mexico:
Buenavista Zinc - Sonora: This project is located within the Buenavista facility and includes the development of a new
concentrator to produce approximately 100,000 tonnes of zinc and 20,000 tonnes of copper per year. We have completed
the engineering study. In order to continue with the project, stronger preventive measures to combat COVID-19 have
been put in place. Procurement has progressed 96% and all the main equipment is on site. Additionally, construction site
works are in progress. The project has all the necessary permits. The project´s budget is $413 million, and we expect to
initiate operations in 2023. As of December 31, 2021, we had invested $217 million in this project. When completed, we
anticipate that this new facility will double the Company’s zinc production capacity and will provide 490 direct jobs and
1,470 indirect jobs.
Pilares - Sonora: This project, located six kilometers from La Caridad, will be developed as an open-pit mine operation
with an annual production capacity of 35,000 tonnes of copper in concentrate. A new 25-meter wide off-road facility for
mining trucks has been built and will be used to transport the ore from the pit to the primary crushers at the La Caridad
Table of Contents
92copper concentrator. This will significantly improve the overall mineral ore grade (combining the 0.78% expected from
Pilares with 0.34% from La Caridad). The budget for Pilares is $159 million and we expect the project to begin
production in the second half of 2022. As of December 31, 2021, we had invested $75.9 million in this project.
El Pilar - Sonora: This is a low-capital intensity copper development project strategically located in Sonora, Mexico,
approximately 45 kilometers from our Buenavista mine. Its copper oxide mineralization contains estimated proven and
probable reserves of 281 million tonnes of ore with an average copper grade of 0.301%. El Pilar will operate as a
conventional open-pit mine with an annual production capacity of 36,000 tonnes of copper cathodes. This operation will
use highly cost efficient and environmentally friendly SX-EW technology. We estimate a development investment of
approximately $310 million. The results from experimental pads in leaching process have confirmed adequate levels of
copper recovery. We expect this project to start production in 2023 with an expected mine life of 13 years. The basic
engineering study is finished and the Company continues developing project and site environmental activities.
Lime plant - Sonora: As part of our cost improvement projects, we are building a new lime plant with a production
capacity of 600 metric tonnes per day, which will be the largest lime plant of Mexico. This facility will allow us to
reduce to approximately 50% our current lime cost at our Mexican operations. The total budget for the plant is $63
million, of which we have spent $41 million as of December 31, 2021. We expect this project initiate operations in the
third quarter of 2022.
The San Martin mine recovery program. After eleven years of illegal stoppage, we resumed control of the San Martin
mine in August 2018. The San Martin facilities deteriorated during this period but we made a major renovation and
restarted operations during the second quarter of 2019. Currently, the mine has 200,000 tonnes of ore and the
concentrator has initiated production. In 2020, we produced 14,361 tonnes of zinc, 2.8 million ounces of silver, 3,601
tonnes of copper, and 1,425 tonnes of lead. As of December 2021, the Company had completed most of the rehabilitation
plan to restore operations at the San Martin mine with a total expense of approximately $90.5 million; the mine has since
reached full operating capacity.
Projects in Peru:
Quebrada Honda dam expansion – Tacna: This project aims to enlarge the main and lateral dams in Quebrada Honda and
includes the relocation of some facilities due to dam growth and implementation of other facilities for water recovery,
among other factors. As of December 31, 2021, construction and pre-commissioning activities are in progress with work
on three fronts. This project has a total budget of $140.0 million, of which we had committed $6.8 million and invested
$114.6 million as of December 31, 2021.
Tia Maria - Arequipa: On July 8, 2019, we were granted the construction permit for this 120,000 ton annual SX-EW
copper greenfield project with a total capital budget of $1,400 million. The Government awarded the permit after
completing an exhaustive review process, complying with all established regulatory requirements and addressing all
observations raised. The challenges surrounding the construction permit were overcome when on October 30, 2019, the
Mining Council of the Peruvian Ministry of Energy and Mines ratified the construction permit for the Tia Maria project.
The Company has been consistently working to promote the welfare of the Islay province population. As part of these
efforts, we have implemented successful social programs in education, healthcare and productive development to
improve the quality-of-life in the region. We also have promoted agricultural and livestock activities in the Tambo Valley
and supported growth in manufacturing, fishing and tourism in Islay.
On January 7, 2021, the mayor of the Islay province (Arequipa, Peru) awarded a City Diploma to SPCC in recognition
of the Company’s efforts to assist the population of Islay during the COVID-19 pandemic. Notably, SPCC also provided
a portable oxygen plant to a local hospital and financed a COVID monitoring unit that aided more than 7,000 people in
2021. This year, SPCC fortified its relation with the regional government and successfully overcame its opposition to
project initiation. This new consensus was reflected in an agreement for “works for taxes” for projects relative to health
facilities and roads. Our efforts to ensure the current and long-term welfare of the population in the area of influence of
the Tia Maria project were recognized by several local associations, which sent letters to the National Government to
Table of Contents
93request project initiation. In July 2021, the Ministry of Energy and Mines sent a missive to Southern Copper recognizing
its progress in securing social acceptance of the Tia Maria project.
We reiterate our view that the initiation of construction activities at Tia Maria will generate significant economic
opportunities for the Islay province and the Arequipa region. During the construction and operation phase, we will make
it a priority to hire local labor to fill the 9,000 jobs (3,600 direct and 5,400 indirect) that we expect to generate during Tia
Maria’s construction phase. When operating, we expect Tia Maria to directly employ 600 workers and indirectly provide
jobs for another 4,200. Additionally, from day one of our operations, we will generate significant contributions to
revenues in the Arequipa region via royalties and taxes.
We expect the Peruvian government to acknowledge the significant progress the project has made on the social front and
the important contributions that Tia Maria will generate for Peru´s economy and, consequently, take the necessary steps
to provide SCC with adequate support to initiate construction.
This greenfield project, located in Arequipa, Peru, will use state of the art SX-EW technology with the highest
international environmental standards. SX-EW facilities are the most environmentally friendly in the industry due to
their technical process with no emissions released into the atmosphere. 
Potential projects:
We have a number of other projects that we may develop in the future. We continuously evaluate new projects on the
basis of our long-term corporate objectives, strategic and operating fit, expected return on investment, required
investment, estimated production, estimated cash-flow profile, social and environmental considerations, among other
factors. All capital spending plans will continue to be reviewed and adjusted to respond to changes in the economy,
market conditions or the COVID-19 pandemic.
El Arco - Baja California: This is a world-class copper deposit located in the central part of the Baja California
peninsula, with mineral reserves of over 1.3 billion tonnes with an ore grade of 0.39%, 0.14 0.14 grams of gold per ton
and 1.8 grams of silver per ton, and 140 million tonnes of leach material with an ore grade of 0.27%. This project
envisions an open-pit mine with a combined concentrator and SX-EW operations, with an estimated production capacity
of 190,000 tonnes of copper and 105,000 ounces of gold annually. The project has an estimated capital budget of $2.9
billion. The Company has started the baseline study and it is reviewing the basic engineering analysis to request the
environmental impact permit. Several years back, we began to acquire the rights to all relevant mining concessions in the
area; this process was completed in 2020.
Los Chancas—Apurimac:  This greenfield project, located in Apurimac, Peru, is a copper and molybdenum porphyry
deposit. Current estimates include 52 million tonnes of sulfide indicated mineral resources with a copper grade of 0.59%,
as well as 98 million tonnes of oxide indicated mineral resources with a copper content of 0.45%. Los Chancas project
envisions an open-pit mine with a combined operation of concentrator and SX-EW processes to produce 130,000 tonnes
of copper and 7,500 tonnes of molybdenum anually. The estimated capital investment is $2,600 million and the project is
expected to be in operation in 2027. In 2020, we continued to engage in social and environmental improvements for the
local communities. In 2021, we continued to engage in social and environmental improvements for the local
communities and we worked in the environmental impact assessment for the project.
Michiquillay Project—Cajamarca:  On June 12, 2018, Southern Copper signed a contract and made an initial payment of
$12.5 million for the acquisition of the Michiquillay project in Cajamarca, Peru. In June 2021, the Company paid an
additional $12.5 million to acquire the project. The Company has created a multidisciplinary management team to plan
the development of this project. As part of this plan, the Company has established contact with the local and regional
authorities and communities in order to promote programs for the sustainable development of the area. In 2020, we
continued to develop social and environmental programs for the local communities. On September 3, 2021 the Company
signed a Social Agreement with the Michiquillay Community and on November 12, 2021, the Company signed a Social 
Agreement with the Encañada Community.  Additionally, on October 1, 2021 the Peruvian Ministry of Energy and 
Mines approved the semi-detailed Environmental Impact Study for the project. 
Table of Contents
94The Social Agreements with the Michiquillay and the Encañada communities represent an opportunity to improve the
quality of life of the residents of those communities via our strong social programs and backed by a solid framework for
technical work at the project level. These events are important steps that will allow Southern Copper to initiate an in-
depth exploration program in the first semester of 2022.
Michiquillay is a world class mining project with estimated inferred mineral resources of 2,288 million tonnes with an
estimated copper grade of 0.43%. When developed, we expect Michiquillay to produce 225,000 tonnes of copper per
year (along with by-products of molybdenum, gold and silver) for an initial mine life of more than 25 years, at a
competitive cash-cost. We estimate an investment of approximately $2.5 billion will be required and expect production
start-up by 2028 and that Michiquillay will become one of Peru´s largest copper mines. The project will create
significant business opportunities in the Cajamarca region; generate new jobs for the local communities and contribute
with taxes and royalties to the local, regional and national governments.
The above information is based on estimates only. We cannot make any assurances that we will undertake any of these
projects or that the information noted is accurate.
ENVIRONMENTAL, SOCIAL AND GOVERNANCE (“ESG”)
We believe acting in a responsible and transparent manner in the social, economic and environmental fields is essential
to a sustainable development for the Company and the regions where we operate. In Southern Copper Corporation we
are committed to the United Nations’ Sustainable Development Goals and the Global Compact principles. Caring for the
environment, tackling climate change, respecting human rights, and having a responsible production are at the center of
our sustainability strategy, which is comprised of specific goals and objectives in areas such as water management,
climate change and mining waste, human talent, occupational safety and health, labor relations, and community
development, among others.
The Company has updated a range of sustainability-related corporate policies, which are publicly disclosed on Grupo
Mexico’s website: https://www.gmexico.com/en/Pages/Politicsds.aspx. These policies, which are applicable to SCC and
its subsidiaries, formalize our vision, commitments and objectives to promote sustainable development and generate
shared value for our stakeholders.
The Company’s performance with respect to these commitments and ESG matters is reported annually in the
sustainability report of our indirect parent company, Grupo Mexico. Information and performance of SCC can be found
in the sustainability reports. These have followed the Global Reporting Initiative Standards (GRI) since 2006, and since
2020 the sustainability reports also have included the metrics of the Sustainability Accounting Standards Board (SASB)
and the recommendations of the Task Force on Climate-Related Financial Disclosure (TCFD).
We are committed to improving our ESG performance by adopting best practices. Southern Copper Corporation has
been consistent in increasing its scores on the Corporate Sustainability Assessment (CSA) of S&P since 2018, achieving
a score of 61 in 2021. As a result, the Company has been integrated for the third consecutive year to the Dow Jones
Sustainability Index MILA (which stands for “Integrated Latin-American Markets” in Spanish). SCC’s 2021 score was 
79% higher than the Mining and Metals industry average. Additionally, the Company was included in the S&P Global 
Sustainability Yearbook 2022  for being a top performer in this industry. The company achieved good performances in 
issues such as business ethics, labor practice, human rights, climate strategy, water management, social impact on 
communities, corporate citizenship and philanthropy, operational ecoefficiencies, environmental and social reporting, 
among others.
HEALTH AND SAFETY
At Southern Copper Corporation, the health and safety of our employees is what matters the most. Therefore, respecting
human rights and taking care of the health, safety and well being of our employees and contractors is a core value and is
Table of Contents
95an essential part of our activities. Safety at work is not negotiable at SCC; it is everyone’s responsibility and is a
condition for employment.
The Company seeks to continue strengthening operational risk management processes by implementing preventive and
corrective measures. For instance, traffic management plans have been implemented in all open pit mines, haul trucks
have been equipped with antifatigue systems, and health and safety performance expectations have been included in
suppliers and contractors’ code of conduct.
Two business units of SCC were recognized by the Mining Chamber of Mexico for obtaining top safety performance in
their respective categories in 2020. La Caridad mine received the “Silver Helmet” award (“Casco de Plata”) in the
category for open-pit mining operations with more than 500 employees, and the refinery and metallurgical plants
received the same distinction in the category for metallurgical plants and smelters with up to 500 employees. In 2021,
the Company also updated its health & safety policy and key commitments, as disclosed on Grupo Mexico’s website.
COMMUNITY OUTREACH
For Southern Copper Corporation it is our priority to be a good neighbor in the localities close to our operations.
Working together with the communities, we have the opportunity to collaborate and forge a path based on our common
objectives related to social and economic development, while supporting the fulfillment of the United Nations’
Sustainable Development Goals. For this reason, we believe that community outreach must be based on transparency
and trust, promoting long-lasting ties.
We have implemented several sustainable development policies designed to integrate the Company´s operations with 
local communities in areas where we operate. Some of the relevant policies include the General Policy for Sustainable 
Development; a Community Outreach Policy; a General Policy of Respect for the Rights of Indigenous Peoples and 
Communities, a Human Rights Policy Statement. These policies focus on creating permanent and positive relationships 
to generate optimal social conditions and promote sustainable development in the areas where we operate. We continue 
to make significant expenditures for community programs.  
Since 2018, the Interamerican Bank of Development (BID) has made reference to SCC’s community outreach model as
one of the best practices in the extractive industry in Latin America. In 2021, BID has reaffirmed this once again, and
pointed out the Company’s success in adapting its community outreach programs in the context of the global pandemic
through the “Casa Grande Virtual” strategy implemented. Additionally, the government of Sonora recognized Southern
Copper Corporation for being a “Culturally Responsible Company” for the voluntary initiatives implemented to promote
and safeguard the state’s history, culture and traditions. Three of the community programs launched by the Company
were pinpointed as particularly relevant: the Itinerant Documentary Cinema Workshop, which led to the creation of over
200 films; the funding provided for organizing the “Festival Alfonso Ortiz Tirado” (“FAOT”) in Nacozari and Cananea;
and the creation of Youth Orchestras, which has led to the creation of six orchestras and four choirs . These educational
music programs are offered to more than 2,100 children in the communities surrounding our mining operations in
Mexico and Peru.
For additional information on our community programs, refer to Corporate Social Responsibility under Note 13
“Commitments and contingencies” to the consolidated financial statements. For further information on our disclosure on
Human Capital Resources, see the section included in Part I, Item 1 of this Annual Report.
ENVIRONMENT
Southern Copper Corporation seeks to attend to the needs of future generations by promoting a development that
benefits us all, today and tomorrow. We are committed to the continuous improvement of our environmental
performance and to promoting the adoption of the best environmental practices in our operations in order to contribute to
the transition towards a green economy. We are also committed to preserving and improving the environment by
implementing actions to generate a positive impact on biodiversity through our operations. To fulfil this commitment,
which is outlined in the Company’s Environmental Policy, we have developed action plans for biodiversity management
that are aligned with the guide for Good Practice Guidance for Mining and Biodiversity published by the International
Table of Contents
96Council on Mining and Metals (ICMM). We believe these plans further improve the Company’s capacity to implement
effective mitigation measures and contribute to the preservation and improvement of the environment at our operations.
Furthermore, as part of our commitment to certify our environmental systems with the international norm ISO 14001, in
2021 the business units of La Caridad and the Limestone Plant in México obtained their ISO 14001 certification.
Additionally, Southern Copper Corporation has also committed to embrace the Copper Mark, a voluntary assurance
framework involving onsite verifications by an independent auditor, that aims to promote responsible production
practices in the copper industry that contribute to the UN’s Sustainable Development Goals. The La Caridad open pit
mine and the Sonora Metallurgical Complex (smelter and refinery) are the first business units to start the certification
process. Throughout our operations we strive to protect the environment as well as the health, safety and human rights of
our people, stakeholders and communities where we operate. SCC’s commitment with the Copper Mark is a testament to
our commitment to transparency and responsible production practices. Through this third-party verification, our
stakeholders can be confident that the copper we produce upholds the highest possible sustainability standards.
CLIMATE CHANGE
SCC recognizes the importance and urgency of tackling climate change, and the Company is committed to support the
objective of the Paris Agreement on climate change, preserve the environment, minimize the environmental footprint of
our operations, and efficiently manage climate-related risks and opportunities. We recognize that climate change will
likely influence our strategy in various ways, and we aim to meet the expectations of the global business trends that are
moving to demand products with lower carbon footprint. Our focus is to seek continuous improvement in the responsible
use of natural resources while complying with applicable legal standards for prevention, mitigation, control and
remediation of environmental impacts.
The Company is committed to continually improve its management performance with respect to the aforementioned
issues, which is why it has initiated a multi-year process to align its disclosures on climate change with the TCFD
recommendations. As a result, beginning in 2020, Grupo Mexico’s Sustainable Development Report includes sections on
climate-related risks and opportunities, and more detailed information on climate targets, strategy and governance
mechanisms, as well as new emissions and energy metrics informed by SASB standards. The report can be accessed at
https://www.gmexico.com/en/Pages/development.aspx. We are referring our investors to Grupo Mexico's internet site for
details on the aforementioned initiatives for informative purposes only. We do not intend for this internet link to be an
active link or to otherwise incorporate the contents of the website into this Report on Form 10-K.
Since 2016, Grupo Mexico has been participating annually in the evaluation on Climate Change of CDP (formerly
known as Carbon Disclosure Project). In 2021, its score improved two levels from C to B, which is superior to the
Metal, smelting, refining & forming average, the averages in the region where the Company operates, and the global
average. The Company’s operational greenhouse gases emissions have decreased significantly over the last three years,
and we strive to further reduce the carbon footprint of our operations and products by, among other things, increasing the
use of renewable energy and implementing resources efficiency measures intended to minimize the consumption of
energy, water, and other natural resources. Thanks to our new 168 MW wind farm Fenicias in northern Mexico, the
Company’s electricity consumption coming from renewable sources is expected to surpass 25%.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
Our significant accounting policies are discussed in Note 2 “Summary of Significant Accounting Policies” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, included in Item 8 “Financial Statements and Supplementary Data” of this
Annual Report.
Our discussion and analysis of financial condition and results of operations, as well as quantitative and qualitative
disclosures about market risks, are based upon our consolidated financial statements, which have been prepared in
accordance with U.S. GAAP. Preparation of these consolidated financial statements requires our management to make
estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosures of contingent assets
and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the
reporting period. We make our best estimate of the ultimate outcome for these items based on historical trends and other
Table of Contents
97information available when the financial statements are prepared. Changes in estimates are recognized in accordance
with the accounting rules for the estimate, which is typically in the period when new information becomes available to
management. Areas where the nature of the estimate makes it reasonably possible that actual results could materially
differ from amounts estimated include: mineral reserves, revenue recognition, ore stockpiles on leach pads and related
amortization, estimated impairment of assets, asset retirement obligations, determination of discount rates related to the
operating lease liabilities, valuation allowances for deferred tax assets and unrecognized tax benefits. We base our
estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the
circumstances. Actual results may differ from these estimates under different assumptions or conditions.
Mineral Reserves:  For ore reserve estimation, we use metal price assumptions of $3.30 per pound for copper and $10.00 
per pound for molybdenum. These prices are intended to conservatively approximate average prices over the long term 
and are based on internal estimates for the curves of long-term metal prices.
Certain financial information is based on reserve estimates calculated on the basis of current average prices. These
include amortization of intangible assets and mine development. Variations in ore reserve calculations from changes in
metal price assumptions generally do not create material changes in our financial results. However, significant decreases
in metal prices could adversely affect our earnings by causing, among other things, asset impairment charges, please see
“Assets impairment” below.
Ore stockpiles on leach pads:  The leaching process is an integral part of the mining operations carried out at our open-
pit mines. We capitalize the production cost of leachable material at our Toquepala, La Caridad and Buenavista mines 
recognizing it as inventory. The estimates of recoverable mineral content contained in the leaching dumps are supported 
by engineering studies. As the production cycle of the leaching process is significantly longer than the conventional 
process of concentrating, smelting and electrolytic refining, we include current leach inventory (as part of work-in-
process inventories) and long-term leach inventory on our balance sheet. Amortization of leachable material is recorded 
by the units of production method.
On January 1, 2020, the Company aligned its capitalization method for its Peruvian and Mexican operations to capitalize
based on the allocation of copper content recoverable between ore and leach material. In addition, inventory
consumption is now valued at the average unit cost, instead of the declining percentages of recovery method used
previously. As a result of these changes, during 2020 the value of capitalized material decreased by $196.4 million and
consumption decreased by $29.3 million when compared to the previous capitalization method.
Management has evaluated ASC 250-10 and considered appropriate guidance to conclude that the aforementioned
classifies as a change in accounting estimate, and therefore should affect accounting books prospectively. Management
believes that this new method will result in a more accurate valuation of this material.
Asset Retirement Obligation:  Our mining and exploration activities are subject to various laws and regulations 
governing the protection of the environment. Accounting for reclamation and remediation obligations requires 
management to make estimates unique to each mining operation of the future costs we will incur to complete the 
reclamation and remediation work required to comply with existing laws and regulations. These estimates are based in 
part on our inflation and credit rate assumptions. Actual costs incurred in future periods could differ from amounts 
estimated. Additionally, future changes to environmental laws and regulations could increase the extent of reclamation 
and remediation work required to be performed by us. Any such increases in future costs could materially impact the 
amounts charged to operations for reclamation and remediation. In 2020, the Company made a change in the estimate for 
the asset retirement obligation for its Mexican operations, mainly due to a detailed review of the closing activities 
required for each facility. The effect of this change was an increase in the asset retirement obligation of $269.3 million, 
which was recorded in December 2020.
Asset retirement obligations are further discussed in Note 10 “Asset Retirement Obligation” to the consolidated financial
statements included herein.
Revenue Recognition: For certain of our sales of copper and molybdenum products, customer contracts allow for pricing
based on a month subsequent to shipping, in most cases within the following three months and in a few cases, in a period
that can exceed three months. In such cases, revenue is recorded at a provisional price at the time of shipment. The
Table of Contents
98provisionally priced copper sales are adjusted to reflect forward LME or COMEX copper prices at the end of
each month until a final adjustment is made to the price of the shipments upon settlement with customers pursuant to the
terms of the contract. In the case of molybdenum sales, for which there are no published forward prices, the
provisionally priced sales are adjusted to reflect the market prices at the end of each month until a final adjustment is
made to the price of the shipments upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract. (See details in
“Provisionally Priced Sales” under this Item 7).
Income Taxes:  In preparing our consolidated financial statements, we recognize income taxes in each of the 
jurisdictions in which we operate. For each jurisdiction, we calculate the actual amount currently payable or receivable, 
as well as deferred tax assets and liabilities attributable to temporary differences between the financial statement 
carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases. Deferred income tax assets and 
liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected to apply to taxable income in the years in which these 
temporary differences are expected to be recovered or settled. The effect on deferred tax assets and liabilities of a change 
in rate is recognized through the income tax provision in the period that the change is enacted.
A valuation allowance is provided for those deferred tax assets for which it is more likely than not that the related
benefits will not be realized. In determining the amount of the valuation allowance, we consider estimated future taxable
income, as well as feasible tax planning strategies in each jurisdiction. If we determine that we will not realize all or a
portion of our deferred tax assets, we will increase our valuation allowance with a charge to income tax expense.
Conversely, if we determine that we will ultimately be able to realize all or a portion of the related benefits for which a
valuation allowance has been provided, all or a portion of the related valuation allowance will be reduced with a credit to
income tax expense.
The Company’s operations are in multiple jurisdictions where uncertainties can arise in the application of complex tax
regulations. The final taxes paid are dependent upon many factors, including audits and negotiations with tax authorities.
The Company recognizes potential liabilities and records tax liabilities for anticipated tax audit issues based on its
estimate of whether, and the extent to which, additional taxes will be due. The Company adjusts these estimates in light
of changing facts and circumstances; however, due to the complexity of some of these uncertainties, final taxes paid may
be materially different from the Company’s current estimate of the tax liabilities. If its estimate of tax liabilities proves to
be less than the ultimate assessment, or payment of these amounts ultimately proves to be more than the recorded
amounts, the difference would be recognized in the period when the Company determines the change.
Asset Impairments:  We evaluate our long-term assets when events or changes in economic circumstances indicate that 
the carrying amount of such assets may not be recoverable. Our evaluations are based on business plans that are prepared 
using a time horizon that is reflective of our expectations of metal prices over our business cycle. We are currently using 
an average copper price of $2.20 per pound and an average molybdenum price of $5.00 per pound, which reflect what 
we believe, for impairment test purposes, is the lower range of the current price environment. The results of our 
impairment sensitivity analysis, which included a stress test using a copper price assumption of $2.00 per pound and a 
molybdenum price assumption of $4.00 per pound, showed projected discounted cash flows in excess of the carrying 
amounts of long-lived assets by margins ranging from 1.8 to 5.7 times such carrying amount.
In recent years, our assumptions for long-term average prices resulted in stricter evaluations for impairment analysis
than using the three year average prices for copper and molybdenum prices. Should this situation change in the future
with three-year average prices falling below the long-term price assumption, we would assess the need to use the three-
year average prices in our evaluations. We use an estimate of the future undiscounted net cash flows of the related asset
or asset group over the remaining life to measure whether the assets are recoverable and measure any impairment
compared to fair value.
Leases: In 2019, the Company adopted the new leases standard and it resulted in the recognition of right-of-use assets
and lease obligations on the Company´s balance sheet. After the analysis of this standard, the Company concluded that
all of its existing lease contracts are operating lease contracts. Right-of-use assets represent the Company’s right to use
an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilities represent an obligation by the Company to make lease
payments that arise from the lease. Lease right-of-use assets and liabilities are recognized at the inception date based on
the present value of lease payments over the lease term. As the Company’s lease contracts do not provide an implicit
Table of Contents
99rate, the Company uses its incremental borrowing rate based on the information available at the inception date to
determine the present value of lease payments.
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The following table highlights key financial results for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31,
2021 (in millions):
                    Variance
Statement of Earnings Data 2021     2020     2019 2021 - 2020    2020 - 2019
Net sales $ 10,934.1$ 7,984.9$ 7,285.6$ 2,949.2$  699.3
Operating costs and expenses   (4,869.0)  (4,864.2)  (4,532.6)  (4.8)  (331.6)
Operating income   6,065.1  3,120.7  2,753.0  2,944.4  367.7
Non‑operating income (expense)   (368.3)  (374.9)  (326.5)  6.6  (48.4)
Income before income taxes   5,696.8  2,745.8  2,426.5  2,951.0  319.3
Income taxes   (2,425.5)  (1,237.9)  (966.3)  (1,187.6)  (271.6)
Deferred income taxes   126.3  63.5  21.0  62.8  42.5
Equity earnings of affiliate   13.6  6.4  10.7  7.2  (4.3)
Net income attributable to non‑controlling
interest   (14.1)  (7.4)  (6.1)  (6.7)  (1.3)
Net income attributable to SCC $ 3,397.1$ 1,570.4$ 1,485.8$ 1,826.7$  84.6
NET SALES
2021-2020:  Net sales in 2021 were $10,934.1 million, compared to $7,984.9 million in 2020, which represented an
increase of $2,949.2 million. This 36.9% increase was mainly the result of higher copper (+51.1% - LME), molybdenum
(+81.0%), zinc (+32.0%) and silver (+22.1%) prices. This effect was partially offset by lower copper (-11.0%), silver
(-14.1%) and zinc (-12.6%) sales volumes.
2020-2019:  Net sales in 2020 were $7,984.9 million, compared to $7,285.6 million in 2019, which represented an 
increase of $699.3 million. This 9.6% increase was mainly the result of higher sales volumes of copper (+6.1%), silver 
(+8.8%), molybdenum (+12.7%) and zinc (+1.0%) as well as higher copper (+2.9%) and silver (+27.7%) prices. This 
effect was slightly offset by lower molybdenum (−24.0%) and zinc (-11.2%) prices.  
The table below outlines the average published market metals prices for our metals for each of the three years in the
three-year period ended December 31, 2021:
                    % Variance  
2021     2020     2019     2021 - 2020 2020 - 2019
Copper price ($per pound—LME) $  4.23$  2.80$  2.72  51.1%   2.9%
Copper price ($per pound—COMEX) $  4.24$  2.80$  2.72  51.4%   2.9%
Molybdenum price ($per pound)(1) $ 15.51$  8.57$ 11.27  81.0%   (24.0)%
Zinc price ($per pound—LME) $  1.36$  1.03$  1.16  32.0%   (11.2)%
Silver price ($per ounce—COMEX) $ 25.18$ 20.62$ 16.16  22.1%   27.6%
(1)Platt’s Metals Week Dealer Oxide.
Table of Contents
100The table below provides our metal sales as a percentage of our total net sales:
Year Ended  
December 31, 
Sales as a percentage of total net sales     2021     2020 2019
Copper   80.7%   81.6%   80.2%
Molybdenum   9.6%   6.4%   7.5%
Silver   4.3%   5.6%   4.5%
Zinc   2.7%   3.1%   3.8%
Other by‑products   2.7%   3.3%   4.0%
Total   100.0%   100.0%  100.0%
The table below provides our copper sales by type of product (in million pounds). The difference in value between
products is the level of processing. At the market price, concentrates take a discount since they require smelting and
refining processes, while refined and rod copper receive premiums due to their purity and presentation.
                            Variance  
Copper Sales (million pounds) 2021    2020    2019    2021 - 20202020 - 2019
Refined (including SX‑EW)  893.4 
1,069.6 
1,065.2  (176.2)  4.4
Rod  470.3  389.0  365.5  81.3  23.5
Concentrates and other  689.2  847.3  743.1  (158.1)  104.2
Total 
2,052.9 
2,305.9 
2,173.8  (253.0)  132.1
The table below provides our copper sales volume by type of product as a percentage of our total copper sales volume:
Year ended December 31,  
Copper Sales by product type     2021    2020     2019 
Refined (including SX‑EW)   43.5%   46.4%   49.0%
Rod   22.9%   16.9%   16.8%
Concentrates and other   33.6%   36.7%   34.2%
Total   100.0%   100.0%   
100.0%
OPERATING COSTS AND EXPENSES
The table below summarizes the production cost structure by major components for the three years ended 2021 as
a percentage of total production cost:
    Year ended December 31,  
2021    2020 2019
Power   17.1%   16.8%   14.7%
Labor   13.4%   13.5%   13.9%
Fuel   14.4%   11.2%   13.2%
Maintenance   20.1%   22.6%   21.0%
Operating material   17.2%   17.4%   17.7%
Other   17.8%   18.5%   19.5%
Total   
100.0%   
100.0% 
100.0%
Table of Contents
1012021-2020:  Operating costs and expenses in 2021 increased $4.8 million, compared to 2020, primarily due to:
Operating cost and expenses for 2020     $  4,864.2
Plus:
•Increase in other cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion), mainly
attributable to increases in fuel, power and operating contractors costs; this was partially offset
by a decrease in inventory consumption and foreign currency effects.   234.0
•Increase in depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.       30.4
•Increase in exploration expense.   10.8
Less:
•Decrease in volume and cost of metals purchased from third parties.  (269.4)
•Decrease in selling, general and administrative expenses.   (1.0)
Operating cost and expenses for 2021 $  4,869.0
2020-2019:  Operating costs and expenses in 2020 increased $331.6 million, compared to 2019, primarily due to:
Operating cost and expenses for 2019     $  4,532.6
Plus:
•Increase in volume and cost of metals purchased from third parties.   177.5
•Decrease in capitalized leachable material.  218.2
•COVID-19 related costs.  27.6
•Increase in depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.       11.2
•Increase in exploration expense.   2.6
Less:
•Decrease in other cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion), mainly
attributable to lower fuel costs.  (99.9)
•Decrease in selling, general and administrative expenses.   (5.6)
Operating cost and expenses for 2020 $  4,864.2
                            Variance
NON‑OPERATING INCOME (EXPENSE)     2021     2020     2019     2021 - 2020    2020 - 2019
Interest expense $ (387.9)$ (393.4)$ (372.9)$  5.5$ (20.5)
Capitalized interest   30.8  26.8  32.2  4.0  (5.4)
Other expense   (18.4)  (27.5)  (7.0)  9.1  (20.5)
Interest income   7.2  19.2  21.2  (12.0)  (2.0)
Total non‑operating income (expense) $ (368.3)$ (374.9)$ (326.5)$  6.6$ (48.4)
2021-2020:  Non-operating income and expense were a net expense of $368.3 million in 2021 compared to a net expense 
of $374.9 million in 2020. The $6.6 million decrease in net expense in 2021 was mainly due to:
●$ 9.1 million decrease in other expense, net.
●$ 5.5 million decrease in interest expense, which was primarily attributable to the debt repayment of $400 million in
April 2020, and a
●$ 4.0 million increase in capitalized interest; which was partially offset by a
●$ 12.0 million decrease in interest income.
2020-2019:  Non-operating income and expense were a net expense of $374.9 million in 2020 compared to a net expense 
of $326.5 million in 2019. The $48.4 million increase in net expense in 2019 was mainly due to:
●$ 20.5 million increase in other expense, net, principally due to a $24.2 million provision related to rain damages at
our Peruvian operations.
●$ 20.5 million increase in interest expense, which was attributable to the Minera Mexico debt issuance in September
2019;
Table of Contents
102●$ 5.4 million decrease in capitalized interest, given that completed projects in Peru have been transferred to
operations, and
●$ 2.0 million of lower interest income.
Income taxes
    Year Ended
December 31, 
2021     2020 2019
Provision for income taxes ($ in
millions) $ 2,299.2 $  1,174.4 $  945.3
Effective income tax rate   40.4%   42.8%   39.0%
The income tax provision includes Peruvian, Mexican and U.S. federal income taxes.
Components of income tax provision for 2021, 2020 and 2019 include the following ($ in millions):
    2021     2020     2019
Statutory income tax
provision $  1,874.6 $  1,020.9 $  831.4
Peruvian royalty   97.8   31.4   14.2
Mexican royalty   212.8   72.1   61.6
Peruvian special mining tax   114.0   50.0   38.1
Total income tax provision $  2,299.2 $  1,174.4 $  945.3
The decrease in the effective income tax rate in 2021 compared to the same period in 2020 was primarily attributable to
a movement in exchange gains and losses from the strong depreciation of the Mexican peso and the Peruvian sol against
the U.S. dollar in 2020. The increase in the 2020 effective income tax rate from the prior year was primarily attributable
to a movement in exchange gains and losses from the devaluation of the Mexican peso and the Peruvian sol against the
U.S. dollar; an increase in the Peruvian special mining tax; and an increase in the Mexican and Peruvian royalty.
Equity earnings of affiliate
In 2021, 2020 and 2019 we recognized $13.6 million, $6.4 million and $10.7 million in equity earnings, respectively,
which were associated with our 44.2% interest in the Tantahuatay mine.
Net Income attributable to the non-controlling interest
Net income attributable to the non-controlling interest in 2021 was $14.1 million, compared to $7.4 million in 2020, and
$6.1 million in 2019. This increased in 2021 and 2020 by $6.7 million and $1.3 million respectively. These changes were
the result of higher earnings at our Peruvian operations in both years.
Net Income attributable to SCC
Our net income attributable to SCC in 2021 was $3,397.1 million, compared to $1,570.4 million in 2020 and
$1,485.8 million in 2019. The increase in 2021 and 2020 net income attributable to SCC was mainly due to growth in net
sales.
SEGMENT RESULTS ANALYSIS
We have three segments: the Peruvian operations, the Mexican open-pit operations and the Mexican underground mining
operations. Please see a detailed definition of these segments in Item 1 “Business—Business Reporting Segments.”
The following table presents the volume of sales by segment of copper and our significant by-products for each of the
years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2021:
Table of Contents
103                            Variance  
Copper Sales (million pounds) 2021     2020     2019     2021 - 2020 2020 - 2019
Peruvian operations  859.8  964.2  959.3  (104.4)  4.9
Mexican open‑pit  1,189.6  1,330.7  1,214.0  (141.1)  116.7
Mexican IMMSA unit  24.3  31.7  18.7  (7.4)  13.0
Other and intersegment elimination  (20.8)  (20.7)  (18.2)  (0.1)  (2.5)
Total copper sales  2,052.9  2,305.9  2,173.8  (253.0)  132.1
                            Variance  
By‑product Sales (million pounds, except silver—million ounces) 2021     2020     2019     2021 - 20202020 - 2019
Peruvian operations:
Molybdenum contained in concentrate   32.8  31.3  23.2  1.5  8.1
Silver   5.6  5.9  5.8  (0.3)  0.1
Mexican open‑pit operations:       
Molybdenum contained in concentrate   34.0  35.4  36.0  (1.4)  (0.6)
Silver   10.0  11.7  11.5  (1.7)  0.2
IMMSA unit       
Zinc‑refined and in concentrate   201.9  230.9  228.5  (29.0)  2.4
Silver   6.2  7.5  5.2  (1.3)  2.3
Other and intersegment elimination       
Silver   (2.6)  (2.7)  (1.9)  0.1  (0.8)
Total by‑product sales       
Molybdenum contained in concentrate   66.8  66.7  59.2  0.1  7.5
Zinc‑refined and in concentrate   201.9  230.9  228.5  (29.0)  2.4
Silver   19.2  22.4  20.6  (3.2)  1.8
Peruvian Open-pit Operations:
            Variance
2021 2020 2019 2021 - 2020    2020 - 2019
Net sales $ 4,370.8$ 3,153.6$ 2,940.1$ 1,217.2$  213.5
Operating costs and expenses   (2,037.6)  (2,055.2)  (2,085.2)  17.6  30.0
Operating income $ 2,333.2$ 1,098.4$  854.9$ 1,234.8$  243.5
Net sales:
2021-2020: Net sales in 2021 increased by $1,217.2 million compared to the amount recorded in 2020, which was
mainly attributable to an increase in copper (+51.1% - LME), molybdenum (+81.0%) and silver (+22.1%) prices as well
as higher molybdenum (+4.9%) sales volumes. This was partially offset by lower copper (-10.8%) and silver (-3.5%)
sales volumes.
2020-2019:  Net sales in 2020 increased by $213.5 million compared to the amount recorded in 2019, which was mainly 
attributable to an increase in sales volumes for copper (+0.5%), molybdenum (+35.0%) and silver (+2.1%) and to higher 
copper and silver prices, partially offset by lower molybdenum prices.
Table of Contents
104Operating costs and expenses:
2021-2020:  Operating costs and expenses in 2021 decreased by $17.6 million compared to 2020, which was primarily 
due to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2020     $ 2,055.2
Less:
• Decrease in cost of metals purchased from third parties.  (138.2)
• Decrease in depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.  (7.7)
Plus:  
• Increase in other cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion), mainly
attributable to increases in fuel, power, operating contractors costs and workers' participation;
this was partially offset by a decrease in inventory consumption and foreign currency effects.  120.7
• Increase in exploration expenses.  5.1
• Increase in selling, general and administrative expenses.   2.5
Operating costs and expenses for 2021 $ 2,037.6
2020-2019:  Operating costs and expenses in 2020 decreased $30.0 million compared to 2019, which was primarily due 
to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2019     $ 2,085.2
Less:
• Decrease in other cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly
due to lower fuel costs, operating contractors costs and lower labor costs.   (208.0)
• Decrease in exploration expenses.  (7.1)
• Decrease in selling, general and administrative expenses.   (0.9)
Plus:  
• Decrease in capitalized leachable material.  106.0
• Increase in cost of metals purchased from third parties.  54.2
• COVID-19 related costs.  25.2
• Increase in depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.   0.6
Operating costs and expenses for 2020 $ 2,055.2
Operating income:
2021-2020:  Operating income in 2021 increased by $1,234.8 million compared to the amount recorded in 2020, which 
was mainly attributable to a $1,217.2 million increase in sales and a $17.6 million decrease in operating costs and 
expenses, as explained above.
2020-2019:  Operating income in 2020 increased by $243.5 million compared to the amount recorded in 2019, which 
was mainly attributable to a $213.5 million increase in sales and a $30.0 million decrease in operating costs and 
expenses, as explained above.
Mexican Open-pit Operations:
Variance
2021     2020     2019     2021 - 2020    2020 - 2019
Net sales $ 6,109.0$ 4,412.4$ 3,963.9$ 1,696.6$ 448.5
Operating costs and expenses   (2,411.2)  (2,431.3)  (2,045.4)  20.1  (385.9)
Operating income $ 3,697.8$ 1,981.1$ 1,918.5$ 1,716.7$  62.6
Table of Contents
105Net sales:
2021-2020: Net sales in 2021 increased by $1,696.6 million compared to 2020. This increase was attributable to an
increase in copper (+51.1% - LME), molybdenum (+81.0%) and silver (+22.1%) prices. This was partially offset by
lower copper (-10.6%), molybdenum (-4.0%) and silver (-13.9%) sales volumes.
2020-2019:  Net sales in 2020 increased by $448.5 million compared to 2019. This increase was attributable to higher 
copper (+9.6%) and silver (+1.7%) sales volumes and to higher copper and silver prices; this increase was slightly offset 
by lower molybdenum prices.
Operating costs and expenses:
2021-2020: Operating costs and expenses in 2021 decreased by $20.1 million compared to 2020, which was mainly
attributable to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2020     $  2,431.3
Less:  
•Decrease in cost and volume of metals purchased from third parties.   (139.9)
•Decrease in selling, general and administrative expenses.  (7.7)
•Decrease in exploration expenses.  (0.2)
Plus:  
•Increase in other cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion), mainly
attributable to increases in fuel, power and operating contractors costs; this was partially offset by a
decrease in inventory consumption and foreign currency effects.   101.8
•Increase in depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.  25.9
Operating costs and expenses for 2021 $  2,411.2
2020-2019: Operating costs and expenses in 2020 increased by $385.9 million compared to 2019, which was mainly
attributable to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2019     $  2,045.4
Plus:  
•Increase in cost and volume of metals purchased from third parties.   238.8
•Decrease in capitalized leachable material.  112.2
•COVID-19 related costs.  1.4
•Increase in other cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due to
higher inventory consumption, and higher workers participation expense, partially offset by lower
fuel costs.   26.1
•Increase in exploration expenses.  0.7
•Increase in depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.  14.8
Less:  
•Decrease in selling, general and administrative expenses.  (8.1)
Operating costs and expenses for 2020 $  2,431.3
Table of Contents
106Operating income:
2021-2020: Operating income in 2021 increased by $1,716.6 million, compared to 2020, mainly as a result of $1,696.6
million of higher sales and a $20.1 million decrease in operating costs and expenses, as explained above.
2020-2019: Operating income in 2020 increased by $62.6 million, compared to 2019, mainly as a result of $448.5
million of higher sales, which was partially offset by a $385.9 million increase in operating costs and expenses, as
explained above.
IMMSA unit:
 Variance
2021     2020     2019     2021 - 2020    2020 - 2019
Net sales $  600.2 $  529.9 $  464.8 $  70.3 $  65.1
Operating costs and expenses   (511.4)  (443.6)  (449.5)  (67.8)  5.9
Operating income $  88.8 $  86.3 $  15.3 $  2.5 $  71.0
Net sales:
2021-2020: Net sales in 2021 increased $70.3 million compared to 2020. This increase was attributable to an increase in
copper (+51.1% - LME), zinc (+32.0%) and silver (+22.1%) prices. This was partially offset by lower copper (-23.2%),
zinc (-12.6%) and silver (-17.5%) sales volumes.
2020-2019:  Net sales in 2020 increased $65.1 million compared to 2019. This increase was primarily due to an increase 
in copper (+69.7%), silver (+44.4%) and zinc (+1.0%) sales volumes and to higher copper and silver prices; this was 
slightly offset by lower zinc prices.
Operating costs and expenses:
2021-2020:  Operating costs and expenses in 2021 increased by $67.8 million compared to 2020; this was principally 
due to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2020     $  443.6
Plus:  
• Increase in cost of metals purchased from third parties.  49.4
• Increase in depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.  12.3
Increase in other cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion),
mainly attributable to increases in fuel, power, labor and operating contractors costs; this
was partially offset by a decrease in inventory consumption.  8.5
• Increase in selling, general and administrative expenses.   0.5
Less:
• Decrease in exploration expenses.  (2.9)
Operating costs and expenses for 2021 $  511.4
Table of Contents
1072020-2019:  Operating costs and expenses in 2020 decreased by $5.9 million compared to 2019; this was principally due 
to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2019     $  449.5
Plus:  
•Increase in other cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion)
mainly due to higher inventory consumption, higher workers' participation expense and
foreign currency effect, partially offset by lower power and labor costs.  21.9
• COVID-19 related costs.  1.1
• Increase in selling, general and administrative expenses.   1.6
Less:
• Decrease in cost of metals purchased from third parties.  (20.3)
• Decrease in depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.   (9.8)
• Decrease in exploration expenses.  (0.4)
Operating costs and expenses for 2020 $  443.6
Operating income:
2021-2020: Operating income in 2021 increased by $2.5 million, compared to 2020, mainly as a result of a $70.3 million
increase in sales which was partially offset by a $67.8 million increase in operating costs and expenses, as explained
above.
2020-2019: Operating income in 2020 increased by $71.0 million, compared to 2019, mainly as a result of a $65.1
million increase in sales and a $5.9 million decrease in operating costs and expenses, as explained above.
Intersegment Eliminations and Adjustments:
The net sales, operating costs and expenses and operating income discussed above will not be directly equal to amounts
in our consolidated statement of earnings because the adjustments to intersegment operating revenues and expenses must
be taken into account. Please see Note 19 “Segment and Related Information” of the consolidated financial statements.
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
The following discussion relates to our liquidity and capital resources for each of the years in the three-year period
ended December 31, 2021.
Cash Flow:
The following table shows the cash flow for the three year period ended December 31, 2021 (in millions):
 Variance
2021     2020     2019     2021 - 2020    2020 - 2019
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 4,292.4$ 2,783.6$ 1,911.9$ 1,508.8$ 871.7
Net cash used in investing activities $ (972.9)$ (915.8)$ (574.0)$ (57.1)$ (341.8)
Net cash used in financing activities $ (2,480.2)$ (1,563.3)$ (262.2)$ (916.9)$ (1,301.1)
Table of Contents
108Net cash provided by operating activities:
The 2021, 2020 and 2019 change in net cash from operating activities include (in millions):
 Variance
2021     2020     2019     2021 - 2020    2020 - 2019
Net income $ 3,411.2$ 1,577.8$ 1,491.9$ 1,833.4$ 85.9
Depreciation, amortization and depletion   806.0  775.6  764.4  30.4  11.2
Provision for deferred income taxes   (126.3)  (63.5)  (21.0)  (62.8)  (42.5)
(Gain) loss on foreign currency transaction effect   (25.8)  0.9  17.9  (26.7)  (17.0)
Other adjustments to net income   36.6  9.1  5.7  27.5  3.4
Operating assets and liabilities   190.7  483.7  (347.0)  (293.0)  830.7
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 4,292.4$ 2,783.6$ 1,911.9$ 1,508.8$ 871.7
Significant items added to (deducted from) net income to arrive at operating cash flow include depreciation,
amortization and depletion, deferred tax amounts and changes in operating assets and liabilities.
2021:  Net income was $3,411.2 million, which represented approximately 79.5% of the net operating cash flow.
Changes in operating assets and liabilities increased cash flow by $190.7 million due to the following variances:
●$(289.8) million increase in trade accounts receivable, which was mainly attributable to the increase in metal prices
in 2021.
●$4.7 million net decrease in inventory; this was primarily driven by increases of $91.8 million and $7.8 million in
the work in process and finished goods inventories, respectively; which were in turn partially offset by $66.3 million
and $38.1 million drops in the leachable materials and supplies inventories, respectively.
●$558.2 million increase in accounts payable and accrued liabilities, which was mainly due to the increase in accrued
income taxes and workers’ participation at our Mexican and Peruvian operations.
●$(82.4) million increase in other operating assets and liabilities which included principally an increase in prepaid
taxes in our Mexican operations.
2020:  Net income was $1,577.8 million, which represented approximately 56.7% of the net operating cash flow.
Changes in operating assets and liabilities increased cash flow by $483.7 million due to the following variances:
●$(236.0) million increase in trade accounts receivable, which was mainly driven by a significant increase in copper
prices during the last quarter of 2020.
●$223.6 million of net decrease in inventory, which included a $165.2 million decrease in the leaching inventory
mainly at our Peruvian operations, and a $36.4 million decrease in the finished goods inventory, principally at our
Mexican operations.
●$313.8 million increase in accounts payable and accrued liabilities, which primarily reflected growth in income
taxes and workers’ participation accruals at our Peruvian and Mexican operations.
●$182.3 million decrease in other operating assets and liabilities, which mainly included a decrease in prepaid taxes
and a drop in receivables to related parties.
2019:  Net income was $1,491.9 million, which represented approximately 78% of the net operating cash flow.
Changes in operating assets and liabilities decreased cash flow by $347.0 million due to the following variances:
●$(184.9) million decrease in accounts payable and accrued liabilities, which included principally income taxes and
workers’ participation payments as a result of higher earnings at our Mexican and Peruvian operations in 2018.
●$(10.5) million increase in trade accounts receivable mainly because of higher sales volumes at our Peruvian
operations.
●$(88.7) million of net increase in inventory, which included $(83.2) million of higher leaching inventory and $(17.6)
million of higher finished goods mainly at our Mexican operations.
●$(62.9) million increase in other operating assets and liabilities which included principally an increase in prepaid
taxes in our Mexican operations due to changes in tax legislation.
Table of Contents
109Net cash used in investing activities:
2021:  Net cash used for investing activities in 2021 included $892.3 million for capital investments. This included 
$571.4 million of investments at our Mexican operations and $320.9 million at our Peruvian operations. For further 
information, please see “Capital Investment Program” under this Item on page 90.
The 2021 investing activities also included net purchases of short-term investments of $76.1 million.
2020:  Net cash used for investing activities in 2020 included $592.2 million for capital investments. This included 
$397.2 million of investments at our Mexican operations and $195.0 million at our Peruvian operations. For further 
information, please see “Capital Investment Program” under this Item on page 90.
The 2020 investing activities also included net purchases of short-term investments of $330.1 million.
2019:  Net cash used for investing activities in 2019 included $707.5 million for capital investments. This included 
$357.4 million of investments at our Mexican operations and $350.1 million at our Peruvian operations. For further 
information, please see “Capital Investment Program” under this Item on page 90.
The 2019 investing activities also included net sales of short-term investments of $133.1 million.
Net cash used in financing activities:
2021:  Net cash used in financing activities in 2021 was $2,480.2 million and included a dividend distribution of 
$2,473.8 million.
2020:  Net cash used in financing activities in 2020 was $1,563.3 million and mainly included:
●A dividend distribution of $1,159.6 million.
●A debt repayment of $400 million.
2019:  Net cash used in financing activities in 2019 was $262.2 million and mainly included:
●A dividend distribution of $1,236.9 million.
●Gross proceeds of $987.3 million from the issuance of senior notes by our Mexican subsidiary.
●Payment of debt issuance costs of $9.8 million.
Other Liquidity Considerations
We expect that we will meet our cash requirements for 2022 and beyond from cash on hand and internally generated
funds. In addition, we believe that we will be able to access additional external financing on reasonable terms, if
required.
As of December 31, 2021, $1,054.8 million of the Company´s total cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of
$3,488.9 million were held by foreign subsidiaries. The cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments maintained in
our foreign operations are generally used to cover local operating and investment expenses. Earnings of the Company’s
Peruvian branch are not subject to transition taxes since they are taxed in the United States on a current basis.
Share repurchase program:  In 2008, our Board of Directors (“BOD”) authorized a $500 million share repurchase 
program that has since been increased by the BOD and is currently authorized to $3 billion. Since the inception of the 
program through December 31, 2021, we have purchased 119.5 million shares of our common stock at a cost of 
$2.9 billion. These shares are available for general corporate purposes. We may purchase additional shares of our 
common stock from time to time based on market conditions and other factors. This repurchase program has no 
expiration date and may be modified or discontinued at any time. For further details please see Item 5 “Market for 
Table of Contents
110Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities—SCC common 
stock repurchase plan.”
Dividend:  On January 27, 2022, the BOD authorized a dividend of $1.00 per share paid on March 2, 2022 to 
shareholders of record at the close of business on February 15, 2022. 
FINANCING
Our total debt at December 31, 2021 was $6,547.6 million, compared to $6,544.2 million at December 31, 2020, net of
the unamortized discount and issuance costs of notes issued under par for $103.6 million and $107.0 million as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020 respectively. This debt is all denominated in dollars at fixed interest rates, weighed at
5.71%.
The ratio of total debt to total capitalization was 44.4% as of December 31, 2021, compared to 47.4% as of
December 31, 2020. In addition, the ratio of net debt to net capitalization was 27.1% as of December 31, 2021,
compared to 35.2% as of December 31, 2020.
We define net debt as total debt, including current maturities, minus cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments
balance. We believe that net debt is useful to investors as a measure of our financial position. We define net
capitalization as the sum of net debt and equity. We use the net debt to net capitalization ratio as measure of our
indebtedness position and to determine how much debt we can take in addition to the use of the equity and of the balance
sheet in general. We define total capitalization as the sum of the carrying values of our total debt, including current
maturities and equity. A reconciliation of our net debt to net capitalization and total debt to total capitalization as
included in the consolidated balance sheet is presented under the sub heading “Non-GAAP Information Reconciliation”
below.
Please see Note 11 “Financing” for a discussion about the covenants requirements related to our long-term debt.
Capital Investment Program
A discussion of our capital investment program is an important part of understanding our liquidity and capital resources.
We expect to meet the cash requirements for these capital investments from cash on hand, internally generated funds and
from additional external financing if required. For information regarding our capital expenditure programs, please see
the discussion under the caption “Capital Investment Program” under this Item 7.
CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS
As of December 31, 2021, our most significant contractual obligations include interest and principal on debt; workers’
participation, pension and post-retirement obligations, payments for operating leases, asset retirement obligations, and
commitments for purchasing energy and for capital investment projects.
Interest on debt is calculated at rates in effect at December 31, 2021. As all our debt is at fixed rates, future expenditures
will not change due to rate changes. Please refer to Note 11 “Financing” of the consolidated financial statements for a
description of our long-term debt arrangements and credit facilities.
Workers’ participation is currently calculated based on Peruvian Branch and Mexican pre-tax earnings. In Peru, the
provision for workers’ participation is calculated at 8% of pre-tax earnings. The current portion of this participation,
which is accrued during the year, is based on the Peruvian Branch’s taxable income and is largely distributed to workers
after final results are determined for the year. Amounts in excess of 18 times a worker’s salary are distributed to
governmental bodies. In Mexico, workers’ participation is determined using the guidelines established in the Mexican
income tax law at a rate of 10% of pre-tax earnings as adjusted by the tax law.
Operating leases include lease payments for power generating facilities to MGE, vehicles and properties. Please refer to
Note 9 “Leases” of the consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
111Pension and post retirement obligations include the benefits expected to be paid under our pension and post-retirement
benefit plans. Please refer to Note 12 “Benefit Plans” of the consolidated financial statements.
Asset retirement obligations include the aggregate amount of closure and remediation costs for our Peruvian mines and
facilities to be paid under the mine closure plans approved by MINEM and the closure and remediation costs of our
Mexican operations. See Note 10 “Asset Retirement Obligation” of the consolidated financial statements.
In June 2014, we entered into a power purchase agreement for 120 megawatt (“MW”) with the state company
Electroperu S.A., which began supplying energy for our Peruvian operations for twenty years starting on April 17, 2017.
In July 2014, we entered into a power purchase agreement for 120MW with a private power generator Kallpa
Generacion S.A. (“Kallpa”), which began supplying energy for our Peruvian operations for ten years starting on
April 17, 2017. In May 2016, we signed an additional power purchase agreement for a maximum of 80MW with Kallpa,
under which Kallpa will supply energy to the operations related to the Toquepala Expansion and to other minor projects
for ten years starting on May 1, 2017 and ending after ten years of commercial operation of the Toquepala Expansion or
on April 30, 2029; whichever occurs first.
Additionally, we have a commitment to purchase power for our Mexican operations from MGE, a subsidiary of Grupo
Mexico through 2032. See Note 13 “Commitment and Contingencies—Other commitments”.
Our long-term estimated power costs are subject to change as energy generation costs change and our forecasted power
requirements through the life of the agreements change. In addition, as of December 31, 2021, the Company has
committed approximately $355.1 million for the development of its capital investment projects. These include
committed purchase orders and executed contracts for our Mexican projects and for our Peruvian expansion projects.
CYBERSECURITY
Our operations depend upon information technology systems that may be subject to disruption, damage or failure from
different sources, including, without limitation, installation of malicious software, computer viruses, security breaches,
cyber-attacks and defects in design. In recent years, cybersecurity incidents have increased in frequency and include, but
are not limited to, malicious software, attempts to gain unauthorized access to data and other electronic security breaches
that could lead to disruptions in systems, unauthorized release of confidential or otherwise protected information and the
corruption of data. We have implemented appropriate preventative measures to mitigate potential risks by implementing
an information security management system, which ensures implementing controls that are frequently reviewed and
tested.
On March 1, 2021, at approximately 02:00 hours Mexico City time, we experienced a Ransomware cyber-attack, which
was operated by humans. This cyber-attack encrypted a total of 420 servers and pieces of personal equipment. However,
due to the quick response of our IT team, our Enterprise Resource Planning software was not affected by the
aforementioned attack.
After the attack, we immediately began a remediation and recovery process and completely restored the affected servers.
So far, the forensic investigation has not identified any concrete evidence of information stolen during the attack.
However, we maintain active lines of work in cyberintelligence and forensic investigation to continue monitoring the
DarkWeb/DeepWeb and social networks to identify any publication or activity related to the Company; ensure that our
systems infrastructure is safe and validate the technological controls affected during the attack.
In March 2021, we appointed a new Head of Information Technology, who is implementing a new information security
strategy to ensure business continuity based on processes (controls and corporate governance framework), technology
and human capital (organizational culture). The areas of compliance, internal control, information technology and
internal auditing work together on a permanent basis to create reference frameworks, risk management models and
controls to implement the information security strategy and its programs.
Our information security strategy is being executed on a continuous basis. In July 2021, Grupo Mexico appointed a
Chief Information Security Officer who has been actively involved in the development and implementation of this
strategy. In addition, between July and September of 2021 we performed a cybernetic forensic analysis with the
Table of Contents
112assistance of a specialized provider with global experience in this area. The recommendations received have already
been integrated in current information security programs. The Company has set up a task force to oversee ongoing
initiatives and to ensure that targets are met. We are actively following up on this matter with this task force, our internal
audit team and will involve specialized third parties as needed.
As of December 31, 2021, we recorded $0.3 million in direct costs for maneuvers associated with the incident. In
addition, for 2022 we have a non-material special budget to continue improvements in this area.
Table of Contents
113NON-GAAP INFORMATION RECONCILIATION
Operating cash cost:  Following is a reconciliation of “Operating Cash Cost” (see page 88) to cost of sales (exclusive of 
depreciation, amortization and depletion) as reported in our consolidated statement of earnings, in millions of dollars and 
dollars per pound in the table below:
2021  2020  2019
    $ per        $ per        $ per
$ millions pound $ millions pound $ millions pound
Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation,
amortization and depletion) $ 3,894.4$ 1.90$ 3,929.8$ 1.84$ 3,606.4$ 1.69
Add:             
Selling, general and administrative   125.2  0.06  126.2  0.06  131.8  0.06
Sales premiums, net of treatment and refining
charges   (25.6)  (0.01)  17.0  0.01  28.7  0.02
Less:       
Workers’ participation   (267.2)  (0.13)  (263.9)  (0.13)  (214.5)  (0.10)
Cost of metals purchased from third parties   (225.8)  (0.11)  (495.2)  (0.23)  (263.4)  (0.12)
Royalty charge and other, net   (158.6)  (0.08)  (171.6)  (0.08)  (125.7)  (0.06)
Inventory change   15.0  0.01  (218.6)  (0.10)  67.6  0.03
Operating Cash Cost before by‑product
revenues $ 3,357.4$ 1.64$ 2,923.7$ 1.37$ 3,230.9$ 1.52
Add:                   
By‑product revenues(1)   (1,974.8)  (0.96)  (1,375.9)  (0.64)  (1,307.3)  (0.61)
Net revenue on sale of metal purchased from third
parties   (22.9)  (0.01)  (80.0)  (0.04)  (51.9)  (0.03)
Total by‑product revenues   (1,997.7)  (0.97)  (1,455.9)  (0.68)  (1,359.2)  (0.64)
Operating Cash Cost net of by‑product
revenues   1,359.7  0.67  1,467.8  0.69  1,871.7  0.88
Total pounds of copper produced (in millions)   2,041.7     2,136.1     2,133.3   
(1)By-product revenues included in our presentation of operating cash cost contain the following:
2021  2020  2019
    $ per         $ per         $ per
$ millions pound $ millions pound $ millions pound
Molybdenum $ (1,053.1)$  (0.51)$  (510.3)$  (0.24)$  (549.4)$  (0.26)
Silver   (445.3)  (0.22)  (415.5)  (0.19)  (278.3)  (0.13)
Zinc   (196.9)  (0.10)  (202.9)  (0.10)  (211.5)  (0.10)
Sulfuric Acid   (164.6)  (0.08)  (135.9)  (0.06)  (158.8)  (0.07)
Gold   (67.5)  (0.03)  (73.6)  (0.03)  (53.2)  (0.03)
Other   (47.4)  (0.02)  (37.7)  (0.02)  (56.1)  (0.02)
Total $ (1,974.8)$  (0.96)$ (1,375.9)$  (0.64)$ (1,307.3)$  (0.61)
The by-product revenue presented does not match with the sales value reported by segment on page 171 because the
above table excludes purchases from third parties, which are reclassified to net revenue on sale of metal purchased from
third parties.
Table of Contents
114Net debt to net capitalization:  Net debt to net capitalization as of December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
    2021     2020
Total debt $ 6,547.6 $ 6,544.2
Cash and cash equivalents   (3,002.0)  (2,183.6)
Short‑term investments   (486.9)  (410.8)
Net debt   3,058.7   3,949.8
Net capitalization:       
Net debt   3,058.7   3,949.8
Equity   8,207.8   7,276.0
Net capitalization $ 11,266.5 $ 11,225.8
Net debt/net capitalization(*)   27.1%    35.2%
(*)Represents net debt divided by net capitalization.
Total debt to total capitalization:  Total debt to total capitalization as of December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
    2021     2020
Total debt $ 6,547.6 $ 6,544.2
Capitalization       
Debt   6,547.6   6,544.2
Equity   8,207.8   7,276.0
Total capitalization $ 
14,755.4 $ 
13,820.2
Total debt/total capitalization(*)   44.4%    47.4%
(*)Represents debt divided by total capitalization.
Table of Contents
115ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Commodity price risk:
For additional information on metal price sensitivity, refer to “Metal Prices” in Part II, Item 7 of this annual report.
Open sales risk:
Our provisional copper and molybdenum sales contain an embedded derivative that is required to be separate from the
host contract for accounting purposes. The host contract is the receivable from the sale of copper or molybdenum
concentrates at prevailing market prices at the time of the sale. The embedded derivative, which does not qualify for
hedge accounting, is marked to market through earnings in each period prior to settlement. See Note 19 to the
consolidated financial statements for further information about these provisional sales.
Foreign currency exchange rate risk:
Our functional currency is the U.S. dollar. Portions of our operating costs are denominated in Peruvian soles and
Mexican pesos. Given that our revenues are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars, when inflation or deflation in our
Mexican or Peruvian operations is not offset by a change in the exchange rate of the sol or the peso to the dollar, our
financial position, results of operations and cash flows could be affected by local cost conversion when expressed in
U.S. dollars. In addition, the dollar value of our net monetary assets denominated in soles or pesos can be affected by an
exchange rate variance of the sol or the peso, resulting in a re-measurement gain or loss in our financial statements.
Recent inflation and exchange rate variances for the three years ended December 31, 2021 are provided in the table
below:
    Year Ended
December 31, 
    2021    2020    2019
Peru:          
Peruvian inflation rate   6.4%   2.0%  1.9%
Initial exchange rate   3.624  3.317  3.379
Closing exchange rate   3.998  3.624  3.317
Appreciation/(devaluation)   (10.3)%   (9.3)%  1.8%
Mexico:          
Mexican inflation rate   7.4%   3.2%  2.8%
Initial exchange rate   
19.949  
18.845  
19.683
Closing exchange rate   
20.584  
19.949  
18.845
Appreciation/(devaluation)   (3.2)%   (5.9)%  4.3%
Change in monetary position:
Assuming an exchange rate variance of 10% at December 31, 2021, we estimate our net monetary position in Peruvian
sol and Mexican peso would increase (decrease) our net earnings as follows:
    Effect in net
 earnings
 ($ in millions)
Appreciation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Peruvian sol $  50.5
Devaluation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Peruvian sol $  (61.7)
Appreciation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Mexican peso $  7.5
Devaluation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Mexican peso $  (9.1)
The net monetary position is net of those assets and liabilities that are sol or peso denominated as of December 31, 2021.
Table of Contents
116Short-term investments:
For additional information on our trading securities and available-for-sale investments, refer to Note 3 Short-term
Investments in Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
Derivative Instruments:
From time to time, we use derivative instruments to manage our cash flows exposure to changes in commodity prices.
We do not enter into derivative contracts unless we anticipate that the possibility exists that future activity will expose
our future cash flows to deterioration. Derivative contracts for commodities are entered into to manage the price risk
associated with forecasted purchases of the commodities that we use in our manufacturing process.
Cash Flow Hedges of Natural Gas
The Company’s objective in using natural gas derivatives is to protect the stability of natural gas costs and manage
exposure to natural gas price increases. To protect natural gas costs from estimated price increases in the coming winter
season, in the third quarter of 2021, the Company acquired two derivative instruments that began in November 2021 and
end in March 2022.
Derivative instruments balances as of December 31, 2021, are as follows:
Call Financial Swap
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments under  ASC 815 Option Cash Settlement
Commodity contracts Natural gas Natural gas
Gas volume (MMBTUs)  5,285,000  5,285,000
Fixed price ($)  0.55  3.75
Total option premium (millions of $)   1.7 N/A
Estimated fair value of assets (liabilities) as of December 31, 2021 (millions
of $)   (0.9)  0.1
(Favorable) unfavorable effect of derivative instruments on the consolidated
Statement of Earnings (millions of $)   1.2  (3.0)
(Favorable) unfavorable effect in OCI - net of deferred income taxes
(millions of $)  (0.6) (*)
(*)   Less than $0.1 million.
The Company assessed these derivative instruments as Cash Flow Hedges. As such, the effective portions of said hedges
are initially reported in Other Comprehensive Income (OCI) and are reclassified as earnings in the same line item
associated with the forecasted transaction and in the same period or periods during which the hedged transaction affects
earnings. Any ineffective portions of these derivatives would be reported in earnings during the current period.
As of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019, the Company did not hold any derivative instruments.
Table of Contents
117ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTAL DATA
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of Southern Copper Corporation:
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Southern Copper Corporation and subsidiaries (the
“Company”) as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of earnings, comprehensive
income, changes in stockholders´ equity, and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31,
2021 and the related notes and schedule listed in the Index at Item 15 (collectively referred to as the “financial
statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial
position of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each
of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted
in the United States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (“PCAOB”), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021 based on criteria
established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of
the Treadway Commission and our report dated March 7, 2022 expressed an unqualified opinion on the Company’s
internal control over financial reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to
express an opinion on the Company’s consolidated financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting
firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the
U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the
PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material
misstatement whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material
misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that
respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used
and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated
financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the financial
statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relate to
accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging,
subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing
separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Table of Contents
118Ore stockpiles on Leach Pads – Refer to Note 4 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company has Ore stockpiles on leach pads of $1,357.3 million as of December 31, 2021 ($259.7 million presented
as current and $1,097.6 million presented as non-current assets), related to the capitalization of costs attributable to
leachable material.
The Company used the recoverable copper content grade, the solubility index and the recovery rate when determining
the capitalization of costs related to leachable material. The leachable material inventory determined could be misstated
if the monthly average recoverable copper content grade, the solubility index and the recovery rate used by the Company
does not correspond to the actual results obtained from the laboratories.
We identified the copper content grade, the solubility index and the recovery rate as a critical audit matter because of the
significant judgments made by management to support its assertion that these capitalized costs are probable of recovery.
Addressing this matter required a high degree of auditor judgment in evaluating whether the audit evidence obtained
supports management’s assertion that these costs are probable of future recovery.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to management’s assertions that extraction and movement of material costs are capitalized
in the appropriate amounts included the following, among others:
●We tested the effectiveness of controls over management’s review of the copper content grade, the solubility index
and the recovery rate used to determine the monthly average rate to be used in the calculation, which included an
evaluation of the competence, objectivity and authority of the personnel involved and management’s experts in the
determination of the copper content grade, the solubility index and the recovery rate; the identification of costs to be
capitalized as part of the leaching process; and reconciliations of mineral received for the leaching process.
●We tested the effectiveness of general IT controls for the relevant systems identified that process information that
are considered significant inputs in the calculation of the Company’s estimate.
●We developed an independent expectation of the amounts of leachable material that should have been capitalized
and amortized and compared it to the recorded balances.
●We independently recalculated the monthly average copper content grade and the monthly average solubility index
to obtain the reasonability of the inputs used in the estimate.
●We involved technical specialists to evaluate the methodology used by the Company to determine the recoverability
of copper from the leach pads and challenge, from a technical perspective, if the balance as of December 31, 2021
represents copper that will be recovered as estimated by the Company. Such involvement also consisted in site visits
to the main mining operations where ore stockpiles on leach pads existed.
Estimate of Tia Maria Project Impairment Indicators (Property and mine development, net) – Refer to Notes 5
and 13 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Tia Maria mining project in Peru has already received the construction license approval from the Peruvian Mining
Council on October 30, 2019. The Company's commitment is to begin the development of the project within the
framework of a favorable social atmosphere, working with the local population. This project budget is approximately
$1.4 billion and has an investment as of December 31, 2021 of approximately $310.2 million that includes investment in
property, plant and equipment of $192.2 million and $118.0 million representing intangible assets primarily composed of
engineering studies and the Environmental Impact Study (EIS). The Company evaluates long-term assets for impairment
when events or changes in economic circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of such assets may not be
recoverable. The Company’s evaluations are based on business plans that are prepared using a time horizon that is
reflective of their expectations of metal prices, costs and other economic variables over its business cycle, and social and
political environment.
Table of Contents
119We considered that the engineering studies and the EIS and other permits and studies composing the intangible assets
balance could be impaired if the business plans of the Company changes due to external factors occur once the
construction begins.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to identification of events or changes in circumstances that may indicate the carrying
amount of the intangibles related to the Tia Maria Project may not be recoverable included the following, among others:
●We tested the effectiveness of controls over management’s identification of possible circumstances that may indicate
that the carrying amounts are no longer recoverable.
●We obtained supporting documentation to ensure that the main inputs used in the business model were reasonable.
●We read publicly available information regarding projections of copper prices.
●We made inquiries to management regarding events or circumstances related to external factors that can affect the
project.
●We searched the internet and other relevant medias for news that can impact the project.
●We obtained supporting documentation to test the stress testing performed by management over the business model,
considering changes in the main variables impacting the model such as copper price and cost changes
(increases/decreases), among others and appropriate evidence to conclude that no impairment indicators existed as
of December 31, 2021.
Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C.
Member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Limited
/s/ DANIEL TOLEDO ANTONIO
C.P.C. Daniel Toledo Antonio
Mexico City, Mexico
March 7, 2022
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 2009
Table of Contents
120Southern Copper Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF EARNINGS
        
For the years ended December 31, (in millions, except for per share
amounts) 2021 2020 2019
Net sales (including sales to related parties, see note 18) $ 10,934.1 $ 7,984.9 $ 7,285.6
Operating cost and expenses:
Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization
and depletion shown separately below)  3,894.4  3,929.8  3,606.4
Selling, general and administrative  125.2  126.2  131.8
Depreciation, amortization and depletion  806.0  775.6  764.4
Exploration  43.4  32.6  30.0
Total operating costs and expenses  4,869.0  4,864.2  4,532.6
Operating income  6,065.1  3,120.7  2,753.0
Interest expense  (387.9) (393.4) (372.9)
Capitalized interest  30.8  26.8  32.2
Other income (expense)  (18.4) (27.5) (7.0)
Interest income  7.2  19.2  21.2
Income before income taxes  5,696.8  2,745.8  2,426.5
Income taxes (including royalty taxes, see Note 7)  2,425.5  1,237.9  966.3
Deferred income taxes (126.3) (63.5) (21.0)
Net income before equity earnings of affiliate  3,397.6  1,571.4  1,481.2
Equity earnings of affiliate, net of income tax  13.6  6.4  10.7
Net income  3,411.2  1,577.8  1,491.9
Less: Net income attributable to the non-controlling interest 14.1  7.4  6.1
Net income attributable to SCC $ 3,397.1 $ 1,570.4 $ 1,485.8
Per common share amounts attributable to SCC:
Net earnings-basic and diluted $ 4.39 $ 2.03 $ 1.92
Weighted average shares outstanding-basic and diluted  773.1  773.1  773.1
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
121Southern Copper Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
2021     2020     2019
(in millions)
COMPREHENSIVE INCOME:
Net income and comprehensive income $3,411.2$1,577.8$1,491.9
Other comprehensive income (loss) net of tax:
—Decrease (increase) in pension and other post-retirement benefits (net of
income tax of $1.2, $(1.9) and $3.7, respectively)  (1.7) 1.7 (7.7)
—Derivative instruments classified as cash flow hedge:
- Unrealized gain (loss) of the period (net of income tax of $0.3 million in
2021)  0.6 — —
Total other comprehensive income (loss)  (1.1) 1.7 (7.7)
Total comprehensive income  3,410.1 1,579.5 1,484.2
Comprehensive income attributable to the non-controlling interest  14.1 7.4 6.1
Comprehensive income attributable to SCC $3,396.0$1,572.1$1,478.1
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
122Southern Copper Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
December 31, December 31, 
    2021     2020
(in millions)
ASSETS
Current assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 3,002.0 $ 2,183.6
Short-term investments  486.9  410.8
Accounts receivable trade  1,358.7  1,068.9
Accounts receivable other (including related parties 2021- $49.1 and 2020 - $23.3  87.9  67.7
Inventories  972.9  950.2
Prepaid taxes 197.7 104.8
Other current assets  33.5  29.2
Total current assets  6,139.6  4,815.2
Property and mine development, net  9,464.4  9,458.7
Ore stockpiles on leach pads  1,097.6  1,125.0
Intangible assets, net  138.1  143.0
Right-of-use assets  916.3  979.0
Deferred income tax  316.2  230.0
Equity method investment  115.4  114.3
Other non-current assets  110.0  81.3
Total assets $ 18,297.6 $ 16,946.5
LIABILITIES
Current liabilities:
Current portion of long-term debt $ 299.7 $ —
Accounts payable (including related parties 2021 - $103.3 and 2020 - $104.3 591.9 594.6
Accrued income taxes  832.6  340.9
Accrued workers’ participation  325.7  247.8
Accrued interest  98.6  98.6
Lease liabilities current 73.9 70.6
Other accrued liabilities  27.6  32.3
Total current liabilities  2,250.0  1,384.8
Long-term debt, net of current portion  6,247.9  6,544.2
Lease liabilities 842.4 908.4
Deferred income taxes  118.3  159.4
Non-current taxes payable — —
Other liabilities and reserves  68.3  128.7
Asset retirement obligation  562.9  545.0
Total non-current liabilities  7,839.8  8,285.7
Commitments and contingencies (Note 13)
STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY (NOTE 14)
Common stock par value $0.01; shares authorized, 2021 and 2020–2,000; shares issued, 2021 and 2020–884.6  8.8  8.8
Additional paid-in capital  3,454.1  3,441.5
Retained earnings  7,769.7  6,846.4
Accumulated other comprehensive income  (9.4) (8.4)
Treasury stock, at cost, common shares  (3,074.0) (3,063.5)
Total Southern Copper Corporation stockholders’ equity  8,149.2  7,224.8
Non-controlling interest  58.6  51.2
Total equity  8,207.8  7,276.0
Total liabilities and equity $ 18,297.6 $ 16,946.5
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
123Southern Copper Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
            
2021 2020 2019
(in millions)
OPERATING ACTIVITIES
Net income $ 3,411.2 $ 1,577.8 $ 1,491.9
Adjustments to reconcile net earnings to net cash provided from operating
activities:
Depreciation, amortization and depletion  806.0  775.6  764.4
Equity earnings of affiliate, net of dividends received  (1.1) (10.4) (6.3)
(Gain) Loss on foreign currency transaction effect  (25.8) 0.9  17.9
Benefit for deferred income taxes  (126.3) (63.5) (21.0)
Other, net  37.7  19.5  12.0
Change in operating assets and liabilities:
Increase in accounts receivable  (289.8) (236.0) (10.5)
Decrease (increase) in inventories  4.7  223.6  (88.7)
Increase (decrease) in accounts payable and accrued liabilities  558.2  313.8  (184.9)
(Increase) decrease in other operating assets and liabilities  (82.4) 182.3  (62.9)
Net cash provided by operating activities  4,292.4  2,783.6  1,911.9
INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures  (892.3) (592.2) (707.5)
Purchase of short-term investments  (1,653.1) (450.3) (284.4)
Proceeds on sale of short-term investment  1,577.0  120.2  417.5
Other, net  (4.5) 6.5  0.4
Net cash used in investing activities  (972.9) (915.8) (574.0)
FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Repayments of debt  —  (400.0) —
Proceeds from issuance of debt — — 987.3
Capitalization of debt issuance cost — — (9.8)
Cash dividends paid to common stockholders  (2,473.8) (1,159.6) (1,236.9)
SCC shareholder derivative lawsuit — received from AMC — — 36.5
SCC shareholder derivative lawsuit — dividend paid — — (36.5)
Distributions to non-controlling interest  (6.7) (4.1) (3.2)
Other, net  0.3  0.4  0.4
Net cash used in financing activities  (2,480.2) (1,563.3) (262.2)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents  (20.9) (46.0) 4.8
Increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents  818.4  258.5  1,080.5
Cash and cash equivalents, at beginning of year  2,183.6  1,925.1  844.6
Cash and cash equivalents, at end of year $ 3,002.0 $ 2,183.6 $ 1,925.1
    2021     2020     2019
(in millions)
Supplemental disclosure of cash flow information:
Cash paid during the year for:
Interest $ 380.2 $ 383.5 $ 356.7
Income taxes $ 1,947.1 $ 1,037.1 $ 1,138.7
Workers’ participation $ 258.4 $ 153.9 $ 224.5
Supplemental schedule of non-cash operating, investing and financing activities:
Decrease (increase) in pension and other post-retirement benefits $ (1.7)$ 1.7 $ (7.7)
Capital expenditures incurred but not yet paid $ 24.6 $ 32.2 $ 2.1
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
124Southern Copper Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
        
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
TOTAL EQUITY, beginning of year $7,276.0 $6,858.2 $6,612.8
STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY, beginning of year  7,224.8  6,810.3  6,567.4
CAPITAL STOCK:
Balance at beginning and end of year:  8.8  8.8  8.8
ADDITIONAL PAID-IN CAPITAL:
Balance at beginning of year  3,441.5  3,424.9  3,393.7
Other activity of the period  12.6  16.6  31.2
Balance at end of year  3,454.1  3,441.5  3,424.9
TREASURY STOCK:
Southern Copper common shares
Balance at beginning of the year  (2,767.5) (2,767.9) (2,768.3)
Used for corporate purposes  0.3  0.4  0.4
Balance at end of year  (2,767.2) (2,767.5) (2,767.9)
Parent Company common shares
Balance at beginning of year  (296.0) (281.0) (251.3)
Other activity, including dividend, interest and foreign currency
transaction effect  (10.8) (15.0) (29.7)
Balance at end of year  (306.8) (296.0) (281.0)
Treasury stock balance at end of year  (3,074.0) (3,063.5) (3,048.9)
RETAINED EARNINGS:
Balance at beginning of year  6,846.4  6,435.6  6,186.9
Net earnings  3,397.1  1,570.4  1,485.8
Dividends declared and paid, common stock, per share, 2021- $3.20, 2020–
$1.50, 2019 - $1.60  (2,473.8) (1,159.6) (1,236.9)
SCC shareholder derivative lawsuit — received from AMC — — 36.5
SCC shareholder derivative lawsuit — dividend paid — — (36.5)
Other activity of the period — — (0.2)
Balance at end of year  7,769.7  6,846.4  6,435.6
ACCUMULATED OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS):
Balance at beginning of year  (8.4) (10.1) (2.4)
Other comprehensive income (loss)  (1.0) 1.7  (7.7)
Balance at end of year  (9.4) (8.4) (10.1)
STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY, end of year  8,149.2  7,224.8  6,810.3
NON-CONTROLLING INTEREST, beginning of year  51.2  47.9  45.4
Net earnings  14.1  7.4  6.1
Distributions paid  (6.7) (4.1) (3.6)
NON-CONTROLLING INTEREST, end of year  58.6  51.2  47.9
TOTAL EQUITY, end of year $8,207.8 $7,276.0 $6,858.2
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
125NOTE 1—DESCRIPTION OF THE BUSINESS:
The Company is a majority-owned, indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico S.A.B. de C.V. (“Grupo Mexico”). At
December 31, 2021, Grupo Mexico through its wholly-owned subsidiary Americas Mining Corporation (“AMC”) owned
88.9% of the Company’s capital stock. The consolidated financial statements presented herein consist of the accounts of
Southern Copper Corporation ("SCC", "Southern Copper" or the “Company”), a Delaware corporation, and its
subsidiaries. The Company is an integrated producer of copper and other minerals, and operates mining, smelting and
refining facilities in Peru and Mexico. The Company conducts its primary operations in Peru through a registered branch
(the "Peruvian Branch" or “Branch” or “SPCC Peru Branch”). The Peruvian Branch is not a corporation separate from
the Company. The Company's Mexican operations are conducted through subsidiaries. The Company also conducts
exploration activities in Argentina, Chile, Ecuador, Mexico and Peru.
COVID – 19 PANDEMIC
Since the World Health Organization (“WHO”) declared the COVID-19 virus outbreak as a global pandemic, all the
countries where the Company operates and conducts exploration activities, as well as the countries where its main
customers and suppliers are located, have published health and safety rules and restrictions on individuals and business
activities.
For the full year 2021, the Company‘s production facilities in Mexico and Peru were working at approximately 95% of
their production capacity. The Company has developed a rigorous COVID-19 emergency protocol.
The Company has also fully restored exploration activities at all of its locations.
The financial reporting process and the information required to prepare the Company’s financial statements suffered no
interruption and the financial statements were prepared without restrictions or difficulties.
SCC´s Senior Management continues to closely monitor the impact of the pandemic and to analyze and quickly resolve
any issues that may arise. As of December 31, 2021, the strong global economic recovery has generated significant
challenges for the global shipping industry, which have led to congestion at ports, shortage of containers and a lack of
space on ships. This situation has caused the Company to experience some delays in the reception of imported materials
as well as in the shipment of its products and receivable collections. This, however, has had no material impact on the
financial position of the Company.
After completing the first stage of its capital programs at Buenavista in Mexico and Toquepala in Peru, the Company
currently does not have major capital expenditures commitments (see Note 13 - Commitments and Contingencies). The
Company has no major debt maturity until November 2022.
The Company performed a qualitative analysis and as of December 31, 2021 identified no indicators of impairment. In
addition, the results of its impairment sensitivity analysis showed projected discounted cash flows in excess of the
carrying amounts of long-lived assets by margins ranging from 1.8 to 5.7 times such carrying amount. This analysis
included a stress test using a copper price assumption of $2.00 per pound and a molybdenum price assumption of $4.00
per pound.
NOTE 2—SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES:
Principles of consolidation—
The consolidated financial statements include the accounts of subsidiaries of which the Company has voting control, in
accordance with Accounting Standards Codification (“ASC”) 810 Consolidation. Such financial statements are prepared
in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States ("U.S. GAAP").
Table of Contents
126Use of estimates—
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make estimates and
assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at
the date of the financial statements, and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period.
Significant items subject to such estimates and assumptions include the carrying value of mineral reserves that are the
basis for future cash flow estimates and amortization calculations; environmental reclamation, closure and retirement
obligations; estimates of recoverable copper in mill and leach stockpiles; asset impairments (including estimates of
future cash flows); unrecognized tax benefits; valuation allowances for deferred tax assets; and fair value of financial
instruments. Management bases its estimates on the Company's historical experience and on various other assumptions
that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
Revenue recognition—
The Company accounts for a contract with a customer when there is a legally enforceable contract between the Company
and the customer, the rights of the parties are identified, the contract has commercial substance, and collectability of the
contract consideration is probable. The Company's revenues are measured based on consideration specified in the
contract with each customer. Disclosures regarding disaggregation of revenues and contract balances are disclosed
within Note 19 "Segment and related information".
The Company’s marketing strategy and annual sales planning emphasize developing and maintaining long-term
customer relationships. Generally, 80% to 90% of the Company’s metal production is sold under annual or longer-term
contracts, which specify a volume of mineral to be sold over a stated period and delivery schedule; the price at which
mineral will be sold at each delivery date is generally determined by the weekly or monthly average rate of the
commodity published by major metal exchanges at specific dates stipulated within each contract. The Company
considers each contract to be a single performance obligation, represented by the delivery of a series of distinct goods
that are substantially the same, with the same pattern of transfer to the Company’s customers. The Company concluded
this as, based on the nature of its contracts, customers receive the benefit of mineral sold as it is shipped per the terms of
the contracts at each contractual delivery date. Likewise, each shipment of product represents the same measure of
progress as other shipments within the contract. Accordingly, the Company recognizes revenues for each contract over
the period of time in which the specified quantity of mineral is delivered. In doing so, the Company considers that it has
a right to consideration from its customers in an amount that corresponds directly to the value transferred to those
customers that being the quantity of mineral delivered at the price per unit delivered. Accordingly, the Company
recognizes revenue at the amount to which it has the right to invoice (the invoice practical expedient), as it believes that
this method is a faithful depiction of the transfer of goods to its customers.
For contracts with a term greater than one year, the Company is unable to disclose an allocation of the transaction price
to the remaining unsatisfied performance obligation, given that unit prices of mineral sold are determined by published
commodity prices at specified dates within the contract. The volume of mineral to be delivered after the first year of the
contract is subject to annual volume negotiations in accordance with the terms of the contract. As of December 31, 2021,
the Company has long-term contracts with promises to deliver in 2022 for a total of 118,000 metric tonnes of copper
concentrate, 48,000 metric tonnes of copper cathodes, 37,594 tonnes of molybdenum concentrate and 367,720 tonnes of
sulfuric acid. This is an estimate that will vary in 2023 and 2024 based on the negotiations with the customers as
mentioned above.
The remainder of the Company’s revenues, including its by-product revenues, are generated by spot sales that are
recognized at a point in time.
Under both sales models, revenue is recognized when or as the performance obligations are satisfied, when the Company
transfers control of the goods and title passes to the customer. Considering the International Commercial Terms
(Incoterms) utilized by the Company, control is transferred generally upon the completion of loading the material at the
point of origin. This is the point at which the customer obtains legal title to the product as well as the ability to direct the
use of and obtain substantially all of the remaining benefits of ownership of the asset. Additionally, payment is generally
due upon the delivery of the shipping and title documents at the point of origin, customers typically have 30 days to
Table of Contents
127remit payment. Copper and non-copper revenues are measured based on the monthly average of prevailing commodity
prices according to the terms of the contracts. The Company provides allowances for doubtful accounts based upon
historical bad debt and claims experience and periodic evaluation of specific customer accounts.
Substantially all of the Company’s sales are made under carriage and insurance paid to, or cost, insurance and freight 
Incoterms, whereby the Company is responsible for providing shipping and insurance after control of the inventory has 
been transferred to the customer. According to the terms of the Company’s contracts, these services are not distinct 
within the context of the contract, and they are not separately identifiable from the other promises within the contract. 
Additionally, it is the Company policy and it has a long-standing history of providing shipping and insurance services to 
its customers. Accordingly, shipping and insurance are not considered separate performance obligations. The related 
costs of shipping and insurance are presented within the cost of sales line in the accompanying consolidated statements 
of income.  
Furthermore, the Company considered the impact of the shipping and insurance services on the determination of when
control is transferred to its customers. It has concluded that the terms of these services do not impact its customers’
ability to sell, pledge, or otherwise use the products in shipment. Also, there is a small likelihood and minimal history of
lost or damaged goods during shipment. Considering these factors, combined with the other indicators of control
previously mentioned, the Company has concluded that these services do not impact the determination that control is
transferred at the point of origin.
For certain of the Company’s sales of copper and molybdenum products, customer contracts allow for pricing based on a
month subsequent to shipping, in most cases within the following three months and occasionally in some cases a few
additional months. In such cases, revenue is recorded at a provisional price at the time of shipment. The provisionally
priced copper sales are adjusted to reflect forward LME or COMEX copper prices at the end of each month until a final
adjustment is made to the price of the shipments upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract. In
the case of molybdenum sales, for which there are no published forward prices, the provisionally priced sales are
adjusted to reflect the market prices at the end of each month until a final adjustment is made to the price of the
shipments upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract.
These provisional pricing arrangements are accounted for separately from the contract as an embedded derivative
instrument under ASC 815-30 “Derivatives and Hedging—Cash Flow Hedges.” The Company sells copper in
concentrate, anode, blister and refined form at industry standard commercial terms. Net sales include the invoiced value
of copper, zinc, silver, molybdenum, sulfuric acid and other metals and the corresponding fair value adjustment of the
related forward contract of copper and molybdenum. Disclosure regarding adjustments to sales for provisionally priced
contracts is disclosed within Note 19 “Segment and related information”.
Cash and cash equivalents—
Cash and cash equivalents include bank deposits, certificates of deposit and short-term investment funds with original
maturities of three months or less at the date of purchase. The carrying value of cash and cash equivalents approximates
fair value.
Short-term investments—
The Company accounts for short-term investments in accordance with ASC 320-10 “Investments Debt and Equity
Securities-Recognition.” The Company determines the appropriate classification of all short-term investments as held-
to-maturity, available-for-sale or trading at the time of purchase and re-evaluates such classifications as of each balance
sheet date. Unrealized gains and losses on available-for-sale investments, net of taxes, are reported as a component of
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) in stockholders’ equity, unless such loss is deemed to be other than
temporary.
Table of Contents
128Inventories—
The Company principally produces copper and, in the production process, obtains several by-products, including
molybdenum, silver, zinc, sulfuric acid and other metals.
Metal inventories, consisting of work-in-process and finished goods, are carried at the lower of average cost or net
realizable value (NRV). Costs of work-in-process inventories and finished goods mainly include power, labor, fuel,
operating and repair materials, depreciation, amortization, depletion, and other necessary costs related to the extraction
and processing of ore, including mining, milling, concentrating, smelting, refining, leaching and chemical processing.
Costs incurred in the production of metal inventories exclude general and administrative costs. Once molybdenum,
silver, zinc and other by-products are identified, they are transferred to their respective production facilities and the
incremental cost required to complete production is assigned to their inventory value.
Work-in-process inventories represent materials that are in the process of being converted into a saleable product.
Conversion processes vary depending on the nature of the copper ore and the specific mining operation. For sulfide ores,
processing includes milling and concentrating and results in the production of copper and molybdenum concentrates.
Finished goods include saleable products (e.g., copper concentrates, copper anodes, copper cathodes, copper rod,
molybdenum concentrate and other metallurgical products).
Supplies inventories are carried at the lower of average cost or net realizable value (NRV).
Long-term inventory-Ore stockpiles on leach pads.
The leaching process is an integral part of the mining operations carried out at the Company’s open-pit mines. The
Company capitalizes the production cost of leachable material at its Toquepala, La Caridad and Buenavista mines,
recognizing it as inventory. This cost includes mining and haulage costs incurred to deliver ore to leach pads,
depreciation, amortization, depletion and site overhead costs. The estimates of recoverable mineral content contained in
the leaching dumps are supported by engineering studies. As the production cycle of the leaching process is significantly
longer than the conventional process of concentrating, smelting and electrolytic refining, the Company includes current
leach inventory (included in work-in-process inventories) and long-term leach inventory on its balance sheet. On January
1, 2020, the Company aligned its capitalization method for its Peruvian and Mexican operations to capitalize based on
the allocation of copper content recoverable between ore and leach material. In addition, inventory consumption is now
valued at the average unit cost, instead of the declining percentages of recovery method used previously. As a result of
these changes, during 2020 the value of capitalized material decreased by $196.4 million and consumption decreased by
$29.3 million when compared to the previous capitalization method.
Management has evaluated ASC 250-10 and considered appropriate guidance to conclude that the aforementioned
classifies as a change in accounting estimate, and therefore should affect accounting books prospectively. Management
believes that this new method will result in a more accurate valuation of this material.
Property—
Property is recorded at acquisition cost, net of accumulated depreciation and amortization. Cost includes major
expenditures for improvements and replacements, which extend useful lives or increase capacity and interest costs
associated with significant capital additions. Maintenance, repairs, normal development costs at existing mines and gains
or losses on assets retired or sold are reflected in earnings as incurred.
Buildings and equipment are depreciated on the straight-line method over estimated lives from two to 50 years or the
estimated life of the mine if shorter.
Table of Contents
129Mine development—
Mine development includes primarily the cost of acquiring land rights to an exploitable ore body, pre-production
stripping costs at new mines that are commercially exploitable, costs associated with bringing new mineral properties
into production, and removal of overburden to prepare unique and identifiable areas outside the current mining area for
such future production. Mine development costs are amortized on a unit of production basis over the remaining life of
the mines.
Diverse practices exist in the mining industry relative to the treatment of drilling and other related costs to delineate new
mineral reserves. The Company follows the practices outlined in the next two paragraphs in its treatment of drilling and
related costs.
Drilling and other associated costs incurred in the Company's efforts to delineate new resources, whether near-mine or
Greenfield are expensed as incurred. These costs are classified as mineral exploration costs. Once the Company
determines through feasibility studies that proven and probable reserves exist and that the drilling and other associated
costs embody a probable future benefit that involves a capacity, singly or in combination with other assets, to contribute
directly or indirectly to future net cash inflow, then the costs are classified as mine development costs. These mine
development costs incurred prospectively to develop the property are capitalized as incurred, until the commencement of
production, and are amortized using the units of production method over estimated life of the ore body. During the
production stage, drilling and other related costs incurred to maintain production are included in production cost in the
period in which they are incurred.
Drilling and other related costs incurred in the Company’s efforts to delineate a major expansion of reserves at an
existing production property are expensed as incurred. Once the Company determines through feasibility studies that
proven and probable incremental reserves exist and that the drilling and other associated costs embody a probable future
benefit that involves a capacity, singly or in combination with other assets, to contribute directly or indirectly to future
net cash inflow, then the costs are classified as mine development costs. These incremental mine development costs are
capitalized as incurred, until the commencement of production and amortized using the units of production method over
the estimated life of the ore body. A major expansion of reserves is one that increases total reserves at a property by
approximately 10% or more.
For the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, the Company did not capitalize any drilling and related costs.
Asset retirement obligations (reclamation and remediation costs)—
The fair value of a liability for asset retirement obligations is recognized in the period in which the liability is incurred.
The liability is measured at fair value and is adjusted to its present value in subsequent periods as accretion expense is
recorded. The corresponding asset retirement costs are capitalized as part of the carrying value of the related long-lived
assets and depreciated over the asset's useful life.
Intangible assets—
Intangible assets include primarily the excess amount paid over the book value for investment shares, which are
presented as mining concessions, and mining and engineering development studies. Intangible assets are carried at
acquisition costs, net of accumulated amortization and are amortized principally on a unit of production basis over the
estimated remaining life of the mines. Intangible assets are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the asset may not be recoverable.
Debt issuance costs—
Debt issuance costs related to a recognized debt liability are presented in the balance sheet as a direct deduction from the
carrying amount of that debt liability, consistent with the treatment of a debt discount.
Table of Contents
130Mineral reserves—
The Company periodically reevaluates estimates of its mineral reserves, which represent the Company’s estimate as to
the amount of unmined copper remaining in its existing mine locations that can be produced and sold at a profit. Such
estimates are based on engineering evaluations derived from samples of drill holes and other openings, combined with
assumptions about copper market prices and production costs at each of the respective mines.
The Company updates its estimate of mineral reserves at the beginning of each year. In 2021, the Company adopted
SEC’s mining property disclosure requirements (Regulation S-K, Subpart 1300). Consequently, as of December 31,
2021, the Company based its mineral reserve estimates on a long-term price assumption of $3.30 per pound of copper. 
Mineral reserves at the end of 2020 and 2019 were estimated under previous standards at current prices per pound of 
copper of  $2.816 and $2.818, respectively. The ore reserve estimates are used to determine the amortization of mine
development and intangible assets.
Once the Company determines through feasibility studies that proven and probable reserves exist and that drilling and
other associated costs embody a probable future benefit that involves a capacity, singly or in combination with other
assets, to contribute directly or indirectly to future net cash inflow, then the costs are classified as mine development
costs and the Company discloses the related mineral reserves.
Exploration—
Tangible and intangible costs incurred in the search for mineral properties are charged against earnings when incurred.
Income taxes—
Provisions for income taxes are based on taxes payable or refundable for the current year and deferred taxes on
temporary differences between the amount of taxable income and pretax financial income and between the tax bases of
assets and liabilities and their reported amounts in the financial statements. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are
included in the financial statements at currently enacted income tax rates applicable to the period in which the deferred
tax assets and liabilities are expected to be realized and settled as prescribed in ASC 740 “Income taxes.” As changes in
tax laws or rates are enacted, deferred tax assets and liabilities are adjusted through the provision for income taxes.
Deferred income tax assets are reduced by any benefits that, in the opinion of management, are more likely not to be
realized.
The Company’s operations involve dealing with uncertainties and judgments in the application of complex tax
regulations in multiple jurisdictions. The final taxes paid are dependent upon many factors, including negotiations with
tax authorities in various jurisdictions and resolution of disputes arising from federal, state, and international tax audits.
The Company recognizes potential liabilities and records tax liabilities for anticipated tax audit issues in the U.S. and
other tax jurisdictions based on its estimate of whether, and the extent to which, additional taxes will be due. The
Company follows the guidance of ASC 740 “Income taxes” to record these liabilities. (See Note 7 “Income taxes” of the
consolidated financial statements for additional information). The Company adjusts these reserves in light of changing
facts and circumstances; however, due to the complexity of some of these uncertainties, the ultimate resolution may
result in a payment that is materially different from the Company’s current estimate of the tax liabilities. If its estimate of
tax liabilities proves to be less than the ultimate assessment, an additional charge to expense would result. If payment of
these amounts ultimately proves to be less than the recorded amounts, the reversal of the liabilities would result in tax
benefits being recognized in the period when the Company determines the liabilities are no longer necessary.
The Company classifies income tax-related interest and penalties as income taxes in the financial statements, as well as
interest and penalties, if any, related to unrecognized tax benefits.
Foreign exchange—
The Company’s functional currency is the U.S. dollar. As required by local law, both the Peruvian Branch and Minera
Mexico maintain their books of accounts in Peruvian soles and Mexican pesos, respectively.
Table of Contents
131Foreign currency assets and liabilities are remeasured into U.S. dollars at current exchange rates, except for non-
monetary items such as inventory, property, intangible assets and other assets which are remeasured at historical
exchange rates. Revenues and expenses are generally translated at actual exchange rates in effect during the period,
except for those items related to balance sheet amounts that are remeasured at historical exchange rates. Gains and losses
from foreign currency remeasurement are included in earnings of the period.
Gains and (losses) resulting from foreign currency transactions are included in "Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation,
amortization and depletion)."
Asset impairments -
The Company evaluates long-term assets when events or changes in economic circumstances indicate that the carrying
amount of such assets may not be recoverable. These evaluations are based on business plans that are prepared using a
time horizon that is reflective of the Company’s expectations of metal prices over its business cycle. The Company is
currently using a long-term average copper price and an average molybdenum price for impairment tests, reflective of
what the Company believes is the lower level of the current price environment. The results of its impairment tests using
these long-term copper and molybdenum prices show no impairment in the carrying value of their assets.
In recent years testing using assumptions for long-term average prices have resulted in stricter evaluation for impairment
analysis than would the higher three year average prices for copper and molybdenum prices. Should this situation
reverse in the future with three-year average prices below the long-term price assumption, the Company would assess
the need to use the three-year average prices in its evaluations. The Company uses an estimate of the future undiscounted
net cash flows of the related asset or asset group over the remaining life to measure whether the assets are recoverable
and measures any impairment by reference to fair value.
Other comprehensive income—
Comprehensive income represents changes in equity during a period, except those resulting from investments by owners
and distributions to owners. During the fiscal years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, the components of "other
comprehensive income (loss)" were, the unrecognized gain (loss) on employee benefit obligations and unrealized gain
(loss) on derivative instruments classified as cash flow hedge.
Business segments-
Company management views Southern Copper as having three reportable segments and manages it on the basis of these
segments. The segments identified by the Company are: 1) the Peruvian operations, which include the two open-pit
copper mines in Peru and the plants and services supporting such mines, 2) the Mexican open-pit copper mines, which
include La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and their supporting facilities and 3) the Mexican underground
mining operations, which include five underground mines that produce zinc, lead, copper, silver and gold, a coal mine
and a zinc refinery. Please see Note 19 “Segments and Related Information.”
The Chief Operating Decision Maker of the Company focuses on operating income as measure of performance to
evaluate different segments, and to make decisions to allocate resources to the reported segments. This is a common
measure in the mining industry.
Leases -
The Company adopted FASB ASC 842, Leases, effective January 1, 2019. The Company determined if a contract is or
contained a lease at its inception. The Company evaluated if a contract gave the right to obtain substantially all of the
economic benefits from use of an identified asset and the right to direct the use of the asset, in order to determine if a
contract contained a lease. All of the Company’s existing lease contracts are operating lease contracts. For these leases,
the Company recognized right-of-use assets and the corresponding operating lease liabilities on its consolidated balance
sheet. Right-of-use assets represent the Company’s right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilities
represent an obligation by the Company to make lease payments which arise from the lease. Lease right-of-use assets
Table of Contents
132and liabilities are recognized at the inception date based on the present value of lease payments over the lease term.  As 
the Company’s lease contracts do not provide an implicit rate, the Company uses its incremental borrowing rate based on 
the information available at the inception date in order to determine the present value of lease payments. Lease expense 
for lease payments is recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term, in the cost of sales and operating expenses. 
The Company elected the transition approach whereby it applied the new leases standard at the adoption date and 
recognized a cumulative-effect adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings in the period of adoption. The 
Company elected the short-term lease recognition exemption (short-term lease practical expedient) by class of 
underlying asset (which results in off-balance-sheet accounting for the lease).
NOTE 3—SHORT-TERM INVESTMENTS:
Short-term investments were as follows ($ in millions):
At December 31,  
2021     2020  
Trading securities $486.5 $410.2
Weighted average interest rate  0.3%   0.4%
Available-for-sale $ 0.4 $ 0.6
Weighted average interest rate  0.7%   0.7%
Total $486.9 $410.8
Trading securities consist of bonds issued by public companies and are publicly traded. Each financial instrument is
independent of the others. The Company has the intention to sell these bonds in the short-term.
Available-for-sale investments consist of securities issued by public companies. Each security is independent of the
others and, as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, included corporate bonds and asset and mortgage backed obligations. As
of December 31, 2021 and 2020, gross unrealized gains and losses on available-for-sale securities were not material.
Related to these investments the Company earned interest, which was recorded as interest income in the consolidated
statement of earnings. Also the Company redeemed some of these securities and recognized gains (losses) due to
changes in fair value, which were recorded as other income (expense) in the consolidated statement of earnings.
The following table summarizes the activity of these investments by category (in millions):
Years ended 
December 31, 
2021    2020 
Trading:
Interest earned $1.4 $0.7
Unrealized gain (loss)  at the end of the period $0.1$(*)  
Available-for-sale:
Interest earned $(*)  $(*)  
Investment redeemed $0.2$0.1
(*)   Less than $0.1 million
Table of Contents
133At December 31, 2021 and 2020, contractual maturities of the available-for-sale debt securities are as follows (in
millions):
    2021    2020
One year or less $ — $ —
Maturing after one year through five years  —  —
Maturing after five years through ten years  —  —
Due after 10 years  0.4 0.6
Total debt securities $ 0.4$0.6
NOTE 4—INVENTORIES:
At December 31, 
(in millions) 2021     2020
Inventory, current:
Metals at average cost:
Finished goods $ 58.6$ 50.8
Work-in-process  340.7 248.9
Ore stockpiles on leach pads  259.7 298.5
Supplies at average cost  313.9 352.0
Total current inventory $972.9$950.2
Inventory, long-term:
Ore stockpiles on leach pads $1,097.6$1,125.0
Total leaching costs added as long-term inventory of ore stockpiles in leach pads amounted to $247.4 million, $194.0
million and $469.0 million in 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Long-term leaching inventories recognized as cost of
sales amounted to $313.7 million, $359.1 million and $385.8 million in 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
NOTE 5—PROPERTY:
At December 31, 
(in millions)     2021     2020
Buildings and equipment $15,993.8$15,561.9
Construction in progress  1,668.0 1,481.6
Mine development  273.2 272.8
Mineral assets 83.2 83.2
Land, other than mineral  258.6 235.8
Total property  18,276.8 17,635.3
Accumulated depreciation, amortization and depletion  (8,812.4) (8,176.6)
Total property and mine development, net $9,464.4$9,458.7
Depreciation and depletion expense for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, amounted to $797.3
million, $766.4 million and $759.9 million, respectively.
Table of Contents
134NOTE 6—INTANGIBLE ASSETS:
At December 31, 
(in millions)     2021     2020
Mining concessions $121.2$121.2
Mine engineering and development studies  19.8 19.8
Software  65.4 60.6
 206.4 201.6
Accumulated amortization:  
Mining concessions (40.4) (38.6)
Mine engineering and development studies (18.2) (17.2)
Software (51.6) (44.7)
(110.2) (100.5)
Goodwill  41.9 41.9
Intangible assets, net $138.1$143.0
Amortization of intangibles for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, amounted to $8.7 million, $9.2
million and $4.5 million, respectively. Estimated amortization is as follows:
Estimated amortization expense (in millions):     
2022 $ 6.4
2023 5.4
2024 4.3
2025 3.2
2026 1.7
Total 2022 - 2026 $21.0
Average annual $ 4.2
Goodwill includes $17.0 million generated in 1997 as a result of purchasing a third party interest in the Buenavista mine.
It also includes $24.9 million representing the amount of the purchase price in excess of the fair value of the net assets
acquired from El Pilar mine. This goodwill is attributable to future benefits that the Company expects to realize from the
mine and will not be deductible for income tax purposes.
NOTE 7—INCOME TAXES:
Since March 2009, Grupo Mexico, through its wholly-owned subsidiary AMC, owns an interest in excess of 80% of
SCC. Accordingly, SCC’s results are included in the consolidated tax return for AMC for U.S. federal income tax
reporting.
In accordance with its policy regarding use of estimates, the Company estimates income taxes currently payable or 
receivable as well as deferred income tax assets and liabilities attributable to temporary differences between the financial 
statement carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases. The Company provides 
current and deferred income taxes, as if it were filing a separate U.S. federal income tax return.   
Table of Contents
135The components of the provision for income taxes for the three years ended December 31, 2021, are as follows:
(in millions)     2021     2020     2019
U.S. federal and state:
Current $ — $ — $ —
Deferred  —  —  —
Uncertain tax positions  —  —  (1.3)
 —  —  (1.3)
Foreign (Peru and Mexico):
Current  2,425.5 1,237.9 966.3
Deferred (126.3) (63.5) (30.1)
Uncertain tax positions  —  —  10.4
 2,299.2 1,174.4 946.6
Total provision for income taxes $2,299.2$1,174.4$945.3
The source of income is as follows:
(in millions)     2021     2020     2019
Earnings by location:
U.S. $(32.4)$(15.3)$ (1.9)
Foreign
Peru  1,962.8 723.9 513.0
Mexico  3,766.4 2,037.2 1,915.4
 5,729.2 2,761.1 2,428.4
Earnings before taxes on income $5,696.8$2,745.8$2,426.5
The reconciliation of the statutory income tax rate to the effective tax rate for the three years ended December 31, 2021,
is as follows (in percentage points):
    2021     2020     2019  
Expected tax at U.S. statutory rate  21.0%  21.0%  21.0%
Foreign tax at other than statutory rate, net of foreign tax credit benefit (1)  13.8 13.7 14.0
Percentage depletion  (1.8) (2.2) (2.7)
Other permanent differences  (0.3) 0.1 0.1
Additional valuation allowance on U.S. deferred tax assets, foreign tax credits
and U.S. tax effect on Peruvian deferred taxes 8.4 8.9 10.1
Increase (decrease) in unrecognized tax benefits for uncertain tax positions  (0.5) (0.1) (2.1)
Amounts (over) / under provided in prior years  — (0.1) (1.1)
Other  (0.2) 1.5 (0.3)
Effective income tax rate  40.4%  42.8%  39.0%
(1)Foreign tax at other than statutory rates, net of foreign tax credit benefit, also includes the effects of permanent
differences in Peru and Mexico, that are determined at the local statutory rate.
The Company files income tax returns in three jurisdictions, Peru, Mexico and the United States. For the three years
presented above, the statutory income tax rate for Mexico was 30% and the United States tax rate was 21%. The
Peruvian tax rate was 29.5% for the three years presented above. While the largest components of income taxes are the
Peruvian and Mexican taxes, the Company is a domestic U.S. entity. Therefore, the rate used in the above reconciliation
is the U.S. statutory rate.
For all of the years presented, both the Peruvian branch and Minera Mexico filed separate tax returns in their respective
tax jurisdictions. Although the tax rules and regulations imposed in the separate tax jurisdictions may vary significantly,
similar permanent items exist, such as items which are nondeductible or nontaxable. Some permanent differences relate
specifically to SCC such as the allowance in the United States for percentage depletion.
Table of Contents
136Deferred taxes include the U.S., Peruvian and Mexican tax effects of the following types of temporary differences and
carryforwards:
At December 31, 
(in millions)     2021     2020
Assets:
Inventories $ 78.0$ 62.4
Capitalized exploration expenses  12.5 13.0
U.S. foreign tax credit carryforward, net of FIN 48 liability  1,479.2 974.1
U.S. tax effect of Peruvian deferred tax liability  75.0 111.2
Provisions  284.5 169.5
Property, plant and equipment 9.5 —
Deferred workers participation 11.1 37.8
Accrued salaries, wages and vacations 8.2 8.5
Sales price adjustment (PUI) 2.6 (5.8)
Social responsibility expenses 5.1 4.3
Deferred charges 31.6 41.8
Valuation allowance on U.S. deferred tax assets, foreign tax credits
and U.S. tax effect on Peruvian deferred (1,820.0) (1,343.2)
Accrued royalty and special mining tax 23.3 18.3
Other  5.5 1.2
Total deferred tax assets  206.1 93.1
At December 31, 
(in millions)     2021     2020
Liabilities:
Property, plant and equipment  —  (17.2)
Other  (8.2) (5.3)
Total deferred tax liabilities  (8.2) (22.5)
Total net deferred tax (liabilities) / assets $197.9$ 70.6
The valuation allowance increased by $476.8 million over 2020’s level, which was primarily due to the valuation of
unutilized Foreign Tax Credits generated in 2021. The Peru branch operations are taxed in the U.S. as a flow through
entity to SCC. Since the Peruvian tax rate of 29.5% now exceeds the U.S. tax rate of 21% it is the opinion of
management that it is more likely than not that the benefit of excess credits generated in the current year will not be
realizable. 
U.S. Tax Matters—
As of December 31, 2021, the Company considers its ownership of the stock of Minera Mexico to be essentially
permanent in duration. Income from subsidiaries, such as Minera Mexico, is included in the Global Intangible Low Tax
Income or GILTI.
GILTI imposes a tax on foreign income in excess of a deemed return on tangible assets of foreign corporations. The
Company has not had U.S. tax liability from the GILTI inclusion since introduction of this tax in 2018 and does not
anticipate a tax in the future because of increased fixed asset amounts and the Mexican tax rate of 30%. No U.S. deferred
taxes have been recorded as the Company has elected that if GILTI were to apply in the future, a current period expense
would be recorded when incurred.
The Base Erosion Anti-Abuse Tax (BEAT) is a 10% minimum tax for the years 2019 through 2025 and 12.5% in years
thereafter. It is calculated on a base equal to the Company’s income determined without the tax benefit arising from base
erosion payments. Since this tax was imposed in 2018 the Company has had no U.S. tax liability for BEAT since it has
met the safe harbor rule that provides a Company not to be subject to the BEAT if related party payments from the U.S.
to foreign entities does not exceed 3% of expenses excluding cost of goods sold. The Company must continue to analyze
applicability of the BEAT provisions on a yearly basis.
Table of Contents
137As of December 31, 2021, $1,054.8 million of the Company´s total cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments of
$3,488.9 million were held by foreign subsidiaries. The cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments maintained in
our foreign operations are generally used to cover local operating and investment expenses. The Company has
determined that as of December 31, 2021, a deferred tax asset of $0.2 billion exists with respect to its investment in
foreign subsidiaries. Tax accounting guidance provided in ASC 740 requires this asset to be recognized only if the basis
difference will reverse in the foreseeable future. Management has no plans that would result in the reversal of this
temporary difference and consequently no deferred tax asset has been recorded. Future dividends from these subsidiaries
may not be subject to federal income tax in the U.S., and the Company incurs no state income tax liability. Additionally,
there are no withholding taxes due to the tax treaty between the United States and Mexico. Distributions of earnings
from the Company's Peruvian branch to the United States are not subject to U.S. taxes on repatriation. The Company's
branch operations are not foreign corporations. They are rather mainly comprised of operations that are branches of the
Company's U.S. operations and taxed on a current basis.
At December 31, 2021, there were $1,465.0 million of foreign tax credits available for carryback or carryforward. These
credits have a one-year carryback and a ten-year carryforward period and can only be used to reduce U.S. income tax on
foreign earnings. There were no other unused U.S. tax credits at December 31, 2021. These credits will expire if not
utilized by the end of the years listed below:
Year     Amount
2024  73.1
2025 174.0
2026 96.2
2027 —
2028 175.0
2029 219.9
2030 247.6
2031 479.2
Total $1,465.0
These foreign tax credits are presented above on a gross basis and have not been adjusted for any unrecognized tax
benefits. In accordance with ASC 740 the Company has recorded a $14.2 million adjustment to its foreign tax credits for
unrecognized tax benefits. However, there is no impact to tax expense since the credits were fully valued. The foreign
tax credits of $1,479.2 million have a full valuation allowance against them at December 31, 2021. It is the opinion of
management that with the reduction in the U.S. corporate tax rate to 21% and considering the corporate tax rates in
Mexico of 30% and in Peru at 29.5%, it is unlikely the excess foreign tax credits can be utilized. Additionally, foreign
dividends may no longer be taxed in the U.S. due to the GILTI rules and thereby reducing the U.S. tax on the foreign
source income and limiting the ability to utilize foreign tax credits generated before the 2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act.
Peruvian Tax Matters—
Royalty mining charge: The royalty charge is based on operating income margins with graduated rates ranging from 1%
to 12% of operating profits, with a minimum royalty charge assessed at 1% of net sales. The minimum royalty charge is
recorded as cost of sales and those amounts assessed at higher rates are included in the income tax provision. The
Company has accrued $140.8 million, $60.6 million and $42.3 million of royalty charges in 2021, 2020 and 2019,
respectively, of which $97.8 million, $31.4 million and $14.2 million were included in income taxes in 2021, 2020 and
2019, respectively.
Peruvian special mining tax: This tax is based on operating income with graduated rates increasing from 2% to 8.4%.
The Company recognized $114.0 million, $50.0 million and $38.1 million in 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively, with
respect to this tax. These amounts are included as “income taxes” in the consolidated statement of earnings.
Mexican Tax Matters—
In 2013, the Mexican Congress enacted tax law changes that became effective on January 1, 2014. Among other effects,
the amounts that Minera Mexico recorded during 2020 and paid in 2021 were:
Table of Contents
138●Mining royalty at the rate of 7.5% on taxable earnings before taxes: $75.3 million.
●Additional royalty of 0.5% over gross income from sales of gold, silver and platinum: $1.5 million.
On September 8, 2020, the Federal Executive submitted the 2021 Economic Package. The Federal Revenue Law for
fiscal year 2021, was published in the Federal Official Gazette in December 8, 2020, effective as of January 1, 2021.
Compared to the 2020 economic package, the aforementioned proposal does not include any major changes and mostly
addresses administrative and enforcement types of tax issues with few cross-border tax implications and does not include
tax increases or new taxes.
Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes—
The total amount of unrecognized tax benefits in 2021, 2020 and 2019, was as follows (in millions):
    2021    2020    2019
Unrecognized tax benefits, opening balance $66.1$58.4$214.5
Gross decreases—tax positions in prior period  (10.9) —  (7.5)
Gross increases—current-period tax positions  —  7.7 —
Gross decreases—current-period tax positions (1.1) — (4.2)
Decreases related to settlements with taxing authorities  (54.1) —  (144.4)
 (66.1) 7.7 (156.1)
Unrecognized tax benefits, ending balance $— $66.1$58.4
The amount of unrecognized tax benefits that, if recognized, would affect the effective tax rate was zero at December 31,
2021. Any recognition of unrecognized tax benefits within the U.S. jurisdiction would not affect the effective tax rate as
long as the Company continues to value U.S. deferred tax assets including foreign tax credits. The Company has no
unrecognized Mexican or Peruvian tax benefits as of December 31, 2021.
The Company closed the 2014 through 2016 IRS audit on April 14, 2021. The decrease in unrecognized tax benefits 
from the audit settlement had no material effect on the Company’s financial statements.  
As of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, the Company’s liability for uncertain tax positions did not include
accrued interest and penalties in the U.S. jurisdiction. As of December 31, 2019 the Company’s liability for uncertain tax
positions included Peruvian accrued interest and penalties of $10.5 million.
The following tax years remain open to examination and adjustment in the Company’s three major tax jurisdictions:
Peru:    2016 and all subsequent years
U.S.: 2017 and all subsequent years
Mexico:2016 and all subsequent years
Management does not expect that any of the open years will result in a cash payment within the U.S. jurisdiction in the
upcoming twelve months ending December 31, 2022.
NOTE 8—WORKERS’ PARTICIPATION:
The Company's operations in Peru and Mexico are subject to statutory workers' participation.
In Peru, the provision for workers' participation is calculated at 8% of pre-tax earnings. The current portion of this
participation, which is accrued during the year, is based on the Peruvian Branch's taxable income and is distributed to
workers following determination of final results for the year. The annual amount payable to an individual worker is
capped at the worker’s salary for an 18 month period. Amounts determined in excess of the 18 months of worker’s salary
Table of Contents
139is no longer made as a payment to the worker and is levied first for the benefit of the “Fondo Nacional de Capacitacion
Laboral y de Promocion del Empleo” (National Workers’ Training and Employment Promotion Fund) until this entity
receives from all employers in its region an amount equivalent to 2,200 Peruvian taxable units (approximately $2.4
million in 2021). Any remaining excess is levied as payment for the benefit of the regional governments. These levies
fund worker training, employment promotion, entrepreneurship and various other programs.
In Mexico, workers' participation is determined using the guidelines established in the Mexican income tax law at a rate
of 10% of pre-tax earnings as adjusted by the tax law.
The provision for workers’ participation is allocated to “Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and
depletion)”. Workers’ participation expense for the three years ended December 31, 2021 was as follows (in millions):
    2021     2020     2019
Current $344.5$248.5$188.8
Deferred  (72.8) 19.8 29.8
$271.7$268.3$218.6
NOTE 9—LEASES:
The Company has operating leases for power generating facilities, vehicles and properties. The Company recognizes
lease expense for these leases on a straight-line basis over the lease term. Some of the Company’s leases include both
lease and non-lease components which are accounted for separately. The Company’s leases have remaining lease terms
of one year to 11 years, and do not include options to extend the leases. The Company’s lease agreements do not contain
options to purchase the leased assets or to terminate the leases before the expiration date. In addition, the Company’s
lease contracts do not have any material residual value guarantees or material restrictive covenants. As none of the
Company’s leases provides an implicit rate, the Company uses its incremental borrowing rate based on the information
available at commencement date in determining the present value of lease payments.
The weighted average remaining lease term for the Company’s leases is 9 years, and the weighted average discount rate
for these leases is 3.78%.
The operating lease expense recognized in the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 was classified as follows
(in millions):
Classification     2021  2020 2019
Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion)  $ 108.1$ 114.4$ 114.4
Selling, general and administrative  0.1 0.2 0.2
Exploration  0.2 0.2 0.2
Total lease expense  $ 108.4$ 114.8$ 114.8
Table of Contents
140Maturities of lease liabilities are as follows:
Lease liabilities
Year     (in millions)
2022  $ 114.9
2023  113.3
2024  105.8
2025  104.7
2026  104.6
After 2026  623.3
Total lease payments  $ 1,166.6
Less: interest on lease liabilities  (250.3)
Present value of lease payments  $ 916.3
NOTE 10—ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATION:
Peruvian operations:
The Company maintains an asset retirement obligation for its mining properties in Peru, as required by the Peruvian
Mine Closure Law. In accordance with the requirements of this law the Company’s closure plans were approved by the
Peruvian Ministry of Energy and Mines (“MINEM”). As part of the closure plans, the Company is required to provide
annual guarantees over the estimated life of the mines, based on a present value approach, and to furnish the funds for
the asset retirement obligation. This law requires a review of closing plans every five years.
On June 24, 2019, MINEM approved a change to the guarantees required for the mining closure plans. The new
regulation specifies that the annual guarantees can be secured with real estate up to a maximum of 50% and the
remaining amount with credit instruments. Currently, the Company has pledged the value of its Lima office complex for
the 50% of the guarantee and with a stand-by letter of credit for the other 50% as security for this obligation. Through
January 2022, the Company provided total guarantees of $66.3 million.
The closure cost recognized for this liability includes the cost, as outlined in its closure plans, of dismantling the
Toquepala and Cuajone concentrators, the Ilo smelter and refinery, and the shops and auxiliary facilities at the three
units. In March 2016, MINEM approved the Mining Closure Plan for the Toquepala expansion project and the revised
closure plans for the Cuajone mine and the Ilo facilities were approved in January and October 2019, respectively. As
result of these new estimates, the Company increased the asset retirement obligation by $28.1 million in 2019. The
closure plan for the Tia Maria project was approved in February 2017. The Company, however, has not recorded a
retirement obligation for the project because the work on the project is on hold. The Company believes that under these
circumstances the recording of a retirement obligation is not appropriate.
Mexican operations:
The Company has recognized an estimated asset retirement obligation for its mining properties in Mexico as part of its
environmental commitment. Even though there is currently no enacted law, statute, ordinance, written or oral contract
requiring the Company to carry out mine closure and environmental remediation activities, the Company believes that an
obligation presently exists based on historical government requirements for the closure of any facility. The overall cost
recognized for mining closure in Mexico includes the estimated costs of dismantling concentrators, smelter and refinery
plants, shops and other facilities.
During 2020, the Company made a change in the estimate for the asset retirement obligation for its Mexican operations,
mainly due to a detailed review of the closing activities required for each facility. The effect of this change was an
increase in the asset retirement obligation of $269.3 million, which was recorded in December 2020.
Table of Contents
141The following table summarizes the asset retirement obligation activity for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020
(in millions):
    2021     2020
Balance as of January 1 $545.0$262.3
Changes in estimates  —  269.3
Closure payments  (5.6) (1.2)
Accretion expense  23.5 14.6
Balance as of December 31, $562.9$545.0
NOTE 11—FINANCING:
Long-term debt (in millions):
Carrying
value as of
Face Issuance Issuance December 31, 
    amount     discount    costs     2021
3.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2022  $ 300 (0.1)$ (0.2)$ 299.7
3.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2025   500 (1.0) (1.0) 498.0
9.250% Yankee bonds due 2028   51.2 — —  51.2
7.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2035   1,000 (11.6) (7.6) 980.8
6.750% Senior unsecured notes due 2040 1,100 (6.7) (5.4) 1,087.9
5.250% Senior unsecured notes due 2042   1,200 (18.1) (6.0) 1,175.9
5.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2045   1,500 (15.8) (8.3) 1,475.9
4.500% Minera Mexico Senior unsecured notes due
2050 1,000 (12.3) (9.5) 978.2
Total $ 6,651.2 $ (65.6)$ (38.0) 6,547.6
Less, current portion  (299.7)
Total long-term debt $ 6,247.9
                Carrying
value as of
Face Issuance Issuance December 31, 
amount discount costs 2020
3.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2022 $ 300 (0.2)$ (0.3)$ 299.5
3.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2025  500 (1.3) (1.2) 497.5
9.250% Yankee bonds due 2028  51.2 — —  51.2
7.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2035  1,000 (12.0) (8.0) 980.0
6.750% Senior unsecured notes due 2040  1,100 (6.9) (5.6) 1,087.5
5.250% Senior unsecured notes due 2042 1,200 (18.6) (6.2) 1,175.2
5.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2045  1,500 (16.1) (8.5) 1,475.4
4.500% Minera Mexico Senior unsecured notes due
2050  1,000 (12.5) (9.6) 977.9
Total $ 6,651.2 $ (67.6)$ (39.4) 6,544.2
Less, current portion  —
Total long-term debt $ 6,544.2
The bonds, referred above as “Yankee bonds”, contain a covenant requiring Minera Mexico to maintain a ratio of
EBITDA to interest expense of not less than 2.5 to 1.0 as such terms are defined in the debt instrument. At December 31,
2021, Minera Mexico was in compliance with this covenant.
Between July 2005 and November 2012 the Company issued senior unsecured notes six times totaling $4.2 billion, as
listed above. Interest on the notes is paid semi-annually in arrears. The notes rank pari passu with each other and rank
pari passu in right of payment with all of the Company’s other existing and future unsecured and unsubordinated
indebtedness. On April 20, 2015, the Company issued $2.0 billion of fixed-rate senior unsecured notes. This debt was
Table of Contents
142issued in two tranches, $500 million due 2025 at an annual interest rate of 3.875% and $1.5 billion due 2045 at an annual
interest rate of 5.875%. These notes are general unsecured obligations of the Company and rank equally with all of its
existing and future unsecured and unsubordinated debt. Net proceeds are being used for general corporate purposes,
including the financing of the Company´s capital investment program. The notes were issued with an underwriters’
discount of $20.2 million. Additionally, issuance costs of $11.8 million associated with these notes were paid and
deferred. The unamortized balance of the discount and the costs are presented net of the carrying value of the debt issued
and are amortized as interest expense over the life of the loan.
The indentures relating to the notes contain certain restrictive covenants, including limitations on liens, limitations on
sale and leaseback transactions, rights of the holders of the notes upon the occurrence of a change of control triggering
event, limitations on subsidiary indebtedness and limitations on consolidations, mergers, sales or conveyances. Certain
of these covenants cease to be applicable before the notes mature if the Company obtains an investment grade rating.
The Company obtained investment grade rating in 2005. The Company has registered these notes under the Securities
Act of 1933, as amended. The Company may issue additional debt from time to time pursuant to certain of the
indentures.
If the Company experiences a “Change of Control Triggering Event”, the Company must offer to repurchase the notes at
a purchase price equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any. A Change of
Control Trigger Event means a Change of Control (as defined) and a rating decline (as defined), that is, if the rating of
the notes, by at least one of the rating agencies shall be decreased by one or more gradations.
At December 31, 2021, the Company was in compliance with the covenants of the notes.
On September 26, 2019, SCC’s subsidiary Minera Mexico S.A. de C.V. issued $1.0 billion of fixed-rate senior notes
with a discount of $12.7 million. Additionally, issuance costs of $9.8 million associated with these notes were paid and
deferred. The unamortized balance of the discount and the costs are presented net of the carrying value of the debt issued
and are amortized as interest expense over the life of the loan. This debt was issued in one tranche, due in 2050 at an
annual interest rate of 4.5%. Interest on the notes is paid semi-annually in arrears. The Company intends to use the net
proceeds from this offering (i) to finance Minera Mexico expansion program, including the Buenavista Zinc, Pilares and
El Pilar projects, (ii) for other capital expenditures and (iii) for general corporate purposes.
The notes constitute general unsecured obligations of Minera Mexico. The notes were issued in an unregistered offering
pursuant to Rule 144A and Regulation S under the Securities Act of 1933. The Company capitalized the costs associated
with the issuance of this facility, which are included as part of the amortized cost of the long-term debt in the
consolidated balance sheet.
In connection with the transaction, on September 26, 2019, Minera Mexico entered into an indenture with Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association, as trustee, which provided for the issuance, and set forth the terms of the notes described
above. The indenture contains covenants that limit Minera Mexico's ability to, among other things, incur certain liens
securing indebtedness, engage in certain sale and leaseback transactions, and enter into certain consolidations, mergers,
conveyances, transfers or leases of all or substantially all of Minera Mexico's assets.
Aggregate maturities of the outstanding borrowings at December 31, 2021, are as follows:
    Principal
Years Due(*)
(in millions)
2022  $ 300.0
2023 —
2024  —
2025  500.0
2026 —
Thereafter  5,851.2
Total $ 6,651.2
(*) Total debt maturities do not include the debt discount valuation account of $ 103.6  million.
Table of Contents
143NOTE 12—BENEFIT PLANS:
Post retirement defined benefit plans and defined contribution plan
The Company has two noncontributory defined benefit pension plans covering former salaried employees in the United
States and certain former expatriate employees in Peru (the “Expatriate Plan”). Effective October 31, 2000, the Board of
Directors amended the qualified pension plan to suspend the accrual of benefits. In addition, the Company’s Mexican
subsidiaries have a defined contribution pension plan for salaried employees and a non-contributory defined benefit
pension plan for union employees (the “Mexican Plan”).
The components of net periodic benefit costs calculated in accordance with ASC 715 “Compensation retirement
benefits,” using December 31 as a measurement date, consist of the following:
(in millions)     2021     2020     2019
Service cost $ 1.4$ 1.4$ 1.1
Interest cost  1.5 1.7 1.8
Expected return on plan assets  (3.3) (2.9) (3.5)
Amortization of net actuarial loss (0.1) 0.1 —
Amortization of prior service cost / (credit)  0.2 0.2 0.2
Settlement / Curtailment — (0.4) —
Amortization of net loss/(gain)  0.3 0.2 0.3
Net periodic benefit cost $ — $ 0.3$ (0.1)
Table of Contents
144The change in benefit obligation and plan assets and a reconciliation of funded status are as follows:
As of December 31, 
(in millions)     2021    2020
Change in benefit obligation:
Projected benefit obligation at beginning of year $29.9$33.7
Service cost  1.4 1.4
Interest cost  1.5 1.7
Benefits paid  (2.2) (1.9)
Actuarial (gain)/loss  6.7 (4.2)
Actuarial gain assumption changes  (0.4) 0.8
Inflation adjustment  (0.6) (1.6)
Projected benefit obligation at end of year $36.3$29.9
Change in plan assets:
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $54.4$51.6
Actual return on plan assets  4.3 6.5
Employer contributions  (0.6) (0.6)
Benefits paid  (0.8) (0.9)
Currency exchange rate adjustment  (1.3) (2.2)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year $56.0$54.4
Funded status at end of year: $19.7$24.5
ASC-715 amounts recognized in statement of financial position consists
of:
Non-current assets $19.7$24.5
Total $19.7$24.5
ASC-715 amounts recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income
(net of income taxes of $(4.2) million and $(2.3) million in 2021 and 2020,
respectively) consists of:
Net loss (gain) $ 6.2$ 3.0
Prior service cost  1.0 1.2
Total $ 7.2$ 4.2
The following table summarizes the changes in accumulated other comprehensive income for the years ended
December 31, related to the defined benefit pension plan, net of income tax:
(in millions)     2021     2020
Reconciliation of accumulated other comprehensive income:
Accumulated other comprehensive income at beginning of plan year $ 4.2$ 9.0
Net loss/(gain) amortized during the year  3.3 (4.1)
Net loss/(gain) occurring during the year  (0.2) (0.3)
Prior service cost (credit) — —
Currency exchange rate adjustment  (0.1) (0.4)
Net adjustment to accumulated other comprehensive income (net of
income taxes of $(1.9) million and $3.1 million in 2021 and 2020,  
respectively)  3.0 (4.8)
Accumulated other comprehensive income at end of plan year $ 7.2$ 4.2
Table of Contents
145The following table summarizes the amounts in accumulated other comprehensive income amortized and recognized as
a component of net periodic benefit cost in 2021 and 2020, net of income tax:
(in millions)     2021    2020
Net loss / (gain) $ 3.3$(4.1)
Amortization of net (loss) gain  (0.2) (0.3)
Amortization of prior services cost (credit) — —
Total amortization expenses $ 3.1$(4.4)
The assumptions used to determine the pension obligations are:
Expatriate Plan     2021    2020    2019 
Discount rate  2.40%  1.90%  2.85%
Expected long-term rate of return on plan asset  3.00%  3.50%  4.00%
Rate of increase in future compensation level  N/A N/A N/A
Mexican Plan(*)     2021    2020    2019 
Discount rate  8.02%  7.43%  7.15%
Expected long-term rate of return on plan asset  8.02%  7.43%  7.15%
Rate of increase in future compensation level  4.50%  4.50%  4.50%
(*) These rates are based on Mexican pesos as pension obligations are denominated in this currency .
The scheduled maturities of the benefits expected to be paid in each of the next five years, and thereafter, are as follows:
    Expected
Years Benefit Payments
(in millions)
2022 $ 4.0
2023  2.0
2024  2.3
2025  2.2
2026  2.5
2027 to 2031  17.4
Total $ 30.4
Expatriate Plan
The Company’s funding policy is to contribute amounts to the qualified plan sufficient to meet the minimum funding
requirements set forth in the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 plus such additional amounts as the
Company may determine to be appropriate.
Plan assets are invested in a group annuity contract with Metropolitan Life Insurance Company (“MetLife”). The
Contract invests in the MetLife General Account Payment Fund (the "General Account") and the MetLife Broad Market
Core Bond Fund (the “Bond Fund”) managed by BlackRock, Inc.
The General Account is broadly diversified across asset classes and backed by the total capital of MetLife.
The Bond Fund seeks to outperform the Bloomberg Barclays ® U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, net of fees, over a full
market cycle. The Bond Fund invests in publicly traded, investment grade securities. These may include corporate
securities, mortgage securities, treasuries and cash, agency securities, commercial mortgage backed securities and other
investment vehicles adhering to the fund’s investment objectives. These investments are classified as Level 1 because
they are valued using quoted prices of the same securities as they consist of instruments which are publicly traded.
Table of Contents
146Plan assets are invested with the objective of maximizing returns with an acceptable level of risk and maintaining
adequate liquidity to fund expected benefit payments. The Company's policy for determining asset mix-targets to meet
investment objectives includes periodic consultation with recognized third-party investment consultants.
The expected long-term rate of return on plan assets is reviewed annually, taking into consideration asset allocations,
historical returns and the current economic environment. Based on these factors the Company expects its assets will earn
an average of 3.00% per annum assuming its long-term mix will be consistent with its current mix.
Mexican Plan
Minera Mexico’s policy for determining asset mix targets includes periodic consultation with recognized third-party
investment consultants. The expected long-term rate of return on plan assets is updated periodically, taking into
consideration assets allocations, historical returns and the current economic environment. The fair value of plan assets is
impacted by general market conditions. If actual returns on plan assets vary from the expected returns, actual results
could differ.
The plan assets are managed by three financial institutions, Scotiabank Inverlat S.A., Banco Santander and GBM Grupo
Bursatil Mexicano, S.A. 73% of the funds are invested in Mexican government securities, including treasury certificates
and development bonds of the Mexican government. The remaining 27% is invested in common shares of Grupo
Mexico. The plan assets are invested without restriction in active markets that are accessible when required and are
therefore considered as level 1, in accordance with ASC 820 “Fair Value Measurement.”
These plans accounted for approximately 100% of benefit obligations. The following table represents the asset mix of
the investment portfolio as of December 31:
    2021    2020 
Asset category:
Treasury bills  73%  78%
Equity securities  27%  22%
 100%  100%
The amount of contributions that the Company expects to pay to the plan during 2022 is $3.2 million.
Post-retirement Health Care Plan:
United States: The Company adopted a post-retirement health care plan for retired salaried employees eligible for
Medicare in 1996. The Company manages the plan and is currently providing health benefits to retirees. The plan is
accounted for in accordance with ASC 715 “Compensation retirement benefits.” As of December 31, 2021, because
there has been a significant reduction in participants and in the amount of liability, the Company considered that this
plan was not material enough to run a valuation.
In Mexico, health services are provided by the Mexican Social Security Institute.
The components of net period benefit costs for the three years ended December 31, 2021 are as follows:
(in millions)     2021     2020     2019
Interest cost $ 1.6$ 1.3$ 0.9
Amortization of net loss (gain)  0.2 —  —
Amortization of prior service cost/ (credit)  —  —  (0.2)
Net periodic benefit cost $ 1.8$ 1.3$ 0.7
Table of Contents
147The change in benefit obligation and a reconciliation of funded status are as follows:
As of December 31, 
(in millions)     2021    2020
Change in benefit obligation:
Projected benefit obligation at beginning of year $23.8$20.6
Interest cost  1.6 1.3
Benefits paid  (1.4) (1.5)
Actuarial (gain)/loss  (2.0) 4.5
Inflation adjustment  (0.6) (1.1)
Projected benefit obligation at end of year $21.4$23.8
Change in plan assets:
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $ — $ —
Employer contributions  —  0.1
Benefits paid  —  (0.1)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year $ — $ —
Funded status at end of year: $21.4$23.8
ASC-715 amounts recognized in statement of financial position consists of:
Current liabilities $ — $ —
Non-current liabilities  (21.4) (23.8)
Total $(21.4)$(23.8)
ASC-715 amounts recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income
consists of:
Net loss (gain) $ 3.3$4.6
Total (net of income taxes of $(1.2) million and $(1.9) million in 2021
and 2020, respectively) $ 3.3$4.6
The following table summarizes the changes in accumulated other comprehensive income for the years ended
December 31, related to the post-retirement health care plan, net of income tax:
As of December 31, 
(in millions)     2021    2020
Reconciliation of accumulated other comprehensive income:
Accumulated other comprehensive income at beginning of plan year $ 4.6$ 1.5
Net loss/(gain) occurring during the year  (1.1) 3.2
Net loss/(gain) amortized during the year  (0.1) —
Currency exchange rate adjustment  (0.1) (0.1)
Net adjustment to accumulated other comprehensive income (net of
income taxes of $(1.2) million and $(1.2) million in 2021 and 2020,
respectively)  (1.3) 3.1
Accumulated other comprehensive income at end of plan year $ 3.3$ 4.6
The following table summarizes the amounts in accumulated other comprehensive income amortized and recognized as
a component of net periodic benefit cost in 2021 and 2020, net of income tax:
As of December 31, 
(in millions)     2021    2020
Net loss / (gain) $(1.1)$ 3.2
Amortization of net (loss) gain  (0.1) —
Total amortization expenses $(1.2)$ 3.2
Table of Contents
148The discount rates used in the calculation of other post-retirement benefits and cost as of December 31 were:
    2021    2020    2019 
Expatriate health plan
Discount rate  2.40%  1.90%  2.85%
Mexican health plan
Weighted average discount rate  8.02%  7.43%  7.15%
The benefits expected to be paid in each of the next five years, and thereafter, are as follows:
    Expected
Year Benefit Payments
(in millions)
2022 $ 1.4
2023 1.4
2024  1.5
2025  1.5
2026  1.5
2027 to 2031  8.2
Total $ 15.5
Mexican Health Plan
For measurement purposes, a 4.5% annual rate of increase in the per capita cost of covered health care benefits was
assumed for 2021 and remains at that level thereafter.
An increase in other benefit cost trend rates have a significant effect on the amount of the reported obligations, as well as
component cost of the other benefit plan. One percentage-point change in assumed other benefits cost trend rates would
have the following effects:
One Percentage
Point
(in millions)     Increase    Decrease
Effect on total service and interest cost components $1.6$1.6
Effect on the post-retirement benefit obligation $19.9$22.1
NOTE 13—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES:
Environmental matters:
The Company has instituted extensive environmental conservation programs at its mining facilities in Peru and Mexico.
The Company’s environmental programs include, among others, water recovery systems to conserve water and minimize
the impact on nearby streams, reforestation programs to stabilize the surface of the tailings dams and the implementation
of scrubbing technology in the mines to reduce dust emissions.
Environmental capital investments in years 2021, 2020 and 2019, were as follows (in millions):
    2021     2020     2019
Peruvian operations (*) $ 6.4$ (3.3)$18.6
Mexican operations  62.3 41.1 64.3
$ 68.7$ 37.8$82.9
(*) The activity in 2020 includes prepayment settlements classified to expenses.
Table of Contents
149Peruvian operations: The Company’s operations are subject to applicable Peruvian environmental laws and regulations.
The Peruvian government, through the Ministry of Environment (“MINAM”) conducts annual audits of the Company’s
Peruvian mining and metallurgical operations. Through these environmental audits, matters related to environmental
obligation, compliance with legal requirements, atmospheric emissions, effluent monitoring and waste management are
reviewed. The Company believes that it is in material compliance with applicable Peruvian environmental laws and
regulations. Peruvian law requires that companies in the mining industry provide assurances for future mine closure and
remediation. In accordance with the requirements of this law, the Company’s closure plans were approved by MINEM.
See Note 10 “Asset retirement obligation,” for further discussion of this matter.
Air Quality Standards (“AQS”): In June 2017, MINAM enacted a supreme decree which defines new AQS for daily
sulfur dioxide in the air. As of December 31, 2021, the Company maintains a lower daily average level of µg/m3 of SO2,
than those required by the new AQS.
Soil Environmental Quality Standards (“SQS”): In 2013, the Peruvian government enacted Soil Quality Standards. In
accordance with the regulatory requirements of the law, the Company prepared Soil Descontamination Plans (“SDP”) for
environmentally impacted sites in each of its operation units (Toquepala, Cuajone and Ilo) with the assistance of
consulting companies. The cost of these SDPs are not material, either individually or in aggregated form, for the
financial statements of the Company.
Climate change: On April 17, 2018, the Peruvian government enacted Law N. 30754, establishing a Climate Change
Framework. This law establishes that promoting public and private investments in climate change management is of
national interest. The law proposes creating an institutional framework to address climate change in Peru, and outlines
new measures, particularly with respect to climate change mitigation. It includes, for example, provisions dealing with:
increasing carbon capture and use of carbon sinks; afforestation and reforestation practices; land use changes; and
sustainable systems of transportation, solid waste management, and energy systems. This is the first Latin American
climate change framework law to incorporate obligations from the Paris Agreement. Regulations to this law were
enacted by Supreme Decree 013-2019 published on December 31, 2019 and are applicable to all Peruvian institutions
and agencies. It is expected that further Peruvian regulations will be applicable to non-governmental entities. Despite
this, no carbon pricing mechanism is currently applicable to the Company’s operations in Peru.
Mexican operations: The Company’s operations are subject to applicable Mexican federal, state and municipal
environmental laws, to Mexican official standards, and to regulations for the protection of the environment, including
regulations relating to water supply, water quality, air quality, noise levels and hazardous and solid waste.
The principal legislation applicable to the Company’s Mexican operations is the Federal General Law of Ecological
Balance and Environmental Protection (the “General Law”), which is enforced by the Federal Bureau of Environmental
Protection (“PROFEPA”). PROFEPA monitors compliance with environmental legislation and enforces Mexican
environmental laws, regulations and official standards. It may also initiate administrative proceedings against companies
that violate environmental laws, which in the most extreme cases may result in the temporary or permanent shutdown of
non-complying facilities, the revocation of operating licenses and/or other sanctions or fines.
In 2011, the General Law was amended to provide an individual or entity the ability to contest administrative acts,
including environmental authorizations, permits or concessions granted, without the need to demonstrate the actual
existence of harm to the environment as long as it can be argued that the harm may be caused. In addition, in 2011,
amendments to the Civil Federal Procedures Code (“CFPC”) were enacted, which established three categories of
collective actions under which a group of 30 or more individuals can be considered sufficient to prove a “legitimate
interest” to file civil actions for injuries derived from alleged violations of environmental, consumer protection, financial
services and economic competition laws and to seek restitution or economic compensation for the alleged injuries or the
suspension of the activities which allegedly generated the injuries in question. The amendments to the CFPC may result
in more litigation, with plaintiffs seeking remedies, including suspension of the activities alleged to cause harm.
In 2013, the Environmental Liability Federal Law was enacted. The law establishes general guidelines for actions to be
considered to likely cause environmental harm. If a possible determination regarding harm occurs, environmental clean-
up and remedial actions sufficient to restore environment to a pre-existing condition should be taken. Under this law, if
Table of Contents
150restoration is not possible, compensation measures should be provided. Criminal penalties and monetary fines can be
imposed under this law.
On February 2019, the Mexican Supreme Court confirmed the constitutionality of an ecological tax on extractive
activities developed in the state of Zacatecas, which taxes the environmental remediation actions; emissions of certain
gases to the atmosphere; emissions of pollutant substances to the soil or water; and waste storage within the state
territory. The Company has determined that this new environmental regulation will have no impact on its financial
position.
Guaymas sulfuric acid spill:
On July 9, 2019, there was an incident at the Company´s Marine Terminal in Guaymas, Sonora, that caused the
discharge of approximately three cubic meters of sulfuric acid into the sea in the industrial port area.
The Guaymas bay has an estimated water volume of 340 million cubic meters. The spill, upon entering in contact with
the sea’s alkaline conditions, led to quick dilution of the discharge and the sulfuric acid was naturally and immediately
neutralized. As a result, the discharge was considered harmless; the report from the Ministry of Navy found that neither
the flora nor fauna of the port area were affected.
On July 10, 2019, PROFEPA made a first inspection of the area, concluding that the Company executed all the
appropriate procedures in order to contain the discharge, and no reference was made to the existence of negative impacts
on the environment resulting from the incident.
On Friday, July 19, 2019, PROFEPA revisited the facilities to carry out a second inspection, declaring a partial
temporary shutdown that affected only the storage process and transportation of sulfuric acid at the terminal, arguing the
absence of an authorization of environmental impact. It is important to note that these facilities have been in operation
since 1979, prior to the 1988 Mexican General Law of Ecological Balance and the Protection of the Environment.
Companies that were operating before the aforementioned law are exempt from the permit requirement. In addition, in
2009, PROFEPA awarded a certification of “Clean Industry and Environmental Quality” to the facility which was
subsequently renewed four times (for a two-year period each time).
The Company filed a lawsuit against the closure, which was dismissed by a ruling on August 25, 2021. This ruling has
been challenged through a motion to reopen the case, which was submitted on September 28, 2021. On January 4, 2022,
the challenge was resolved. The authority imposed two fines and ruled that the temporary closure would remain in place
until the environmental impact statement is obtained. The Company intends to appeal this ruling.
The Company is not aware of the reasons or causes for this partial and temporary closure, but will continue working
with the environmental authorities to provide certainty that the operation is in strict compliance with environmental
regulations. The Company expects the environmental authorities to suspend the partial temporary shutdown, once they
resolve their concerns. Currently, the Company does not expect any impact on its operations. As of December 31, 2021,
the matter is pending resolution.
Climate change:
Several taxes are applicable to the Company’s mining operations in Mexico, including federal and state fossil fuel taxes,
and the requirements associated with Mexico’s emission trading scheme. These taxes range from US$2.5/tCO2 to
US$12.5/tCO2, approximately. These refer to regional taxes applicable in the States of Baja California and Zacatecas, as
well as a federal tax linked to Mexico’s carbon market system which currently is in its pilot phase. The requirements
associated with this scheme are currently applicable only to two business units, the metallurgic and lime plants located in
Sonora, which generate annual GHG emissions levels above the threshold of 100,000 tCO2e per year contemplated by
the scheme. These business units are required to report and verify their emissions once a year with average costs of less
than $6,000 per unit. Units that emit more than 25,000 tonnes CO2 equivalent per year (all our Mexican units) are
required to report their emissions to the National Emissions Registry (RENE) every year and to verify the reported
emissions every three years. As a result, the Company’s total annual compliance costs related to climate change
Table of Contents
151regulations in Mexico were less than $30,000 for each of the three years ended December 31, 2021. This amount was not
material to the Company.
The Company has also been participating to Mexico’s “GHG Program” since its inception in 2005, which is a voluntary
initiative for the registry and reporting of greenhouse gases emissions.
The Company believes that all of its facilities in Peru and Mexico are in material compliance with applicable
environmental, mining and other applicable laws and regulations. The Company also believes that continued compliance
with environmental laws of Mexico and Peru will have no material adverse effects on the Company’s business,
properties, or operating results.
Litigation matters:
Peruvian operations
The Tia Maria Mining Project
There are five lawsuits filed against the Peruvian Branch of the Company related to the Tia Maria project. The lawsuits
seek (i) to declare null and void the resolution that approved the Environmental Impact Assessment of the project; (ii)
the cancellation of the project and the withdrawal of mining activities in the area; (iii) to declare null and void the
mining concession application for the Tia Maria project; and (iv) to declare null and void the resolution that approved
the construction license. The lawsuits were filed by Messrs. Jorge Isaac del Carpio Lazo (filed May 22, 2015), Ernesto
Mendoza Padilla (filed May 26, 2015), Juan Alberto Guillen Lopez (filed June 18, 2015), Junta de Usuarios del Valle del
Tambo (filed April 30, 2015), and Gobierno Regional de Arequipa (filed December 16, 2019).
The del Carpio Lazo case was rejected by the court of first instance on November 14, 2016. The plaintiff filed an appeal
before the Superior Court on January 3, 2017. On January 9, 2018, the lawyers of both parties presented their respective
positions before the Appellate Court. On March 8, 2018, the Appellate Court issued its final decision, which upheld the
first instance ruling. On April 27, 2018, the plaintiff filed an extraordinary appeal before the Supreme Court. As of
December 31, 2021, the case remains pending resolution.
The Mendoza Padilla case was initially rejected by the lower court on July 8, 2015. This ruling was confirmed by the
Superior Court on June 14, 2016. On July 12, 2016, the case was appealed before the Constitutional Court. On
November 20, 2018, the Constitutional Court reversed the previous decisions and remanded the case to the lower court
for further action. In the third quarter of 2020, the Company was notified that the complaint had been reinstated. The
Company answered the complaint on September 15, 2020. On December 2, 2020, the lower court issued a resolution,
considering the complaint answered. On September 27, 2021, the Court ordered to temporarily archive the case. As of
December 31, 2021, the case remains pending resolution.
The Guillen Lopez case is currently before the lower court. On July 19, 2019, the oral arguments took place. On January
7, 2020, the Judge decided to suspend the proceeding until the del Carpio Lazo case is concluded. Therefore, as of
December 31, 2021, the case remains pending resolution.
The Junta de Usuarios del Valle del Tambo case is currently before the lower court. On May 2016, the Company was
included in the process, after the Ministry of Energy and Mines filed a civil complaint. On March 6, 2019, the Company
was formally notified of the lawsuit and answered the complaint on March 20, 2019. On July 8, 2019, the Company
requested the suspension of the proceeding until the del Carpio Lazio case is concluded. As of December 31, 2021, the
case remains pending resolution.
The Gobierno Regional de Arequipa case is currently before the lower court and the Company answered the complaint
on September 15, 2020. On February 8, 2021, the Judge decided to suspend the proceeding until the del Carpio Lazo
case is concluded. As of December 31, 2021, the case remains pending resolution.
Table of Contents
152The Company asserts that these lawsuits are without merit and is vigorously defending against them. The potential
contingency amount for these cases cannot be reasonably estimated by management at this time.
Special Regional Pasto Grande Project (“Pasto Grande Project”)
In 2012, the Pasto Grande Project, an entity of the Regional Government of Moquegua, filed a lawsuit against SCC’s
Peruvian Branch alleging property rights over a certain area used by the Peruvian Branch and seeking the demolition of
the tailings dam where SCC’s Peruvian Branch has deposited its tailings from the Toquepala and Cuajone operations
since 1995. The Peruvian Branch has had title to use the area in question since 1960 and has, since 1995, constructed and
operated the tailings dams with proper governmental authorization. Upon a motion filed by the Peruvian Branch, the
lower court has included MINEM as a defendant in this lawsuit. MINEM has answered the complaint and denied the
validity of the claim. As of December 31, 2021, the case was pending resolution without further developments. SCC’s
Peruvian Branch asserts that the lawsuit is without merit and is vigorously defending against it. The amount of this
contingency cannot be reasonably estimated by management at this time.
Mexican operations
The Accidental Spill at Buenavista Mine of 2014
In relation to the 2014 accidental spill of copper sulfate solution that occurred at a leaching pond in the Buenavista mine,
the following legal procedures are pending against the Company:
On August 19, 2014, PROFEPA, as part of the administrative proceeding initiated after the spill, announced the filing of
a criminal complaint against Buenavista del Cobre S.A. de C.V. (“BVC”), a subsidiary of the Company, in order to
determine those responsible for environmental damages. During the second quarter of 2018, the criminal complaint was
dismissed. This decision was appealed and was pending resolution as of December 31, 2021.
Through the first half of 2015, six collective action lawsuits were filed in federal courts in Mexico City and Sonora
against two subsidiaries of the Company seeking economic compensation, clean up and remedial activities in order to
restore the environment to its pre-existing conditions. Three of the collective action lawsuits have been dismissed by the
court. As of December 31, 2021, three lawsuits continue in process: two were filed by Acciones Colectivas de Sinaloa,
A.C. and one, by Defensa Colectiva, A.C.; requesting precautionary measures about construction of facilities for
monitoring public health services and prohibiting the closure of the Rio Sonora Trust.
Similarly, during 2015, eight civil action lawsuits were filed against BVC in the state courts of Sonora seeking damages
for alleged injuries and for moral damages as a consequence of the spill. The plaintiffs in the state court lawsuits are:
Jose Vicente Arriola Nunez et al; Santana Ruiz Molina et al; Andres Nogales Romero et al; Teodoro Javier Robles et al;
Gildardo Vasquez Carvajal et al; Rafael Noriega Souffle et al; Grupo Banamichi Unido de Sonora El Dorado, S.C. de
R.L. de C.V; and Marcelino Mercado Cruz. In 2016, three additional civil action lawsuits, claiming similar damages,
were filed by Juan Melquicedec Lebaron; Blanca Lidia Valenzuela Rivera et al and Ramona Franco Quijada et al. In
2017, BVC was served with thirty-three additional civil action lawsuits, claiming similar damages. The lawsuits were
filed by Francisco Javier Molina Peralta et al; Anacleto Cohen Machini et al; Francisco Rafael Alvarez Ruiz et al; Jose
Alberto Martinez Bracamonte et al; Gloria del Carmen Ramirez Duarte et al; Flor Margarita Sabori et al; Blanca Esthela
Ruiz Toledo et al; Julio Alfonso Corral Dominguez et al; Maria Eduwiges Bracamonte Villa et al; Francisca Marquez
Dominguez et al; Jose Juan Romo Bravo et al; Jose Alfredo Garcia Leyva et al; Gloria Irma Dominguez Perez et al;
Maria del Refugio Romero et al; Miguel Rivas Medina et al; Yolanda Valenzuela Garrobo et al; Maria Elena Garcia
Leyva et al; Manuel Alfonso Ortiz Valenzuela et al; Francisco Alberto Arvayo Romero et al; Maria del Carmen
Villanueva Lopez et al; Manuel Martin Garcia Salazar; Miguel Garcia Arguelles et al; Dora Elena Rodriguez Ochoa et
al; Honora Eduwiges Ortiz Rodriguez et al; Francisco Jose Martinez Lopez et al; Maria Eduwiges Lopez Bustamante;
Rodolfo Barron Villa et al, Jose Carlos Martinez Fernandez et al, Maria de los Angeles Fabela et al; Rafaela Edith Haro
et al; Luz Mercedes Cruz et al; Juan Pedro Montaño et al; and Juana Irma Alday Villa. In the first quarter of 2018, BVC
was served with another civil action lawsuit, claiming similar damages. The lawsuit was filed by Alma Angelina Del Cid
Rivera et al. In the last quarter of 2018, BVC was served with other three civil action lawsuits, claiming similar
damages. These lawsuits were filed by Los Corrales de la Estancia, S.C. de R.L.; Jose Antonio Navarro; Jesus Maria
Table of Contents
153Peña Molina, et al; these actions were dismissed by the court, because they have expired. As of December 31, 2021,
forty-five cases remain pending resolution.
In 2015, four constitutional lawsuits (juicios de amparo) were filed before Federal Courts against various authorities and
against a subsidiary of the Company, arguing; (i) the alleged lack of a waste management program approved by
SEMARNAT; (ii) the alleged lack of a remediation plan approved by SEMARNAT with regard to the August 2014 spill;
(iii) the alleged lack of community approval regarding the environmental impact authorizations granted by SEMARNAT
to one subsidiary of the Company; and (iv) the alleged inactivity of the authorities with regard of the spill in August
2014. The plaintiffs of these lawsuits are: Francisca Garcia Enriquez, et al filed two lawsuits, Francisco Ramon Miranda,
et al and Jesus David Lopez Peralta et al. In the third quarter of 2016, four additional constitutional lawsuits, claiming
similar damages were filed by Mario Alberto Salcido et al; Maria Elena Heredia Bustamante et al; Martin Eligio Ortiz
Gamez et al; and Maria de los Angeles Enriquez Bacame et al. In the third quarter of 2017, BVC was served with
another constitutional lawsuit filed by Francisca García Enriquez et al. In 2018, BVC was served with two additional
constitutional lawsuits that were filed against SEMARNAT by Norberto Bustamante et al. Regarding the constitutional
lawsuit filed by Maria Elena Heredia Bustamante et al; in which it was claimed the lack of community approval
regarding the authorization granted by SEMARNAT to build the new BVC tailings dam, on September 5, 2018, the
Supreme Court of Justice issued a resolution establishing that such authorization was granted to BVC in compliance
with the applicable legislation. However, SEMARNAT must carry out a public meeting to inform the community of the
technical aspects required to build the dam, potential impacts and prevention measures, with no material effects to
BVC’s operations. SEMARNAT has carried out the consultation ordered by the Supreme Court. As a result, has
informed the corresponding Judge about its compliance with the resolution, in which BVC was imposed additional
measures of environmental impact prevention, such as: (i) the building of at least three monitoring wells downstream
from the curtain of the contingency dam in a period of six months; (ii) monitoring of the groundwater level and water
quality every six months; (iii) carrying out rain collection work in order to restore water to the Sonora River basin, for
which six months are granted to present the execution program; (iv) determine the location of wildlife conservation and
protection areas and define the need to establish biological corridors; (v) obtain photographic or videographic evidence
every six months; (vi) submitting to SEMARNAT two years before the closure and abandonment of the site, or earlier if
necessary, the closure program that includes the cleaning and restoration of the soil including Mexican regulation NOM-
141; (vii) include the measures in the Environmental Monitoring Program according to the environmental components
impacted; and (viii) hiring an external environmental consultant to validate compliance with the current and new
conditions that are imposed. The foregoing does not impact BVC’s operations. Additionally, the lawsuits filed by Maria
de los Angeles Enriquez Bacame and Norberto Bustamante have been dismissed and closed without prejudice to the
Company. As of December 31, 2021, the remaining cases were still pending resolution.
It is currently not possible to determine the extent of the damages sought in these state and federal lawsuits but the
Company believes that these lawsuits are without merit. Accordingly, the Company is vigorously defending against
them. Nevertheless, the Company believes that none of the legal proceedings resulting from the spill, individually or in
the aggregate, would have a material effect on its financial position or results of operations.
Corporate operations
Carla Lacey, on behalf of herself and all other similarly situated stockholders of Southern Copper Corporation, and
derivatively on behalf of Southern Copper Corporation
In April 2019, a derivative lawsuit was filed against the Company, certain current and former Directors, and Grupo
Mexico in the Delaware Court of Chancery relating to certain construction contracts, contracts for the purchase and sale
of minerals, and transportation contracts entered into between the Company’s subsidiaries and subsidiaries of Grupo
Mexico.
In October 2019, the plaintiff amended the complaint to include claims related to certain administrative services
contracts between the Company’s subsidiaries and Grupo Mexico. The amended complaint alleges, among other things,
that the construction contracts, the mineral contracts, the transportation contracts, and the administrative services
contracts were unfair as a result of breaches of fiduciary duties and the Company’s charter. The amended complaint also
added Americas Mining Corporation (“AMC”) as a defendant, alleging that AMC breached its fiduciary duties as a
Table of Contents
154controlling stockholder of the Company. The amended complaint seeks, among other things, unspecified monetary
damages. In January 2020, the Company, the current and former Directors, and Grupo Mexico responded to the
complaint by filing motions to dismiss. The Plaintiff filed a brief in response to the motions on March 13, 2020. On July
16, 2020, the Court denied the motions to dismiss the breach of fiduciary duty claims against the Directors. On October
6, 2020, the Court dismissed the Plaintiff’s claims against Grupo Mexico for lack of personal jurisdiction. On February
11, 2021, the Court granted the Directors’ motion to dismiss plaintiff’s breach of contract claim. The Court also granted
AMC’s motion to dismiss all claims against AMC other than those related to the mineral contracts.
On July 12, 2021, the parties reached an agreement-in-principle to settle the lawsuit, subject to Court approval. On
September 29, 2021, the parties filed a Stipulation and Agreement of Compromise, Settlement and Release with the
Court. On February 1, 2022, the Judge approved the settlement and awarded certain fees to the plaintiff’s attorneys. The
Judge’s order for this decision was registered on February 2, 2022. Under applicable law, there was a 30-day period for
parties to appeal the Judge's order. This period expired on March 4, 2022, therefore the Judge's order is considered final.
Labor matters:
Peruvian operations: 73% of the Company's 4,675 Peruvian employees were unionized at December 31, 2021. Currently,
there are six separate unions, none of which represents the majority of workers, as defined by current Peruvian labor
legislation.
During 2021, the Company decided to hold talks with the six unions to sign collective agreements prior to their effective
dates. As a result, between June and December 2021, the Company signed collective agreements with the six unions
with durations between three to six years. All of them granted annual salary increases of 5%. Additionally, each 
agreement granted, among other things, a signing bonus of between S/ 45,000 (approximately $ 11,256) and S/ 90,000 
(approximately $ 22,511), depending on the duration of the agreement. A long-term agreement bonus of S/ 10,000 
(approximately $ 2,501) was granted to the union that signed a six-year extension of the collective bargaining 
agreement. All these concepts have been recorded as labor expense.
As of December 31, 2021, the Company has no pending negotiations with Peruvian unions.
Mexican operations: In recent years, the Mexican operations have experienced a positive improvement in their labor
environment, as workers opted to change their affiliation from the Sindicato Nacional de Trabajadores Mineros,
Metalurgicos y Similares de la Republica Mexicana (the “National Mining Union”) to other less politicized unions.
The workers of the San Martin mine were on strike since July 2007. On February 28, 2018, the striking workers of the 
San Martín mine of IMMSA held an election to vote on the union that would hold the collective bargaining agreement at 
the San Martín mine. The Federacion Nacional de Sindicatos Independientes (the National Federation of Independent 
Unions) won the vote by a majority. Nevertheless, the vote was challenged by the National Mining Union. On June 26, 
2018, the Federal Mediation and Arbitration Board issued a ruling recognizing the election results. Due to the agreement 
between workers and the Company to end the protracted strike, on August 22, 2018, the Federal Mediation and 
Arbitration Board authorized the restart of operations of the San Martín mine. Such authorization was challenged by the 
National Mining Union. On April 4, 2019, the Federal Mediation and Arbitration Board recognized, once again, the 
election results from February 28, 2018, by which the  National Federation of Independent Unions won by a majority. In 
the last quarter of 2019, a Federal Court issued a resolution that established that the Labor Court should analyze the list 
of workers with the right to vote in the union election. The Company and the National Federation of Independent Unions 
challenged such determination before the Supreme Court of Justice. Such challenges were dismissed by the Supreme 
Court. As a consequence, on September 6, 2021, the Federal Mediation and Arbitration Board issued a new resolution 
determining that, based on the documents submitted by the National Federation of Independent Unions and given the 
status of the strike until 2018, it was not possible to create a registry of workers holding a right to vote. Therefore, in 
case of a strike, any economic collective proceedings shall remain suspended. The Federal Mediation and Arbitration 
Board shall decide on the request of the majority of workers to end the strike, despite the opposition of the National 
Mining Union. The Company expects that the conflict will be solved in accordance with the legal framework set by 
labor authorities and that any actions taken will respect the workers’ will.
Table of Contents
155As of December 31, 2021, the Company had completed most of the rehabilitation plan to restore operations at the San
Martin mine, at a total expense of approximately $90.5 million; the mine has since reached full operating capacity.  
In the case of the Taxco mine, its workers have been on strike since July 2007. After several legal procedures, in August
2015, the Supreme Court decided to assert jurisdiction over the case and to rule on it directly. As of December 31, 2021,
the case remains pending resolution without further developments.
It is expected that operations at the Taxco mine will remain suspended until the labor issues are resolved. In view of the
lengthy strike, the Company has reviewed the carrying value of the Taxco mine to ascertain whether impairment exists.
The Company concluded that there is a non-material impairment of the assets located at this mine.
In 2020, a small group of workers at the Charcas mine claimed an additional workers’ participation payment and a minor
incident was reported. This claim lacked a legal basis because the Company had completely fulfilled said obligation with
the workers in question. Consequently, the Company took legal action and through conciliation and mediation with labor
authorities, the incident concluded with no further repercussions for the Company.
Other legal matters:
The Company is involved in various other legal proceedings incidental to its operations, but the Company does not
believe that decisions adverse to it in any such proceedings, individually or in the aggregate, would have a material
effect on its financial position or results of operations.
Other commitments:
Peruvian Operations
Tia Maria:
On August 1, 2014, the Company received the final approval of Tia Maria’s Environmental Impact Assessment (“EIA”).
On July 8, 2019, the Company received the construction permit for this 120,000 ton annual  SX-EW copper greenfield 
project with a total capital budget of $1,400 million. This permit was obtained after completing an exhaustive review
process, complying with all established regulatory requirements and addressing all observations raised.
On July 15, 2019, anti-mining groups staged a violent demonstration affecting economic as well as other activities in the
Islay province. These actions were followed by the filing of three complaints, sponsored by groups opposing the Tia
Maria project, with the Mining Council, which is the Peruvian administrative authority responsible for ruling on these
complaints. The Mining Council temporarily suspended the construction permit on August 8, 2019. On October 7, 2019,
as part of the process, the Mining Council conducted a hearing to hear the complaints and the Company’s position. On
October 30, 2019, the Mining Council of the Peruvian Ministry of Energy and Mines ratified the construction permit for
the Tia Maria project.
The Company has been working to promote the welfare of the Islay province population. As part of these efforts, the
Company has implemented social programs in education, healthcare and productive development to improve the quality-
of-life in the region. The Company also has promoted agricultural and livestock activities in the Tambo Valley and
supported growth in manufacturing, fishing and tourism in Islay.
During the construction and operation phase, the Company will make it a priority to hire local labor to fill the 9,000 jobs
(3,600 direct and 5,400 indirect) that the Company expects to generate during Tia Maria’s construction phase. When
operating, the Company expects Tia Maria to directly employ 600 workers and indirectly provide jobs for another 4,200.
Additionally, from day one of its operations, the Company will generate significant contributions to revenues in the
Arequipa region via royalties and taxes.
Tia Maria’s project budget is approximately $1.4 billion, of which $332.0 million had been invested through December
31, 2021 (Property net book value is $310.2 million). This project will use state-of-the-art SX-EW technology with the
Table of Contents
156highest international environmental standards. SX-EW facilities are the most environmentally friendly in the industry as
they do not require a smelting process and therefore, do not release any emissions into the atmosphere.
Michiquillay:
In June 2018, the Company signed a contract for the acquisition of the Michiquillay copper project in Cajamarca, Peru,
at a purchase price of $400 million. Michiquillay is a world class mining project with estimated mineralized material of
1,150 million tonnes and a copper grade of 0.63%. It is expected to produce 225,000 tonnes of copper per year (along
with by-products of molybdenum, gold and silver) for an initial mine life of more than 25 years.
On September 3, 2021, the Company signed a social agreement with the Michiquillay community. On October 1, 2021,
the Peruvian Ministry of Energy and Mines approved the semi-detailed environmental impact study for the project.
Additionally, on November 12, 2021, the Company signed a Social Agreement with the Encañada Community. These
events will allow the Company to initiate an in-depth exploration program in 2022.
The main commitments signed by the Company in the social agreements with the Michiquillay project communities are
related to providing support for agricultural and livestock activities, economic development of local initiatives, and
social programs in favor of education, water management, waste disposal, and healthcare for vulnerable groups.
The Company paid $12.5 million at the signing of the contract. In June 2021, the Company made an additional payment
of $12.5 million. The balance of $375.0 million will be paid if the Company decides to develop the project, which is not
a present obligation.
Corporate Social Responsibility:
The Company has a corporate social responsibility policy to maintain and promote the continuity of its mining
operations and obtain the best results. The main objective of this policy is to integrate the Company´s operations with
local communities in the areas of influence of its operations by creating permanent positive relationships to develop
optimum social conditions and promote sustainable development in the area. Accordingly, the Company has made the
following commitments:
Tacna Region: In connection with the Toquepala concentrator expansion, the Company has committed to fund various
social and infrastructure improvement projects in Toquepala's neighboring communities. The total amount committed for
these purposes is S/ 445.0 million (approximately $111.3 million). In relation to this commitment, the Company has
recently completed the construction of a school with an investment of S/17.2 million (approximately $4.3 million).
As the Toquepala expansion project has been completed, the Company considers that these commitments constitute
present obligations of the Company and consequently has recorded a liability of $29.3 million in its consolidated
financial statements as of December 31, 2021.
In addition, the Company has committed S/ 69.0 million (approximately $17.3 million) for the construction of a high-
performance school in the Tacna region under the “social investment for taxes” (obras por impuestos) program which
allows the Company to use these amounts as an advance payment of taxes.
Moquegua Region: In the Moquegua region, the Company participates in a “development roundtable” with local
municipal authorities and community representatives to discuss social needs and to determine the ways that the
Company can contribute to sustainable development in the region. Currently, the roundtable is discussing the creation of
a Moquegua Region Development Fund for which the Company has offered a contribution of S/ 1,000 million
(approximately $250.1 million). While final funding is not yet settled, the Company has committed to contribute S/
108.4 million (approximately $27.1 million) as an advance, which is being utilized to fund an educational project. In
addition, there is a commitment to finance the construction of a residual water treatment plant in Ilo for S/ 79.9 million
(approximately $20.0 million), to build three schools in Moquegua for S/ 15.9 million (approximately $4.0 million) and
to build tracks and sidewalks in Pacocha for S/6.4 million (approximately $1.6 million).
Table of Contents
157In addition, the Company has committed S/ 86.7 million (approximately $21.7 million) to build two infrastructure
projects in the Moquegua region under the “social investment for taxes” (obras por impuestos) program, which allows
the Company to use these amounts as an advance payment of taxes.
Power purchase agreements:
●Electroperu S.A.: In June 2014, the Company entered into a power purchase agreement for 120 megawatt (“MW”)
with the state power company Electroperu S.A., under which Electroperu S.A. began supplying energy for the
Peruvian operations for twenty years starting on April 17, 2017.
●Kallpa Generacion S.A. (“Kallpa”): In July 2014, the Company entered into a power purchase agreement for
120MW with Kallpa, an independent Israeli owned power company, under which Kallpa will supply energy for the
Peruvian operations for ten years starting on April 17, 2017 and ending on April 30, 2027. In May 2016, the
Company signed an additional power purchase agreement for a maximum of 80MW with Kallpa, under which
Kallpa began supplying energy for the Peruvian operations related to the Toquepala Expansion and other minor
projects starting on May 1, 2017 and ending on October 31, 2029.
Mexican operations
Power purchase agreements:
●MGE: In 2012, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with MGE, an indirect subsidiary of Grupo
Mexico, to supply power to some of the Company’s Mexican operations through 2032. For further information,
please see Note 18 “Related party transactions”.
●Eolica el Retiro, S.A.P.I. de C.V.: In 2013, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with Eolica el Retiro,
S.A.P.I de C.V. a windfarm energy producer that is an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico, to supply power to some
of the Company’s Mexican operations. For further information, please see Note 18 “Related party transactions”.
●Parque Eolico de Fenicias, S. de R.L. de C.V.: On February 20, 2020, the Company signed a power purchase
agreement with Parque Eolico de Fenicias, S. de R.L. de C.V., an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico, to supply
611,400 MWh of power per year to some of the Company´s Mexican operations for 20 years. This agreement is
expected to begin in July 2022.
Corporate operations
Commitment for Capital projects:
As of December 31, 2021, the Company has committed approximately $355.1 million for the development of its capital
investment projects.
Tax contingency matters:
Tax contingencies are provided for under ASC 740-10-50-15 Uncertain tax position (see Note 7 “Income taxes”).
Table of Contents
158NOTE 14—STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Treasury Stock:
Activity in treasury stock in the years 2021 and 2020 was as follows (in millions):
    2021     2020
Southern Copper common shares
Balance as of January 1, $2,767.5$2,767.9
Used for corporate purposes  (0.3) (0.4)
Balance as of December 31,  2,767.2 2,767.5
Parent Company (Grupo Mexico) common shares
Balance as of January 1,  296.0 281.0
Other activity, including dividend, interest and foreign currency
transaction effect  10.8 15.0
Balance as of December 31,  306.8 296.0
Treasury stock balance as of December 31, $3,074.0$3,063.5
SCC shares of common stock in treasury:
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, treasury stock holds 111,509,217 shares and 111,522,817 shares of SCC’s common
stock with a cost of $2,767.2 million and $2,767.5 million, respectively. The shares of SCC’s common stock held in
treasury are used for Director’s stock award plans and available for general corporate purposes.
SCC share repurchase program:
In 2008, the Company’s Board of Directors (“BOD”) authorized a $500 million share repurchase program that has since
been increased by the BOD and is currently authorized to $3 billion. Pursuant to this program, the Company has
purchased 119.5 million shares of common stock at a cost of $2.9 billion. These shares are available for general
corporate purposes. The Company may purchase additional shares of its common stock from time to time, based on
market conditions and other factors. This repurchase program has no expiration date and may be modified or
discontinued at any time.
There has been no activity in the SCC share repurchase program since the third quarter of 2016. The NYSE closing price
of SCC common shares at December 31, 2021 was $61.71 and the maximum number of shares that the Company could
purchase at that price was 1.3 million.
Grupo Mexico’s direct and indirect ownership remains at 88.9% as of December 31, 2021.
Directors’ Stock Award Plan:
The Company established a stock award compensation plan for certain directors who are not compensated as employees
of the Company. Under this plan, participants received 1,200 shares of common stock upon election and 1,200 additional
shares following each annual meeting of stockholders thereafter. 600,000 shares of Southern Copper common stock have
been reserved for this plan. On April 26, 2018, the Company’s stockholders approved a five-year extension of the Plan
until January 28, 2023 and an increase of the shares award from 1,200 to 1,600. The fair value of the award is measured
each year at the date of the grant. Commencing with the 2021 grant, the 1,600 shares shall be granted quarterly and
conditioned upon the attendance of each director to each Board meeting. The award is not subject to vesting
requirements. The stock-based compensation expense under this plan equaled $0.3 million and $0.4 million for 2021 and
2020, respectively.
Table of Contents
159The activity of this plan for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 was as follows:
    2021     2020
Total SCC shares reserved for the plan  600,000 600,000
Total shares granted at January 1,  (391,600) (377,200)
Granted in the period  (13,600) (14,400)
Total shares granted at December 31,  (405,200) (391,600)
Remaining shares reserved  194,800 208,400
Parent Company common shares:
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, there were in treasury 79,800,655 and 87,598,097 of Grupo Mexico’s common shares,
respectively.
Employee Stock Purchase Plan:
2015 Plan: In January 2015, the Company offered to eligible employees a new stock purchase plan through a trust that
acquires series B shares of Grupo Mexico stock for sale to its employees, and employees of subsidiaries, and certain
affiliated companies. The purchase price was established at 38.44 Mexican pesos (approximately $1.86) for the initial
subscription, which expires in January 2023. Every two years employees will be able to acquire title to 50% of the shares
paid in the previous two years. The employees will pay for shares purchased through monthly payroll deductions over
the eight-year period of the plan. At the end of the eight-year period, the Company will grant the participant a bonus of 1
share for every 10 shares purchased by the employee. Any future subscription will be at the average market price at the
date of acquisition or the grant date.
If Grupo Mexico pays dividends on shares during the eight-year period, the participants will be entitled to receive the
dividend in cash for all shares that have been fully purchased and paid as of the date that the dividend is paid. If the
participant has only partially paid for shares, the entitled dividends will be used to reduce the remaining liability owed
for purchased shares.
In the case of voluntary or involuntary resignation/termination of the employee, the Company will pay to the employee
the fair market sales price at the date of resignation of the fully paid shares, net of costs and taxes. When the fair market
sales value of the shares is higher than the purchase price, the Company will apply a deduction over the amount to be
paid to the employee based on a decreasing schedule specified in the plan.
In case of retirement or death of the employee, the Company will render the buyer or his legal beneficiary, the fair
market sales value as of the date of retirement or death of the shares effectively paid, net of costs and taxes.
The stock-based compensation expense for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 and the unrecognized
compensation expense under this plan were as follows (in millions):
    2021     2020  2019
Stock based compensation expense $ 0.6$ 0.6$ 0.6
Unrecognized compensation expense $ 0.8$ 1.4$ 2.0
Table of Contents
160The following table presents the stock award activity of this plan for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020:
        Unit Weighted Average
Shares Grant Date Fair Value
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2021  1,264,410$ 2.63
Granted  —  
Exercised  (397,176)$ 2.63
Forfeited  —  —
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2021  867,234$ 2.63
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2020  1,379,734$ 2.63
Granted  —  
Exercised  (115,324)$ 2.63
Forfeited  —  —
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2020  1,264,410$ 2.63
2018 Plan: In November 2018, the Company offered to eligible employees a new stock purchase plan (the "New
Employee Stock Purchase Plan") through a trust that acquires series B shares of Grupo Mexico stock for sale to its
employees, and employees of subsidiaries, and certain affiliated companies. The purchase price was established at 37.89
Mexican pesos (approximately $1.86) for the initial subscription, which expires in October 2026. Every two years
employees will be able to acquire title to 50% of the shares paid in the previous two years. The employees will pay for
shares purchased through monthly payroll deductions over the eight-year period of the plan. At the end of the eight-year
period, the Company will grant the participant a bonus of 1 share for every 10 shares purchased by the employee. Any
future subscription will be at the average market price at the date of acquisition or the grant date.
If Grupo Mexico pays dividends on shares during the eight-year period, the participants will be entitled to receive the
dividend in cash for all shares that have been fully purchased and paid as of the date that the dividend is paid. If the
participant has only partially paid for shares, the entitled dividends will be used to reduce the remaining liability owed
for purchased shares.
In the case of voluntary or involuntary resignation/termination of the employee, the Company will pay to the employee
the fair market sales price at the date of resignation of the fully paid shares, net of costs and taxes. When the fair market
sales value of the shares is higher than the purchase price, the Company will apply a deduction over the amount to be
paid to the employee based on a decreasing schedule specified in the plan.
In case of retirement or death of the employee, the Company will render the buyer or his legal beneficiary, the fair
market sales value as of the date of retirement or death of the shares effectively paid, net of costs and taxes.
The stock-based compensation expense for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 and the unrecognized
compensation expense under this plan were as follows (in millions):
    2021 2020 2019
Stock based compensation expense $ 0.7 $ 0.7$ 0.7
Unrecognized compensation expense $ 3.1 $ 3.8$ 4.5
Table of Contents
161The following table presents the stock award activity of this plan for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020:
Unit Weighted Average
    Shares    Grant Date Fair Value
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2021  3,918,458$ 1.86
Granted  — —
Exercised  (744,534)$ 1.86
Forfeited  — —
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2021  3,173,924$ 1.86
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2020 4,002,898$ 1.86
Granted — —
Exercised (84,440)$ 1.86
Forfeited — —
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2020  3,918,458$ 1.86
Executive Stock Purchase Plan:
Grupo Mexico also offers a stock purchase plan for certain members of its executive management and the executive
management of its subsidiaries and certain affiliated companies. Under this plan, participants will receive incentive cash
bonuses which are used to purchase shares of Grupo Mexico which are deposited in a trust.
Retained earnings:
As part of the settlement of claims brought on behalf of the Company and its shareholders against Grupo Mexico, AMC
and certain current and former directors (together with Grupo Mexico and AMC, the ‘‘Defendants’’) a dividend of
$0.44428 per share was paid on February 21, 2019 to shareholders of record at the close of business on February 11,
2019, other than the Defendants. The settlement dividend, totaling $36.5 million was an obligation of Grupo Mexico and
AMC and therefore, has been funded by them. In addition, Grupo Mexico and AMC paid $13.5 million of legal fees.
Non-controlling interest:
For all the years presented, in the consolidated statement of earnings the income attributable to non-controlling interest is
based on the earnings of the Company's Peruvian Branch.
The non-controlling interest of the Company’s Peruvian Branch is for investment shares. These shares were generated by
legislation in place in Peru from the 1970s through 1991; such legislation provided for the participation of mining
workers in the profits of the enterprises for which they worked. This participation was divided between equity and cash.
The investment shares included in the non-controlling interest on the consolidated balance sheets reflect outstanding
equity distributions made to the Peruvian Branch’s employees.
In prior years, the Company acquired some Peruvian investment shares in exchange for newly issued common shares of
the Company and through purchases at market value. These acquisitions were accounted for as purchases of non-
controlling interests. The excess paid over the carrying value was assigned to intangible assets and is being amortized
based on production. As a result of these acquisitions, the remaining investment shareholders hold a 0.71% interest in the
Peruvian Branch and are entitled to a pro rata participation in the cash distributions made by the Peruvian Branch. The
shares are recorded as a non-controlling interest in the Company's financial statements.
Table of Contents
162NOTE 15 – DERIVATIVE INSTRUMENTS:
From time to time, the Company uses derivative instruments to manage its cash flows exposure to changes in
commodity prices. The Company does not enter into derivative contracts unless it anticipates that the possibility exists
that future activity will expose the Company’s future cash flows to deterioration. Derivative contracts for commodities
are entered into to manage the price risk associated with forecasted purchases of the commodities that the Company uses
in its manufacturing process.
Cash Flow Hedges of Natural Gas
The Company’s objective in using natural gas derivatives is to protect the stability of natural gas costs and manage
exposure to natural gas price increases. To protect natural gas costs from estimated price increases in the coming winter
season, in the third quarter of 2021, the Company acquired two derivative instruments that began in November 2021 and
end in March 2022.
Derivative instruments balances as of December 31, 2021, are as follows:
Call Financial Swap
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments under  ASC 815 Option Cash Settlement
Commodity contracts Natural gas Natural gas
Gas volume (MMBTUs) 5,285,000 5,285,000
Fixed price ($) 0.55 3.75
Total option premium (millions of $)  1.7 N/A
Estimated fair value of assets (liabilities) as of December 31, 2021 (millions
of $)  (0.9) 0.1
(Favorable) unfavorable effect of derivative instruments on the consolidated
Statement of Earnings (millions of $)  1.2 (3.0)
(Favorable) unfavorable effect in OCI - net of deferred income taxes
(millions of $) (0.6) (*)
(*)   Less than $0.1 million.
The Company assessed these derivative instruments as Cash Flow Hedges. As such, the effective portions of said hedges
are initially reported in Other Comprehensive Income (OCI) and are reclassified as earnings in the same line item
associated with the forecasted transaction and in the same period or periods during which the hedged transaction affects
earnings. Any ineffective portions of these derivatives would be reported in earnings during the current period.
As of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019, the Company did not hold any derivative instruments.
NOTE 16—FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENT:
Subtopic 820-10 of ASC “Fair value measurement and disclosures -Overall” establishes a fair value hierarchy that
prioritizes the inputs to valuation techniques used to measure fair value. The hierarchy gives the highest priority to
unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities (Level 1 measurements) and the lowest
priority to unobservable inputs (Level 3 measurements). The three levels of the fair value hierarchy under Subtopic 820-
10 are described below:
Level 1 -Unadjusted quoted prices in active markets that are accessible at the measurement date for identical,
unrestricted assets or liabilities.
Level 2 -Inputs that are observable, either directly or indirectly, but do not qualify as Level 1 inputs. (i.e., quoted prices
for similar assets or liabilities).
Table of Contents
163Level 3 -Prices or valuation techniques that require inputs that are both significant to the fair value measurement and
unobservable (i.e., supported by little or no market activity).
The carrying amounts of certain financial instruments, including cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable (other
than accounts receivable associated with provisionally priced sales) and accounts payable approximate fair value due to
their short maturities. Consequently, such financial instruments are not included in the following table that provides
information about the carrying amounts and estimated fair values of other financial instruments that are not measured at
fair value in the consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020 (in millions):
At December 31, 2021 At December 31, 2020
    Carrying Value    Fair Value    Carrying Value    Fair Value
Liabilities:
Long-term debt level 1 $ 6,496.4$8,506.0$ 6,193.6$8,692.1
Long-term debt level 2 51.2 67.2 350.6 385.7
Total long-term debt $ 6,547.6$8,573.2$ 6,544.2$9,077.8
Long-term debt is carried at amortized cost and its estimated fair value is based on quoted market prices classified as
Level 1 in the fair value hierarchy except for the case of the Yankee bonds, which qualify as Level 2 in the fair value
hierarchy as they are based on quoted priced in market that are not active.
Fair values of assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis were calculated as of December 31, 2021
and 2020, as follows (in millions):
Fair Value at Measurement Date Using:
            Significant    
Fair Value Quoted prices in other Significant
as of active markets for observable unobservable
December 31, identical assets inputs inputs
Description 2021 (Level 1) (Level 2) (Level 3)
Assets:
Short term investment:
—Trading securities $ 486.5$ 486.5$ — $ —
—Available-for-sale debt securities:
Corporate bonds  — — — —
Asset backed securities  0.2 — 0.2 —
Mortgage backed securities  0.2 — 0.2 —
Accounts receivable:
—Embedded derivatives—Not classified as hedges:
Provisionally priced sales:
Copper  876.2 876.2 — —
Molybdenum  288.3 288.3 — —
Total $1,651.4$ 1,651.0$ 0.4$ —
Table of Contents
164Fair Value at Measurement Date Using:
            Significant    
Fair Value Quoted prices in other Significant
as of active markets for observable unobservable
December 31, identical assets inputs inputs
Description 2020 (Level 1) (Level 2) (Level 3)
Assets:
Short term investment:
—Trading securities $ 410.2$ 410.2$ — $ —
—Available-for-sale debt securities:
Corporate bonds  — — — —
Asset backed securities  0.3 — 0.3 —
Mortgage backed securities  0.3 — 0.3 —
Accounts receivable:
—Embedded derivatives-Not classified as hedges:
Provisionally priced sales:
Copper  491.9 491.9 — —
Molybdenum  129.2 129.2 — —
Total $1,031.9$ 1,031.3$ 0.6$ —
The Company’s short-term trading securities investments are classified as Level 1 because they are valued using quoted
prices of the same securities as they consist of bonds issued by public companies and publicly traded. The Company’s
short-term available-for-sale investments are classified as Level 2 because they are valued using quoted prices for
similar investments.
The Company’s accounts receivables associated with provisionally priced copper sales are valued using quoted market
prices based on the forward price on the LME or on the COMEX. Such value is classified within Level 1 of the fair
value hierarchy. Molybdenum prices are established by reference to the publication Platt’s Metals Week and are
considered Level 1 in the fair value hierarchy.
In addition, in the third quarter of 2021 the Company acquired two derivative instruments to protect natural gas costs
from estimated price increases in the coming winter season. These derivative instruments cover the period from
November 2021 through March 2022. For further information please refer to Note 15 “Derivative instruments.”
NOTE 17—CONCENTRATION OF RISK:
The Company operates four open-pit copper mines, five underground poly-metallic mines, two smelters and ten
refineries in Peru and Mexico and substantially all of its assets are located in these countries. No assurances can be made
that any operations and assets of the Company that are subject to the jurisdiction of the governments of Peru and Mexico
will not be adversely affected by future actions of such governments. Much of the Company’s products are exported
from Peru and Mexico to customers principally in the United States, Europe, Asia and South America.
Financial instruments, which potentially subject the Company to a concentration of credit risk, consist primarily of cash
and cash equivalents, short-term investments and trade accounts receivable. The Company invests or maintains available
cash with various banks, principally in the United States, Mexico, Europe and Peru, or in commercial papers of highly-
rated companies. As part of its cash management process, the Company regularly monitors the relative credit standing of
Table of Contents
165these institutions. At December 31, 2021, SCC had invested its cash and cash equivalents and short-term investments as
follows:
$ in % of total % in one institution  
Country     million    cash (1)    of country    of total cash 
United States $2,690.3 77.1%  13.6%  10.5%
Switzerland 598.7 17.2%  56.9%  9.8%
Peru  29.1 0.8%  43.0%  0.4%
Mexico  170.8 4.9%  82.4%  4.0%
Total cash and short-term investment $3,488.9 100.0%  
(1)97.8% of the Company’s cash is in U.S. dollars.
During the normal course of business, the Company provides credit to its customers. Although the receivables resulting
from these transactions are not collateralized, the Company has not experienced significant problems with the collection
of receivables.
The Company’s largest customers as percentage of accounts receivable and total sales were as follows:
    2021    2020    2019 
Accounts receivable trade as of December 31, 
Five largest customers  31.3%  35.3%  37.6%
Largest customer  11.8%  12.9%  13.0%
Total sales in year
Five largest customers  25.0%  28.1%  28.0%
Largest customer  7.2%  10.0%  10.4%
NOTE 18—RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS:
The Company has entered into certain transactions in the ordinary course of business with parties that are controlling
shareholders or their affiliates. These transactions include the lease of office space, air and railroad transportation,
construction services, energy supply, and other products and services related to mining and refining. The Company lends
and borrows funds among affiliates for acquisitions and other corporate purposes. These financial transactions bear
interest and are subject to review and approval by senior management, as are all related party transactions. Article Nine
of the Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company prohibits the Company from engaging in a
Material Affiliate Transaction that was not the subject of prior review by a committee of the Board of Directors with at
least three members, each of whom is independent, and defines a Material Affiliate Transaction as a transaction or series
of related transactions between Grupo Mexico or one of its affiliates (other than the Company or its subsidiaries), on the
one hand, and the Company or one of its subsidiaries, on the other hand, that involves consideration of more than $10.0
million in the aggregate. It is the Company’s policy that (i) a Material Affiliate Transaction not be entered into or
continued without the review and approval by the Audit Committee or its subcommittee of related party transactions
comprised of independent directors,(ii) any potential related party transaction process with aggregate consideration
between $8.0 million and $10.0 million be authorized by the General Counsel and Chief Financial Officer of the
Company and (iii) all related party transactions, including any Material Affiliate Transaction, be reported to the Audit
Committee of the Board of Directors or to its subcommittee of related party transactions.
Table of Contents
166Receivable and payable balances with related parties are shown below (in millions):
At December 31, 
2021    2020
Related parties receivable current:
Grupo Mexico and affiliates:
Asarco LLC $10.0$ 5.3
Americas Mining Corporation (“AMC”) 0.1 —
Compania Perforadora Mexico S.A.P.I. de C.V. and affiliates  0.3 0.3
Grupo Mexico  —  2.7
Mexico Generadora de Energia S. de R.L. ("MGE") 38.4 14.4
Grupo Mexico Servicios de Ingenieria, S.A. de C.V. 0.2 0.2
Related to the controlling group:
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V. 0.1 0.2
Mexico Transportes Aereos, S.A. de C.V. ("Mextransport") — —
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. (*) 0.2
$49.1$23.3
Related parties payable:
Grupo Mexico and affiliates:
AMMINCO Apoyo Administrativo, S.A. de C.V. (“AMMINCO”) $ 9.5$19.6
Asarco LLC 14.9 13.9
Eolica El Retiro, S.A.P.I. de C.V.  2.7 0.3
Ferrocarril Mexicano S.A. de C.V.  4.0 4.7
Grupo Mexico  —  0.9
Grupo Mexico Servicios 11.1 —
MGE 57.2 40.8
Mexico Compania Constructora S.A de C.V. 2.0 22.9
Grupo Mexico Servicios de Ingenieria, S.A. de C.V. 0.9 0.7
Related to the controlling group:
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V.  0.3 0.3
Mexico Transportes Aereos S.A. de C.V. (“Mextransport”)  0.5 0.1
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. 0.2 0.1
$103.3$104.3
(*)   Less than $0.1 million.
Table of Contents
167Purchase and sale activity:
Grupo Mexico and affiliates:
The following table summarizes the purchase and sale activities with Grupo Mexico and its affiliates in 2021, 2020 and
2019 (in millions):
    2021     2020     2019
Purchase activity
Asarco LLC $ 31.3$233.9$37.6
AMMINCO 8.9 18.6 17.8
Eolica El Retiro, S.A.P.I. de C.V.  9.3 1.0 2.9
Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V.  41.8 45.8 44.1
Grupo Mexico — 10.0 10.0
Grupo Mexico Servicios 20.1 — —
Intermodal Mexico S.A. de C.V. 0.5 — —
MGE  287.3 213.3 202.2
Mexico Compania Constructora S.A de C.V. 44.5 42.6 60.3
Grupo Mexico Servicios de Ingenieria, S.A. de C.V. 10.3 11.1 10.7
Peru Mining Exploration & Development Company 0.4 — —
Total purchases $454.4$576.3$385.6
Sales activity
Asarco LLC $ 33.4$ 77.9$11.3
AMMINCO 0.1 0.1 0.1
AMC 0.1 — —
Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V.  —  —  0.1
MGE 126.9 54.9 47.4
Total sales $160.5$132.9$58.9
Grupo Mexico, the parent and the majority indirect stockholder of the Company, and its affiliates provide various
services to the Company. These services are primarily related to accounting, legal, tax, financial, treasury, human
resources, price risk assessment and hedging, purchasing, procurement and logistics, sales and administrative and other
support services. The Company pays Grupo Mexico, AMMINCO and Grupo Mexico Servicios, both subsidiaries of
Grupo Mexico, for these services and expects to continue requiring these services in the future.
In 2021, 2020 and 2019, the Company donated $0.9 million, $7.1 million and $9.6 million, respectively, to Fundacion
Grupo Mexico, A.C., an organization dedicated to promoting the social and economic development of the communities
close to the Company’s Mexican operations.
The Company’s Mexican operations paid fees for freight services provided by Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A de C.V. and for
construction services provided by Intermodal Mexico, S.A. de C.V., which are all subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico.
Additionally, the Company´s Peruvian and Mexican operations paid fees for engineering services provided by Grupo
Mexico Servicios de Ingenieria, S.A. de C.V., and the Company’s Mexican operations paid fees for construction services
provided by Mexico Compania Constructora S.A. de C.V. Both companies are subsidiaries of Mexico Proyectos y
Desarrollos, S.A. de C.V., which is a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico.
In addition, the Company’s Peruvian operations purchased three mining concessions from Peru Mining Exploration &
Development Company, a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico.
The Company’s Mexican operations purchased copper concentrates and rod from Asarco LLC and also paid fees for
tolling services. Additionally, the Company´s Mexican operations purchased power from MGE. Both companies are
subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico.
In 2012, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with MGE, whereby MGE will supply some of the
Company’s Mexican operations with power through 2032. MGE has two natural gas-fired combined cycle power
Table of Contents
168generating units, with a net total capacity of 516.2 megawatts and has been supplying power to the Company since
December 2013. Currently, MGE is supplying 2.0% of its power output to third-party energy users; compared to 2.3% at
December 31, 2020.
In 2014, Mexico Generadora de Energia Eolica, S. de R.L. de C.V, an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico, located in
Oaxaca, Mexico, acquired Eolica el Retiro, a windfarm with 37 wind turbines. This company started operations in
January 2014 and began to sell power to Industrial Minera Mexico, S.A. de C.V. and subsidiaries (IMMSA) and other
subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico in the third quarter of 2014. Currently, Eolica el Retiro is supplying approximately 61.0%
of its power output to IMMSA and Mexcobre; compared to 9.6% at December 31, 2020.
The Company sold starter sheets, copper concentrate, sulfuric acid, silver and gold to Asarco LLC. In addition, the
Company´s Mexican operations received rental fees from AMMINCO. In 2019, the Company´s Mexican operations sold
an asset to Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V.
In September 2019, Asarco LLC signed a promissory agreement to pay to the Company´s Mexican operations $62.0
million plus interest no later than October 31, 2021, with quarterly payments of $0.5 million. The annual interest rate of
the note was Libor plus 200 basis points, which would be reviewed annually. In November 2020, Asarco repaid this
agreement. Related to this agreement, the Company recorded interest income of $2.2 and $2.3 million in 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
The Company also received fees for natural gas and services provided to MGE, a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico. In May
2020, MGE signed a promissory note to pay to the Company´s Mexican operations 97.2 million Mexican pesos
(approximately $5.1 million) plus interest. The annual interest rate of the note was 8.28% with monthly payments. MGE
repaid this note in December 2020.
Companies with relationships with the controlling group:
The following table summarizes the purchase and sales activities with other Larrea family companies in 2021, 2020 and
2019 (in millions):
    2021     2020     2019
Purchase activity
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V. $ 0.3$ 0.4$ 0.4
Mextransport 1.8 3.5 2.3
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. 0.4 0.2 0.2
Total purchases $ 2.5$ 4.1$ 2.9
Sales activity
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V. $ 0.1$ 0.1$ 0.1
Empresarios Industriales de Mexico, S.A. de C.V. — — 0.2
Mextransport 1.8 1.7 1.8
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. 0.1 0.1 0.1
Total sales $ 2.0$ 1.9$ 2.2
The Larrea family controls a majority of the capital stock of Grupo Mexico, and has extensive interests in other
businesses, including transportation, real estate and entertainment. The Company engages in certain transactions in the
ordinary course of business with other entities controlled by the Larrea family relating to the lease of office space, air
transportation and entertainment.
The Company’s Mexican operations paid fees for entertainment services provided by Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A
de C.V. and Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. Both companies are controlled by the Larrea family. MexTransport
provides aviation services to the Company’s Mexican operations. This is a company controlled by the Larrea family.
In addition, the Company received fees for building rental and maintenance services provided to Boutique Bowling de
Mexico S.A de C.V. and Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. The Company´s Mexican operations received fees from
Table of Contents
169Mextransport for reimbursement of maintenance expenses and for rental services. In 2019, The Company´s Mexican
operations received fees for security services provided to Empresarios Industriales de Mexico, S.A. de C.V. This is also a
company controlled by the Larrea family.
Equity Investment in Affiliate: The Company has a 44.2% participation in Compañia Minera Coimolache S.A.
(“Coimolache”), which it accounts for on the equity method. Coimolache owns Tantahuatay, a gold mine located in
northern Peru.
In addition, the Company has a 30.0% participation in Apu Coropuna S.R.L. (“Apu Coropuna”), which it accounts for
on the equity method. Apu Coropuna is a company, which undertakes exploration activities in the Pucay prospect,
located in Arequipa, Peru.
It is anticipated that in the future the Company will enter into similar transactions with these same parties.
NOTE 19—SEGMENT AND RELATED INFORMATION:
Company management views Southern Copper as having three reportable segments and manages it on the basis of these
segments. The reportable segments identified by the Company are: the Peruvian operations, the Mexican open-pit
operations and the Mexican underground mining operations segment identified as the IMMSA unit.
The three reportable segments identified are groups of mines, each of which constitute an operating segment, with
similar economic characteristics, type of products, processes and support facilities, similar regulatory environments,
similar employee bargaining contracts and similar currency risks. In addition, each mine within the individual group
earns revenues from similar type of customers for their products and services and each group incurs expenses
independently, including commercial transactions between groups.
Intersegment sales are based on arm’s length prices at the time of sale. These may not be reflective of actual prices
realized by the Company due to various factors, including additional processing, timing of sales to outside customers
and transportation cost. Added to the segment data is information regarding the Company’s sales. The segments
identified by the Company are:
1.Peruvian operations, which include the Toquepala and Cuajone mine complexes and the smelting and refining
plants, including a precious metals plant, industrial railroad and port facilities that service both mines. The Peruvian
operations produce copper, with production of by-products of molybdenum, silver and other material.
2.Mexican open-pit operations, which include La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and the smelting and
refining plants, including a precious metals plant and a copper rod plant and support facilities that service both
mines. The Mexican open-pit operations produce copper, with production of by-products of molybdenum, silver and
other material.
3.Mexican underground mining operations, which include five underground mines that produce zinc, copper, silver
and gold, and a zinc refinery. This group is identified as the IMMSA unit.
The Peruvian operations include two open-pit copper mines whose mineral output is transported by rail to Ilo, Peru
where it is processed at the Company’s Ilo smelter and refinery, without distinguishing between the products of the two
mines. The resulting product, anodes and refined copper, are then shipped to customers throughout the world. These
shipments are recorded as revenue of the Company’s Peruvian mines.
The Mexican open-pit segment includes two copper mines whose mineral output is processed in the same smelter and
refinery without distinguishing between the products of the two mines. The resultant product, anodes and refined copper,
are then shipped to customers throughout the world. These shipments are recorded as revenues of the Company’s
Mexican open-pit mines.
Table of Contents
170The Company has determined that it is necessary to classify the Peruvian open-pit operations as an operating segment
that is separate from the Mexican open-pit operations due to the very distinct regulatory and political environments in
which they operate. The Company’s Chief Operating Decision Maker (“CODM”) must consider the operations in each
country separately when analyzing results of the Company and making key decisions. The open-pit mines in Peru must
comply with stricter environmental rules and must deal with a political climate that has a very distinct vision of the
mining industry than that seen in Mexico. In addition, the collective bargaining agreement contracts are negotiated
differently in each of the countries. These key differences result in the Company taking varying decisions with regard to
open-pit operations in the two countries.
The IMMSA segment includes five mines whose minerals are processed in the same refinery. Sales of product from this
segment are recorded as revenues of the Company’s IMMSA unit. While the Mexican underground mines are subject to
a regulatory environment that is very similar to that applicable to Mexican open-pit mines, the nature of the products and
processes of the two Mexican operations vary considerably. These differences cause the Company’s CODM to take a
very different approach when analyzing results and making decisions regarding the two Mexican operations.
Financial information is regularly prepared for each of the three segments and the results of the Company’s operations
are regularly reported to the CODM on the segment basis. The CODM of the Company focuses on operating income and
on total assets as measures of performance to evaluate different segments and to make decisions to allocate resources to
the reported segments. These are common measures in the mining industry.
Financial information relating to Company’s segments is as follows:
Year Ended December 31, 2021
(in millions)
        Mexican        Corporate, other    
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian and
Open-pit Unit Operations eliminations Consolidated
Net sales outside of segments $6,109.0$ 454.3$4,370.8$ — $10,934.1
Intersegment sales  — 145.9 —  (145.9) —
Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation,
amortization and depletion)  1,953.5 440.9 1,662.0 (162.0) 3,894.4
Selling, general and administrative  62.8 10.0 40.1 12.3 125.2
Depreciation, amortization and depletion  392.6 54.8 321.0 37.6 806.0
Exploration  2.3 5.7 14.5 20.9 43.4
Operating income $3,697.8$ 88.8$2,333.2$ (54.7) 6,065.1
Less:
Interest, net  (349.9)
Other income (expense)  (18.4)
Income taxes  (2,299.2)
Equity earnings of affiliate  13.6
Non-controlling interest  (14.1)
Net income attributable to SCC $3,397.1
Capital investment $ 463.6$ 98.3$ 320.9$ 9.5$ 892.3
Property and mine development, net $4,463.2$ 571.0$3,707.3$ 722.9$9,464.4
Total assets $8,559.8$ 998.2$4,932.7$ 3,806.9$18,297.6
Table of Contents
171Year Ended December 31, 2020
(in millions)
        Mexican        Corporate, other    
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian and
Open-pit Unit Operations eliminations Consolidated
Net sales outside of segments $4,412.4$ 418.9$3,153.6$ — $7,984.9
Intersegment sales  111.0  (111.0) —
Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation,
amortization and depletion)  1,991.6 383.0 1,679.5 (124.3) 3,929.8
Selling, general and administrative  70.5 9.5 37.6 8.6 126.2
Depreciation, amortization and depletion  366.7 42.5 328.7 37.7 775.6
Exploration  2.5 8.6 9.4 12.1 32.6
Operating income $1,981.1$ 86.3$1,098.4$ (45.1) 3,120.7
Less:
Interest, net  (347.4)
Other income (expense)  (27.5)
Income taxes  (1,174.4)
Equity earnings of affiliate  6.4
Non-controlling interest  (7.4)
Net income attributable to SCC $1,570.4
Capital investment $ 317.1$ 72.1$ 195.0$ 8.0$ 592.2
Property and mine development, net $4,470.5$ 548.2$3,735.1$ 704.9$9,458.7
Total assets $7,236.1$ 967.2$5,169.9$ 3,573.3$16,946.5
Year Ended December 31, 2019
(in millions)
        Mexican        Corporate, other    
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian and
Open-pit Unit Operations eliminations Consolidated
Net sales outside of segments $3,963.9$ 381.6$2,940.1$ — $7,285.6
Intersegment sales — 83.2 —  (83.2) —
Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation,
amortization and depletion)  1,613.1 380.3 1,702.1 (89.1) 3,606.4
Selling, general and administrative  78.6 7.9 38.5 6.8 131.8
Depreciation, amortization and depletion  351.9 52.3 328.1 32.1 764.4
Exploration 1.8 9.0 16.5 2.7 30.0
Operating income $1,918.5$ 15.3$ 854.9$ (35.7) 2,753.0
Less:
Interest, net  (319.5)
Other income (expense)  (7.0)
Income taxes  (945.3)
Equity earnings of affiliate  10.7
Non-controlling interest  (6.1)
Net income attributable to SCC $1,485.8
Capital investment $ 244.3$ 106.3$ 350.1$ 6.8$ 707.5
Property and mine development, net $4,648.5$ 497.1$3,879.2$ 346.2$9,371.0
Total assets $8,081.9$ 837.6$5,017.9$ 2,470.0$16,407.4
Table of Contents
172The following table presents information regarding the opening and closing balances of receivables by reporting
segment of the Company for the two years ended December 31, 2021 (in millions):
Mexican
    Mexican    IMMSA     Peruvian    Corporate &     
Open-Pit Unit Operations Elimination Consolidated
As of December 31, 2021:                
Trade receivables $ 656.0$ 51.2$ 651.5$ — $1,358.7
Related parties, current  46.9 0.2 —  2.0 49.1
As of December 31, 2020:                
Trade receivables $ 566.0$ 57.8$ 445.1$ — $1,068.9
Related parties, current 15.4 —  0.8 7.1 23.3
SALES VALUE PER SEGMENT:
The following table presents information regarding the sales value by reporting segment of the Company’s significant
products for the three years ended December 31, 2021 (in millions):
Year Ended December 31, 2021
    Mexican
Mexican    IMMSA     Peruvian    Corporate, Other &    Total
Open-pit Unit Operations Eliminations Consolidated
Copper $5,182.1$ 94.9$3,625.4$ (74.1)$8,828.3
Molybdenum  538.4 —  514.7 —  1,053.1
Zinc  —  289.0 —  0.5 289.5
Silver  252.8 152.7 133.0 (64.1) 474.4
Other  135.7 63.6 97.7 (8.2) 288.8
Total $6,109.0$ 600.2$4,370.8$ (145.9)$10,934.1
Year Ended December 31, 2020
    Mexican
Mexican    IMMSA     Peruvian    Corporate, Other &    Total
Open-pit Unit Operations Eliminations Consolidated
Copper $3,762.1$ 72.1$2,727.3$ (48.4)$6,513.1
Molybdenum  275.2 —  235.1 —  510.3
Zinc  —  247.8 —  1.6 249.4
Silver  235.5 155.8 112.0 (55.5) 447.8
Other  139.6 54.2 79.2 (8.7) 264.3
Total $4,412.4$ 529.9$3,153.6$ (111.0)$7,984.9
Year Ended December 31, 2019
    Mexican
Mexican    IMMSA     Peruvian    Corporate, Other &    Total
(in millions) Open-pit Unit Operations Eliminations Consolidated
Copper $3,314.9$ 42.0$2,535.3$ (46.9)$5,845.3
Molybdenum  341.0 —  208.4 —  549.4
Zinc  —  280.1 —  (2.3) 277.8
Silver  185.9 82.7 85.6 (29.9) 324.3
Other  122.1 60.0 110.8 (4.1) 288.8
Total $3,963.9$ 464.8$2,940.1$ (83.2)$7,285.6
Table of Contents
173NET SALES AND GEOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION:
The geographic breakdown of the Company’s sales for the three years ended December 31, 2021 was as follows (in
millions):
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Mexican 
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian Corporate & 
    Open-Pit    Unit     Operations    Elimination    Consolidated
The Americas:
Mexico $1,893.3$ 387.6$ 5.0$ (145.9)$2,140.0
United States  1,648.1 52.3 233.1 —  1,933.5
Peru  —  (0.3) 586.6 —  586.3
Brazil  —  30.7 406.4 —  437.1
Chile  3.3 —  381.2 —  384.5
Other American countries  31.3 0.7 10.7 —  42.7
Europe:      
Switzerland  1,097.2 55.1 544.7 —  1,697.0
Italy  0.7 8.8 298.3 —  307.8
Spain  410.2 —  91.8 —  502.0
Other European countries  275.8 45.5 410.9 —  732.2
Asia:      
Singapore  441.9 19.4 496.5 —  957.8
Japan  23.6 —  605.5 —  629.1
Other Asian countries  283.6 0.4 300.1  584.1
Total $6,109.0$ 600.2$4,370.8$ (145.9)$10,934.1
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Mexican
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian Corporate &
    Open-Pit    Unit     Operations    Elimination    Consolidated
The Americas:
Mexico $1,296.6$ 341.1$ — $ (111.0)$1,526.7
United States  1,182.8 27.2 153.4 — 1,363.4
Peru  —  13.0 322.0 — 335.0
Brazil  —  18.7 214.3 — 233.0
Chile  18.8 —  202.3 — 221.1
Other American countries  36.8 2.9 2.7 — 42.4
Europe:    
Switzerland 898.2 69.9 475.2 — 1,443.3
Italy 0.1 9.5 262.0 — 271.6
Spain 199.4 —  —  — 199.4
Other European countries 199.9 40.2 281.6 — 521.7
Asia:    
Singapore 319.9 6.9 536.9 — 863.7
Japan 46.9 —  532.6 — 579.5
Other Asian countries 213.0 0.5 170.6 384.1
Total $4,412.4$ 529.9$3,153.6$ (111.0)$7,984.9
Table of Contents
174Year Ended December 31, 2019
Mexican
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian Corporate &
    Open-Pit    Unit     Operations    Elimination    Consolidated
The Americas:
Mexico $1,262.2$ 352.9$ — $ (83.2)$1,531.9
United States  1,054.9 6.2 134.5 — 1,195.6
Peru  1.6 —  338.4 — 340.0
Brazil  —  17.3 194.4 — 211.7
Chile  1.2 —  190.1 — 191.3
Other American countries  37.6 2.2 3.3 — 43.1
Europe:    
Switzerland 780.9 36.7 355.8 — 1,173.4
Italy 45.1 13.3 238.6 — 297.0
Spain 186.1 —  —  — 186.1
Other European countries 92.8 24.9 256.9 — 374.6
Asia:    
Singapore 345.4 10.4 611.1 — 966.9
Japan 59.9 —  440.9 — 500.8
Other Asian countries 96.2 0.9 176.1 — 273.2
Total $3,963.9$ 464.8$2,940.1$ (83.2)$7,285.6
PROVISIONAL SALES PRICE:
At December 31, 2021, the Company has recorded provisionally priced sales of copper at average forward prices per
pound, and molybdenum at the year-end market price per pound. These sales are subject to final pricing based on the
average monthly copper prices on the London Metal Exchange (“LME”) or New York Commodities Exchange
(“COMEX”) and Dealer Oxide molybdenum prices in the future month of settlement.
Following are the provisionally priced copper and molybdenum sales outstanding at December 31, 2021:
    Sales volume    Priced at    
(million lbs.)(per pound) Month of settlement
Copper 198.1 4.42 January through May 2022
Molybdenum 15.4 18.70January through March 2022
Provisional sales price adjustments included in accounts receivable and net sales were as follows at December, 31 (in
millions):
At December 31, 
    2021     2020
Copper $ 1.2 $ 17.4
Molybdenum  (9.0) 14.1
Total $ (7.8)$ 31.5
Management believes that the final pricing of these sales will not have a material effect on the Company’s financial
position or results of operations.
LONG-TERM SALES CONTRACTS:
The following are the significant outstanding long-term contracts:
In 2019, a three-year copper cathodes sales agreement was signed with Mitsui, with shipments beginning in 2020. Mitsui
and the Company will negotiate market terms and conditions for annual contracts no later than November 30 of the year
prior to shipment. The contract considers the following annual volumes of copper cathodes; 48,000 tonnes for each of
Table of Contents
175the years from 2020 through 2022. Failure to reach an agreement on market terms would cancel the annual contract but
not the long-term agreement. Under the terms of the agreement all shipments would be to Asia and no exclusivity rights
for Mitsui or commissions are included. This contract may be renewed for additional years, upon the agreement of both
parties.
Under the terms of a sales contract with Molymet Group (Molibdenos y Metales, S.A., Complejo Industrial Molynor
S.A. and Molymet Belgium N.V) SPCC Peru Branch is required to supply approximately 70% of the molybdenum
concentrates production from 2019 through 2022. The sale price of the molybdenum concentrate is based on the average
of the High and Low “Daily Dealer Oxide” as published in “Platt’s Metals Daily”. The roasting charge deduction is
agreed based on international market terms.
Under the terms of a sales contract with Molymex, S.A. de C.V., Operadora de Minas de Nacozari, S.A. de C.V. and
Operadora de Minas e Instalaciones Mineras, S.A. de C. V. are required to supply at least the 80% of their molybdenum 
concentrates production from 2020 through 2023. The sale price of the molybdenum concentrate is based on the average 
of the High and Low “Daily Dealer Oxide” as published in “Platt’s Metals Daily.”  The roasting charge deduction is 
negotiated based on international market terms.
In 2019, a five-year sulfuric acid sales agreement was signed between SPCC Peru Branch and Marcobre, with shipments
scheduled to begin in 2020. Marcobre and the Company will negotiate market terms and conditions for annual contracts
no later than the last day of October of the year prior to shipment. The contract considers the annual volumes that could
place Marcobre as the most important customer of sulfuric acid. Failure to reach an agreement on market terms would
trigger a mechanism that force both parties to accept the Annual Benchmark for the region as the agreed price. This
contract may be renewed for additional years, upon the agreement of both parties.
NOTE 20—SUBSEQUENT EVENTS:
DIVIDENDS:
On January 27, 2022, the Board of Directors authorized a dividend of $1.00 per share paid on March 2, 2022, to
shareholders of record at the close of business on February 15, 2022.
LITIGATION MATTERS – CORPORATE OPERATIONS:
Carla Lacey, on behalf of herself and all other similarly situated stockholders of Southern Copper Corporation, and
derivatively on behalf of Southern Copper Corporation
On February 1, 2022, the Judge approved the proposed settlement by the parties and awarded certain fees to the
plaintiff’s attorneys. The Judge’s order for this decision was registered on February 2, 2022. Under applicable law, there
was a 30-day period for parties to appeal the Judge's order. This period expired on March 4, 2022, therefore the Judge's
order is considered final.
Table of Contents
176OTHER COMPANY INFORMATION:
ANNUAL MEETING
The annual stockholders meeting of Southern Copper Corporation will be held on Friday, May 27, 2022, at 9:00 am,
Mexico City time. As we continue to be affected by the COVID-19 pandemic and to support the health and well-being of
our employees and shareholders, this year’s meeting will be held via a live audio webcast.
TRANSFER AGENT, REGISTRAR AND STOCKHOLDERS’ SERVICES
Computershare
480 Washington Boulevard
Jersey City, NJ 07310-1900
Phone: (866) 230-0172
DIVIDEND REINVESTMENT PROGRAM
SCC stockholders can have their dividends automatically reinvested in SCC common shares. SCC pays all
administrative and brokerage fees. This plan is administered by Computershare. For more information, contact
Computershare at (866) 230-0172.
STOCK EXCHANGE LISTING
The principal markets for SCC’s common stock are the NYSE and the Lima Stock Exchange (BVL). SCC’s common
stock symbol is SCCO on both the NYSE and the Lima Stock Exchange.
OTHER SECURITIES
The Branch in Peru has issued, in accordance with Peruvian Law, “investment shares” (formerly named labor shares)
that are quoted on the Lima Stock Exchange under symbols SPCCPI1 and SPCCPI2. Transfer Agent, registrar and
stockholders services are provided by Credicorp Capital, Avenida EI Derby 055, Torre 4, Piso 10, Santiago de Surco,
Cod postal 15039, Peru.
Telephone (51-1) 416-3333, Extensions 32478 and 32441.
OTHER CORPORATE INFORMATION
For other information on the Company or to obtain, free of charge, additional copies of the Annual Report on Form 10-
K, contact the Investor Relations Department at:
1440 East Missouri Avenue, Suite 160 Phoenix, AZ 85014, USA
Telephone: (602) 264-1375
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION
USA
1440 East Missouri Ave, Suite 160
Phoenix, AZ 85014, USA
Phone: (602) 264-1375
Fax: (602) 264-1397
Mexico
Campos Eliseos 400
Colonia Lomas de Chapultepec
Table of Contents
177Delegacion Miguel Hidalgo
C.P. 11000—MEXICO
Phone: (5255) 1103-5000
Fax: (5255) 1103-5567
Peru
Av. Caminos del Inca 171
Urb. Chacarilla del Estanque
Santiago de Surco
Cod postal 15038—PERU
Phone: (511) 512-0440 Ext 3181
Fax: (511) 512-0492
Website: www.southerncoppercorp.com
Email address: southerncopper@southernperu.com.pe
Table of Contents
178ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANT ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
Not applicable.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
As of December 31, 2021, the Company conducted an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of the
Company’s disclosure committee and the Company’s management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief
Financial Officer, of the effectiveness and the design and operation of the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures
(as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e). Based on that evaluation, the Chief Executive Officer and
the Chief Financial Officer have concluded that the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures are effective as of
December 31, 2021, to ensure that information required to be disclosed in reports filed or submitted under the Exchange
Act is:
1. Recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the SEC’s
rules and forms, and
2. Accumulated and communicated to management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief
Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
CHANGES IN INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
There were no changes in the Company’s internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-
15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) that occurred during the fourth quarter
ended December 31, 2021 that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company’s
internal controls over financial reporting,
MANAGEMENT’S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting (as
defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the Company.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness for future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with policies or procedures may
deteriorate.
Under the supervision and with the participation of the Company’s management, including the Chief Executive Officer
and Chief Financial Officer, the Company conducted an evaluation of the effectiveness of its internal control over
financial reporting based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee
of Sponsoring Organization of the Treadway Commission. Based on the evaluation made under this framework,
management concluded that as of December 31, 2021 such internal control over financial reporting is effective.
Our internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021 has been audited by Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz
Urquiza, S.C. member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Limited, an independent registered public accounting firm, as stated
in their report which is provided below.
Table of Contents
179REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of Southern Copper Corporation
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of Southern Copper Corporation and subsidiaries (the
“Company”) as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013)
issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). In our opinion, the
Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31,
2021, based on the criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (PCAOB), the consolidated financial statements and financial statement schedule as of and for the year ended
December 31, 2021 of the Company and our report dated March 7, 2022, expressed an unqualified opinion on those
financial statements and financial statement schedule.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its
assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying
“Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting” appearing in Item 9A. Our responsibility is to
express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public
accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was
maintained in all material respects. Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial
reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness
of internal control based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the
circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A Company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding
the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles. A Company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies
and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the
transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the Company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely
detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the Company’s assets that could have a material effect on the
financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of the effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may
deteriorate.
Table of Contents
180Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C.
Member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Limited
/s/ DANIEL TOLEDO ANTONIO
C.P.C. Daniel Toledo Antonio
Mexico City, Mexico
March 7, 2022
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
None.
ITEM 9C. DISCLOSURE REGARDING FOREIGN JURISDICTIONS THAT PREVENT INSPECTIONS.
Not applicable.
Table of Contents
181PART III
ITEM 10, 11, 12, 13 AND 14
INFORMATION ABOUT OUR EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Set forth below are the executive officers of the Company, their ages as of February 26, 2022 and their positions.
Name     Age    Position
German Larrea Mota‑Velasco  68 Chairman of the Board and Director
Oscar Gonzalez Rocha  83 President, Chief Executive Officer and Director
Raul Jacob Ruisanchez  63 Vice President, Finance, Treasurer and Chief Financial Officer
Julian Jorge Lazalde Psihas  53 Secretary
Andres Carlos Ferrero Ghislieri  53 General Counsel
Lina Vingerhoets Vilca  60 Comptroller
Edgard Corrales Aguilar  66 Vice President, Exploration
Raul Vaca Castro  62 General Auditor
German Larrea Mota-Velasco has served as our Chairman of the Board since December 1999, Chief Executive Officer
from December 1999 to October 2004 and as a member of our Board of Directors since November 1999. He has been
Chairman of the board of directors, President and Chief Executive Officer of Grupo Mexico (holding) since 1994.
Mr. Larrea has been Chairman of the board of directors and Chief Executive Officer of Grupo Ferroviario
Mexicano S.A. de C.V (railroad company) since 1997. Mr. Larrea was previously Executive Vice Chairman of Grupo
Mexico and has been a member of the board of directors since 1981. He is also Chairman of the board of directors and
Chief Executive Officer of Empresarios Industriales de Mexico, S.A. de C.V. (holding) and Fondo Inmobiliario (real
estate company), since 1992. He founded Grupo Impresa, a printing and publishing company in 1978, remaining as the
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer until 1989 when the company was sold. He is a director of the Consejo Mexicano
de Negocios since 1999, was a director of Banco Nacional de Mexico, S.A. (Citigroup) from 1992 to 2015 and Grupo
Televisa, S.A.B. from 1999 to 2014.
Oscar Gonzalez Rocha has served as our President since December 1999 and our President and Chief Executive Officer
since October 21, 2004. He has been our Director since November 1999. Mr. Gonzalez Rocha has been the President and
Chief Executive Officer of Americas Mining Corporation since November 1, 2014 and the Chief Executive Officer and a
director of Asarco LLC (integrated U.S. copper producer), an affiliate of the Company, since August 2010. Previously,
he was our President and General Director and Chief Operating Officer from December 1999 to October 20, 2004. He
has been a director of Grupo Mexico since 2002. He was General Director of Mexicana de Cobre, S.A. de C.V. from
1986 to 1999 and of Buenavista del Cobre S.A. de C.V. (formerly Mexicana de Cananea, S.A. de C.V.) from 1990 to
1999. He was an alternate director of Grupo Mexico from 1988 to April 2002. Mr. Gonzalez Rocha is a civil engineer
with a degree from the Autonomous National University of Mexico (“UNAM”) in Mexico City, Mexico. Mr. Gonzalez
Rocha has been recognized as Copper man of the year 2015 and was inducted into the American Mining Hall of Fame in
December 2016 in Tucson, Arizona and into the Mexican Mining Hall of Fame in October 2017 in Guadalajara, Mexico.
Raul Jacob Ruisanchez has served as our Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer since April 18, 2013. He
was appointed Treasurer of the Company on April 28, 2016. He was our Comptroller from October 27, 2011 until
April 18, 2013. He has held various positions focused primarily in financial planning, treasury, corporate finance,
investor relations and project evaluation with the Company since 1992. In September 2011, he was appointed Director of
Controller and Finance of the Company’s Peruvian Branch and Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Southern
Peru Limited, one of our subsidiaries. During the period 2016 – 2021, Mr. Jacob was considered by Institutional Investor
among the top three Chief Financial Officers of the mining industry of Latin America. In 2010, he was ranked among the
top three Investor Relations executives of the mining industry of Latin America by the same publication. He is currently
President of the Peruvian National Mining, Oil and Energy Association. Mr. Jacob is currently a member of the
consulting board of the MBA program (Finance) of the Universidad del Pacifico in Lima, Peru. Until March of 2010, he
was President of the Strategic Studies Center of IPAE, an entrepreneurial association. Between 2004 and 2006, he was
the President of the Finance Affairs Committee of the American Chamber of Commerce of Peru. Mr. Jacob holds an
economics degree from Universidad del Pacifico, a Master’s Degree from the University of Texas (Austin), a Degree in
Table of Contents
182International Business Management from the Stockholm School of Economics and a Senior Manager Degree by the
Instituto de Empresa Business School (IE) in Madrid.
Julian Jorge Lazalde Psihas, our Secretary, has been a Director, Executive Vice President and General Counsel of
Asarco LLC since December 2009. Since October 2015 he is also General Counsel of Americas Mining Corporation,
both subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico, S.A.B. de C.V., the parent company of the Company. Mr. Lazalde was General
Counsel of Asarco Inc., the predecessor of Asarco LLC, from September 2006 until December 2009. Mr. Lazalde holds a
law degree from the Autonomous Institute of Mexico, known as ITAM, and has degrees from the Panamerican
University in two special areas, tax law and commercial law.
Andres Carlos Ferrero Ghislieri, our General Counsel, has been a member of the Legal Department of our Peruvian
Branch since December 1995. Prior to this, he served as a Technical Advisor to the World Bank’s Energy and Mines
Technical Assistance Loan Project (EMTAL) assigned to the National Society of Mining, Energy and Petroleum. He has
also worked as a mining law consultant for the South African Government from May to October 2001. He was elected
Superintendent of the Legal Affairs and Legal Manager of the Peruvian Branch in March 2008 and July 2016
respectively. He is a member of the Board of Compañía Minera Los Tolmos, S.A. and Secretary of the Board of Ocoña
Hydro, S.A., which are subsidiaries of the Company. He is also a Board member of Inversiones Tulipan, S. A., which is
an affiliate of the Company. He holds a law degree from the University of Lima, Peru and a Master of Law or LLM
degree in Resources Law and Policy from Dundee University, United Kingdom.
Lina Vingerhoets Vilca, our Comptroller, has been the Assistant Comptroller of the Company since April 2015 and
Controller of the Peruvian Branch of the Company since July 2015. Ms. Vingerhoets has worked for the Company’s
Peruvian Branch in various capacities since 1991. From 2013 to 2015, she was in charge of Internal Control. From 2006
to 2015, she was in charge of Accounting Quality and SEC reporting. In addition, she has held other positions in
Financial Planning, Finance and Accounting with the Company’s Peruvian Branch. Ms. Vingerhoets is a Peruvian
certified public accountant and holds Accounting and MBA degrees from the Universidad del Pacifico, in Lima, Peru.
Edgard Corrales Aguilar has served as Vice President, Exploration since July 18, 2013. Mr. Corrales has been working
with the Peruvian Branch of SCC since 1983 in various positions, including as senior geologist of the Toquepala mine,
head of the geology department of the Cuajone mine and manager of the exploration department of the Peruvian Branch
of SCC. Currently he is Exploration Director of the Peruvian Branch of SCC and general manager of SCC’s Branch in
Chile. Mr. Corrales has a degree in geology and engineering from the Universidad Nacional San Agustin, Arequipa, Peru
and has followed specialized studies at the Catholic University of Caracas, Venezuela and the MacKay School of Mines
at the University of Reno, Nevada. He has also completed extensive studies in management at various universities in
Peru.
Raul Vaca Castro was elected as General Auditor, effective July 18, 2019. He has 34 years of experience with Grupo
Mexico. Mr. Vaca Castro has been Director of Internal Audit of Minera México, a subsidiary of SCC since 2018.
Previously, he was Director of Internal Audit of the infrastructure division of Grupo Mexico, as well as Deputy Director
of Internal Control for the mining division of Grupo México. He was also comptroller of Minera Mexico Internacional
and before this, he held several positions in different companies of Grupo Mexico. Mr. Vaca holds a bachelor’s degree in
Accounting from the Universidad Nacional Autonoma de Mexico (UNAM). He holds an MBA from the Universidad del
Valle de México, with a specialization in finance, having earned an honorable mention award, when receiving his
diplomas in finance and taxes. Mr. Vaca is also an active member of the Colegio de Contadores Publicos de Mexico and
the Institute of Internal Auditors of Mexico. He is also member of the Technical Commission of Internal Audit of the
Colegio de Contadores Publicos de Mexico. He was a professor at the Facultad de Contaduria y Administracion of
Universidad Nacional Autonoma de Mexico (UNAM).
Information in response to the additional disclosure requirements specified by Part III, Items 10, 11, 12, 13 and 14 will
be included in a definitive proxy statement, which will be filed pursuant to Regulation 14A of the 1934 Securities
Exchange Act, as amended, prior to April 30, 2022, or will be provided by amendment to this Form 10-K, also to be filed
no later than April 30, 2022.
The information contained in such definitive proxy statement is incorporated herein by reference, excluding the
information under the caption “Compensation Committee Report,” which shall not be deemed filed.
Table of Contents
183PART IV.
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS, FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, SCHEDULE.
The following documents are filed as part of this report:
1. Financial Statements
The following financial statements of Southern Copper Corporation and its subsidiaries are included at the indicated
pages of the document as stated below:
Form 10-K
Pages
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID 1153) 117
Consolidated statements of earnings for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 120
Consolidated statements of comprehensive income for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 121
Consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2021 and 2020 122
Consolidated statements of cash flows for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 123
Consolidated statements of changes in equity for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 124
Notes to the consolidated financial statements 125 - 175
2. Exhibits:
3.1(a) Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, filed on October 11, 2005.
(b) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation dated May 2, 2006.
(c) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation dated May 28, 2008.
3.2By-Laws, as last amended on January 27, 2022.
4.1(a) Indenture governing $600 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among Southern Copper
Corporation, The Bank of New York and The Bank of New York (Luxembourg) S.A.
(b) Indenture governing $400 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among Southern Copper
Corporation, The Bank of New York, and The Bank of New York (Luxembourg) S.A.
4.2Form of 6.375% Note (included in Exhibit 4.1).
4.3Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(a)).
4.4Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(b)).
4.5Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank,
National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which $1.1 billion of 6.750% Notes due 2040 were issued.
4.6Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper Corporation and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the 6.750% Notes due 2040 were
issued.
4.7Form of 6.750% Notes due 2040.
4.8Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern Copper Corporation and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the 3.500% Notes due 2022 were
issued.
4.9Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern Copper Corporation
and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the 5.250% Notes due 2042
were issued.
4.10Form of 3.500% Notes due 2022.
4.11Form of 5.250% Notes due 2042.
4.12Fifth Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern Copper Corporation and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the 3.875% Notes due 2025 were issued.
4.13Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern Copper Corporation and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the 5.875% Notes due 2045 were
issued.
Table of Contents
1844.14Form of 3.875% Notes due 2025.
4.15Form of 5.875% Notes due 2045.
4.16Description of the Company’s securities registered pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934, as amended.
10.1Directors’ Stock Award Plan of the Company, as amended through January 28, 2023.
10.2Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of October 21, 2004, by and among Southern Copper
Corporation, SCC Merger Sub, Inc., Americas Sales Company, Inc., Americas Mining Corporation and
Minera Mexico S.A. de C.V.
10.3Tax Agreement entered into by the Company and Americas Mining Corporation, effective as of
February 20, 2017.
14.0Code of Business Conduct and Ethics adopted by the Board of Directors on May 8, 2003 and amended on
April 23, 2015.
21.1Subsidiaries of the Company.
23.1Consent of Registered Public Accounting Firm (Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C., Member of Deloitte
Touche Tohmatsu, Limited) (PCAOB ID 1153).
23.2Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources
for the Cuajone Mine.
23.3Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources
for the Toquepala Mine.
23.4Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources
for the Tia Maria Project.
23.5Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Los Chancas
Project.
23.6Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Michiquillay
Project.
23.7Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources
for Buenavista del Cobre.
23.8Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources
for the La Caridad Mine.
23.9Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Pilares Project.
23.10Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources
for the El Pilar Project.
23.11Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources
for the El Arco Project.
23.12Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Charcas Mine.
23.13Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Santa Barbara
Mine.
23.14Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the San Martin
Mine.
31.1Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, 18 U.S.C., Section 1350. This
document is being furnished in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-8328.
32.2Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, 18 U.S.C., Section 1350. This
document is being furnished in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-8328.
96.1Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the Cuajone Mine.
96.2Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the Toquepala Mine.
96.3Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the Tia Maria Project.
96.4Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Los Chancas Project.
96.5Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Michiquillay Project.
96.6Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for Buenavista del Cobre.
96.7Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the La Caridad Mine.
96.8Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Pilares Project.
96.9Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the El Pilar Project.
Table of Contents
18596.10Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the El Arco Project.
96.11Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Charcas Mine.
96.12Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Santa Barbara Mine.
96.13Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the San Martin Mine.
101.INS XBRL Instance Document (submitted electronically with this report). The instance document does not
appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL
document.
101.SCH XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.CAL XBRL Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.DEF XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.LAB XBRL Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.PRE XBRL Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this report).
104Cover page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)
The exhibit listed as 10.1 is the management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement required to be filed pursuant
to Item 15(b) of Form 10-K.
Attached as Exhibit 101 to this report are the following documents formatted in Inline XBRL (Inline Extensible Business
Reporting Language): (i) the Consolidated Statements of Earnings for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and
2019; (ii) the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and
2019; (iii) the Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2021 and 2020; (iv) the Consolidated Statements of Cash
Flows for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019; (v) the Consolidated Statements of changes in equity for
the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, and (vi) the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements tagged in
detail. Users of this data are advised pursuant to Rule 406T of Regulation S-T that this interactive data file is deemed not
filed or part of a registration statement or prospectus for purposes of sections 11 or 12 of the Securities Act of 1933, is
deemed not filed for purposes of section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and otherwise is not subject to
liability under these sections.
3.    Schedule II
Valuation and Qualifying Accounts and Reserves (in millions):
Additions
    Balance at    Charged to            
beginning ofcosts and Deduction/ Balance at
period expenses AdditionsApplicationend of period
Reserve deducted in balance sheet to which applicable:
Accounts Receivable:
2021  $ 8.8 — — (0.1) $ 8.7
2020  $ 0.5 8.5 — (0.2) $ 8.8
2019  $ 0.5 — — — $ 0.5
Notes issued under par:
2021  $ 67.6 2.0 — — $ 65.6
2020  $ 69.6 2.0 — — $ 67.6
2019  $ 58.8 1.9 12.7 — $ 69.6
Valuation allowance:
2021 $1,343.2 476.8 — — $1,820.0
2020 $1,097.0 246.2 — — $1,343.2
2019 $819.1 277.9 — — $1,097.0
Table of Contents
186Supplemental information
Southern Copper Corporation
Exhibit Index
Sequential
Exhibit
Number    Document Description     Page
Number
3.1(a) Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, filed on October 11, 2005. (Filed as
Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the third quarter of 2005
and incorporated herein by reference).
(b) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation dated
May 2, 2006. (Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to Registration Statement on Form S-4, File No. 333-
135170, filed on June 20, 2006 and incorporated herein by reference).
(c) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation dated
May 28, 2008. (Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
second quarter of 2008 and incorporated herein by reference).
3.2By-Laws, as last amended on January 27, 2022. (Filed as Exhibit 3.2 to the Company’s Form
8-K filed on January 31, 2022 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.1(a) Indenture governing $600 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among Southern
Copper Corporation, The Bank of New York and The Bank of New York (Luxembourg) S.A.
(Filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2005
and incorporated herein by reference).
(b) Indenture governing $400 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among Southern
Copper Corporation, The Bank of New York, and The Bank of New York (Luxembourg) S.A.
(Filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2005
and incorporated herein by reference).
4.2Form of 6.375% Note (included in exhibit 4.1).
4.3Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(a)).
4.4Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(b))
4.5Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper Corporation and Wells Fargo
Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which $1.1 billion of 6.750% Notes due
2040 were issued. (Filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on April 19, 2010 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.6Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
6.750% Notes due 2040 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.7Form of 6.750% Notes due 2040. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.8Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
3.500% Notes due 2022 were issued (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.9Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
5.250% Notes due 2042 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.10Form of 3.500% Notes due 2022. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.11Form of 5.250% Notes due 2042. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and incorporated herein by reference).
Table of Contents
1874.12Fifth Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
3.875% Notes due 2025 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.13Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
5.875% Notes due 2045 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.14Form of 3.875% Notes due 2025. (Filed as Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.15Form of 5.875% Notes due 2045. (Filed as Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.16Description of the Company’s securities registered pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (Filed herewith).
10.1Directors’ Stock Award Plan of the Company, as amended through January 28, 2023. (Filed as
an exhibit to the Company’s 2018 Proxy Statement and incorporated herein by reference).
The plan expired by its terms on January 30, 2017. A 5-year extension of the plan was
approved by the Company’s stockholders at the 2018 Annual Meeting of Stockholders.
10.2Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of October 21, 2004, by and among Southern Copper
Corporation, SCC Merger Sub, Inc., Americas Sales Company, Inc., Americas Mining
Corporation and Minera Mexico S.A. de C.V. (Filed as an Exhibit to Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on October 22, 2004 and incorporated herein by reference).
10.3Tax Agreement entered into by the Company and Americas Mining Corporation, effective as
of February 20, 2017. (Filed as Exhibit 10.4 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q for the first quarter of 2017 and incorporated herein by reference).
14.0Code of Business Conduct and Ethics adopted by the Board of Directors on May 8, 2003 and
amended on April 23, 2015. (Filed as Exhibit 14 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-
K filed April 29, 2015 and incorporated herein by reference).
21.1Subsidiaries of the Company (Filed herewith).
23.1Consent of Registered Public Accounting Firm (Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C.—
Member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu, Limited) (PCAOB ID 1153) (Filed herewith).
23.2Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and
Mineral Resources for the Cuajone Mine (Filed herewith).
23.3Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and
Mineral Resources for the Toquepala Mine (Filed herewith).
23.4Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and
Mineral Resources for the Tia Maria Project (Filed herewith).
23.5Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the
Los Chancas Project (Filed herewith).
23.6Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the
Michiquillay Project (Filed herewith).
23.7Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and
Mineral Resources for Buenavista del Cobre (Filed herewith).
23.8Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and
Mineral Resources for the La Caridad Mine (Filed herewith).
23.9Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the
Pilares Project (Filed herewith).
23.10Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and
Mineral Resources for the El Pilar Project (Filed herewith).
23.11Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and
Mineral Resources for the El Arco Project (Filed herewith).
23.12Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the
Charcas Mine (Filed herewith).
Table of Contents
18823.13Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the
Santa Barbara Mine (Filed herewith).
23.14Consent of Qualified Persons for Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the
San Martin Mine (Filed herewith).
31.1Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (Filed herewith).
31.2Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (Filed herewith).
32.1Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, 18 U.S.C.,
section 1350. This document is being furnished in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-
8238.
32.2Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, 18 U.S.C.,
section 1350. This document is being furnished in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-
8238.
96.1Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the Cuajone Mine
(To be filed by Amendment).
96.2Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the Toquepala
Mine (To be filed by Amendment).
96.3Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the Tia Maria
Project (To be filed by Amendment).
96.4Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Los Chancas Project (To be filed by
Amendment).
96.5Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Michiquillay Project (To be filed by
Amendment).
96.6Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for Buenavista del
Cobre (To be filed by Amendment).
96.7Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the La Caridad
Mine (To be filed by Amendment).
96.8Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Pilares Project (To be filed by
Amendment).
96.9Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the El Pilar
Project (To be filed by Amendment).
96.10Technical Report Summary of Mineral Reserves and Mineral Resources for the El Arco
Project (To be filed by Amendment).
96.11Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Charcas Mine (To be filed by
Amendment).
96.12Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the Santa Barbara Mine (To be filed by
Amendment).
96.13Technical Report Summary of Mineral Resources for the San Martin Mine (To be filed by
Amendment).
101.INSXBRL Instance Document (submitted electronically with this report). The instance document
does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded within the
Inline XBRL document.
101.SCHXBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.CALXBRL Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.DEFXBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with
this report).
101.LABXBRL Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.PREXBRL Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this
report).
104Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted in Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)
The exhibit listed as 10.1 is the management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement required to be filed pursuant
to Item 15(b) of Form 10-K.
Table of Contents
189Attached as Exhibit 101 to this report are the following documents formatted in Inline XBRL (Inline Extensible Business
Reporting Language): (i) the Consolidated Statements of Earnings for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and
2019; (ii) the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and
2019; (iii) the Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2021 and 2020; (iv) the Consolidated Statements of Cash
Flows for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019; (v) the Consolidated Statements of changes in equity for
the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, and (vi) the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements tagged in
detail. Users of this data are advised pursuant to Rule 406T of Regulation S-T that this interactive data file is deemed not
filed or part of a registration statement or prospectus for purposes of sections 11 or 12 of the Securities Act of 1933, is
deemed not filed for purposes of section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and otherwise is not subject to
liability under these sections.
Table of Contents
190Signatures
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant
has duly caused this Report on Form 10-K to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION
(Registrant)
By: /s/ OSCAR GONZALEZ ROCHA
Oscar Gonzalez Rocha
President and Chief Executive Officer
Date: March 7, 2022
Pursuant to requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report on Form 10-K has been signed
below by the following persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
/s/ GERMAN LARREA MOTA-VELASCOChairman of the Board, and DirectorGerman Larrea Mota-Velasco
/s/ OSCAR GONZALEZ ROCHAPresident, Chief Executive Officer and DirectorOscar Gonzalez Rocha
/s/ RAUL JACOB RUISANCHEZ Vice President, Finance, Treasurer and Chief Financial
Officer (Principal Financial Officer) Raul Jacob Ruisanchez
/s/ LINA A. VINGERHOETS VILCAComptroller (Principal Accounting Officer)Lina A. Vingerhoets Vilca
DIRECTORS
s/ GERMAN LARREA MOTA-VELASCO /s/ OSCAR GONZALEZ ROCHA
German Larrea Mota-Velasco Oscar Gonzalez Rocha
/s/ LEONARDO CONTRERAS LERDO DE TEJADA /s/ VICENTE ARIZTEGUI ANDREVE
Leonardo Contreras Lerdo de Tejada Vicente Ariztegui Andreve
/s/ XAVIER GARCIA DE QUEVEDO /s/ L. MIGUEL PALOMINO BONILLA
Xavier Garcia de Quevedo L. Miguel Palomino Bonilla
/s/ GILBERTO PEREZALONSO CIFUENTES /s/ ENRIQUE CASTILLO SANCHEZ MEJORADA
Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes Enrique Castillo Sanchez Mejorada
/s/ CARLOS RUIZ SACRISTAN
Carlos Ruiz Sacristan
Date: March 7, 2022
